      "identifier" : [
         "8_06251_278"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly",
         "Index for v. 46 in v. 46, no. 1, CIHM no. 8_06251_273."
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Ontario Pub. Co., [1916]"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian magazine"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_278",
      "label" : "Vol. 46, no. 6 (Apr. 1916)",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06251",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06251_278"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_278/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_299/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "text" : [
         "A Au nno",
         "As if made to your order Ivory Soap is' white. Ivory Soap is pure. Ivory Soap contains no barsh materials of any kînd. Ivory Soap lathers quickly, copiously, bubblingly. Jvory Soap contains no unsaponified oil to retard rins- ing. Ivory Soap floats. Ivory Soap selis for a few cents. Ivory Soap combines ail the qualities you like. IVORY SOAP 9900 . PUIRE MVad- in the Proctey \u0026 Galmblejaclor'ies at H-tton, Canarda",
         "CANAIJIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTI8ER ISSESS TPHE POWER 0F ALADDIN ared to the power which Thomas A. Edison offers you, Aladdin's was Iimited, if you own a New E.dison a group of the world's greatest artists is constantly at er-vice. A mnere twist of the wrist and presto!l right there ini the roomn peals forth cice of Rappold, Case, Matzenauer, Middleton, Chalmers, or any other of \u003eur politan stars. It is exactly as though the singer were there in the flesh. No -i ear can cletect the slightest shade of difference between the living artist's retation and that of 'IIICNEW EàÀDISON \"The Ph onograPh with a Soul \" -jing te make se strons a dlaim; it i. an. roire it. W. hav~e proved it not once but n hundred times. Moire tlian two million ve witnesseci OUf famious tone tests. a concert hall filled with cratical mnusic )ne of our Metropoliten stars, Marie lor ezaxnple, heginsta ting. Her brilliant roice soar througli the. building. Now audience. Note that sudden atir. Lacl te wonderrnent-atoniabmrent-bewilder- 'hat miracle i. thisi The. singer's lips C e moire. And yet the. beautiful aria Surey Rappold i3 stili ainging. She Every lingering overtone. every subtie ýolorins there. But lier lips are niotionles. fie. planati i. simple. The New Edison ride beside lier i. playing onie af Rappoild'a Madam Rappold begins to sang with the, record. Wlien she stops. the record continue. And so complet. aind perfect is the. Re-C*rention that the. listeners refua.e to credit the evideace of their senses. Sucli isth, Edison tarie test. With the. lights lowered te hide the. siagers@ lipe. net on. af th two million or more wvlo -have attended tuese recitale could detect wlien the artiat ceased and the, instrument sang alan. Thirty great artiste have figured ini tii,., tests. lnvariably the. resijit was the. saine. Over a thou. ssnd unpiejudiced newspaper critica have uianled i tliis assertion. Cai at the. nearest licensed Edisoni merchazit'. and receive a demanstration. lie adirertises in yeur local paper. Perhaps. too. you'd lik, go sec our literature. A postcard br'n Drmuicalmag- azine, \"Along Broadwa t rodi.\"usc Re-reaion*'and thi. yket.Wa h rfc Say.- THOMAS A. EDISON, INC., Orange, N. J.",
         "The Canadian Magazine Contents, january, 1918 No. 3 FOR Hait SOLDIER BOY .AN OCE\u0026-FN MaRCHANT MARtNE - - CANAýDA AND' TH~ tUNITED STATES - - WxrY r)o THaY DEF'AMi US? t To Iltim. Vmwsi: TnE LAST TRiJCK IN TIIE BAG - - - IN THE FORES~T. A\\ PAINTING - - - TUEF WAITRES, AT SA.4NTY. FICTION TE UNJIDDFIN GULeSýT. FICTION:- 'WAR PICs ANuD TmurI -- HARwOUa OF ST. IVES. A PAINTINGT «1GAS8\". FICTION ------- ENOL.ANt IN ARMS [K.--rtg UFNV 9- KNGLAN TiUr CrrirDRFN oF BauIGxum. DRAwiNG LxQUmÂTING THEa -WAt IN CANADA - NowRTIIER LirTs ------ TIIE LiRARY TABLE - ----Frontispiece J. W. Norcrs------193 A. H. U. Colquhoun - --204 The Hon. Charles Langelîer - 208 Margaret Yandes Bryan -- 215 Beatrice Redpath - --- 216 Pascal Dagnan-Bouveret -223 Horace Annesley Vachel 225 Blanche Gertrude Robbins -- 232 Professor S. A. Cudinore -- 240 Harry Britton---- ---242 Harris Merton Lyon -- 243 L'J'aey Amy-------252 Louis Raemaekers Laura B3. Durand People and AVfaira Book Reviews - - $2.50 PER ÂNNIJM. IncIudlng Great Britalu, freland and mont of the Coloi SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS. Lettere contauinig gubscrlPtions should b. registered and addressed t. CANÂDIAN MAGAZRINE, 200-206 Adelalde Street West, Toronto. Nuropeau Offies., 16 Regent Street, London, 8.W. 38 Rue du Louvre, Paris. Copyright, Canada, 1918, by The Ontario Pbliahhng Co., LIiited. Vol. L",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER8 A Nationial Aci-ievenett JJTo complete twenty-five years of continiousg publicti'on of The Canadîan Magazine îs a feat that Canadians may well be proud of, for, after ail it bas been the support of the readers which lias enabled the publishers to achieve this attainmrent. The\"Canadian\"is the oldest monthlymagazine published in Canada and the oui\u003e' one that bas ever even nearly approached the quarter Century mark. It bas now become a publication whîch ail broad niinded, deep thinking Canadians, who have the welfare of Canada at heart, should read. In it ail questions of national importance are discussed b\u003e' the ablest men in the Country, Art is represented b\u003e' reproductions of the works of Our best Canadian artists and aiso European artists of note. Fiction is aiso well represented b\u003e' the the best short stories obtainable in this country. Our advertising pages cannet be overiooked as, the\u003e' are filied with announcemnents to the reader of the largest manufacturers on the American continent. Advertise- ments to which the !slightest objection could be made, are not accepted. To have The Canadian Magazine in your librar\u003e' adds an atmosphere of distinction to it. Because you have flot been a subscriber for the last tweinty five years is no reason why you slhould flot be a sisbscriber for the next twenty-five years. 'Tlhe Cariadîan Magazine- bas becomne a puibli- cation of which Canadians niay weIl be proud. It has been inmproviag steadily Lintil it is both handqomne as to appearance and highly, credit- able in content.-The Detroit Frte Press The subscription rate is $2.50 to any place in the British Empire, $3.00 to the United States and $3.25 te\u003e Foreign Cotintries. Trhe Canadian, Magazinle uToronto",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Another Notable Short Story Eaèh one of the series of short stories by great living English writers, now running in The Canadian Magazine, is a real entertainment in itself. Read \"The Waitress ai Santy\" in this number, and be sure that the next, ',Captivity\"' By F. Temple Thuraton, is just as good. \"Captivity\"' is different from any short story you have ever read. Th~e author is a great writer-he leaves somnething to think about. ALSO \"The Gods of the New Era\" B., Sergeant {Rev.\u003e Lors. Pierce, M.A. which discusses H. G. Wells*s ideas of religion. Where is Canadian Literature? By J. Murray Gibbon, Author of 'Hecarts and Faces\", etc. An unusual consideration of the present standing and outlook of letters in Canada. Other articles and short stories of ment. 82350 PER ANNUM, inclu4ig Grea.t BD$t.a, Ielaatd ,and most of the. C*loolu. SINIGLIR COPIES, 25c. THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 200-206 Addaide St. W., Toronto WAT RECOMMENDS ITS ELF aME LANYM H MAn ,RKING INK REQÇUIREs NO HEAT. WARRANTED INDELIBLE NEW METALLIC PEN WITH EVERY BOTTLE NICKLE LINEN STRETCHER WITH EACH LARGE SIZE of ail Stationera Chomists and Stores or Post Fr.. for One Shilng (25c.) from the. Invemors. COOPER DENNISON \u0026 WALKDEN LTD. 7\u0026ST.ESTLA",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER French Organdie is iisedl by hundreds, of wýomn to-day becaiso àt carrnes wvith it that mnuch desired touch of re- finemrent. Your next letter paper shoulId beý French Organdie. Aa4 vutr Stationer for il »3. le certai be Weather Means Certain Need For THUez\"RMOGENE without a box of mue in your hom \u003cVandvnbroeck s PrKe,,\u003e la the modern. scientific method of flgbUna cbills and colds. A âght, dry, fIoecy, m.dicated wadding thbt GENERATES HEAT givenstant jr.Ou C. al gour DnagglaCs boums-- COLD8, N4EURALGIA, LUMBAGO, ETC. 1 tdbth@ f«,.. 8.1gio. oh-w 9oth, E(q. \u0026iol. g-.t. fo, cwmd. HIAROLDi F. RI10HIE \u0026CO., 11i.ý 10 McCaj,1 Strtoo Toronto keranrp.eeIeed XF*",
         "S GANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ONIAPSIDE, LONDON, *ROLAND. The Great Specialisty in OLOVES, HOSIERY,9 aad UNDERWEAR An unrlvalled varlety In stock - Ar- IEXTREMELY NOBERATE PRICES Fd7Y d.mid Prit. Liats of \u0026H dopertmeng ay b. obtaià.d FREE, os mp- Plicaiion, diect Itom the SOtarlo PmbishIng Co. LmM\"k , 200-206 Ad.Iaid. Street, West, 1 Toronto. Fuil dctaied Pric. List \u0026U Departmens mat\u003e obtaied FREE, oni plicafioc4 direct ftom IOntarIo PubIlsbIng i 200-206 dade Street, 1 Torlouato Depai tments les' and CbUldrens GIoves-Hosi\"r tar-Ladien JCitted Wool and Slilk ms- Ladies' Underclothing, Blouses, )ON GLOVR kext mtýe A*\"The LOI",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER \u003eakey's SILVERSUMR' SOAF \u003eakey's EMERT CLOTH ci\u0026\". Papoe FlU\" Pa\"Ir \u003eakey 9s \"WELLINGTON\"' KNI1FE 1'OLISII 1 Boli #.\u003c C.u\u0026\" IIhu Ci \u003eakeqw-ây' s \"WILLNGTOW' SLAUK LMA Boit for Steve, et.e OAhuY'8 cOOl 50tV EVERYWHER JOHN 01%«Y \u0026 SONS, UMIT ED W..ub. mo. Ld.. Ee. si. 'CIOid Country\" Clotlung Fabrics of World-Wide Renown olh, nd Lo\u0026e. i eteei .f ,.,cial lta.Ra p n Urat pa rt .d i of eha r terln q-hE E tON citas~~~ pp racadefilied 8ht.. acter espeally app ,, uLdi. EnGEPntleNi BUoRNETTaahioa ILy W.d Wtho» Wlcru e,na temil. n IrafflRoine ibat III Iim A*enue. Rosedai., Toronto 1UDDIITIAL AND\u003e DAT SCIIOOL FOR GIRLS floN. PiticipAL: Miss M. T. Scoir Pitr4WpAL- Miss Enmi IM RimD, M.A. I'reparation for the University and for Liations ini Music. Art and Domestc ence Departments. Thoroughly efficient f. Large playgrounds. Outdoor gamres rens Basket bail. Rink. Healtbful ality. Prhuai7 Sehoot for Day pnpils Fol W.oSPECTU[s MPLY TO THE PRINCIPAL pamtim, wîtîg o wsPya Make a NEW MAN of YOURSELF for the. NEW YEARI AR oig gt,, il. a f ill tii ,ý Mar,1 or BGSCS THItS YEAR? Al,, y.ai plng ta.tAY a 1i w.kla vi.lbi .maorh.l 1. eu.iolad l' ij!. po- lila.. IIEALTiI-STRENGTII VrrALrrY RESOLVE TOB E REE from y-u oh.dda.. 111 IP4hb No 1, 0 11 wb r'ualt ST1RONGFORT. IBM w* h.IpTI. 'l.mqk tia, tla\u003ca 1,yk Wlit I, aim. I uicapram teud- -rth e r-\u003c taui FitEItJ Bob.. 1 - '.1lY -1-INTELIG NC IN PHITS. [CAL AND HEALTiI CULTURE.k -m md STRONC.rORTr LIONEL STRONGPORT The Petot jetili MAsTER 0F PHYSICAL CULTURE -m Pitre Bidg., NavaIll 10. 311 trained Young Womoen to enter into its acti vities on the \"Win the. War\" bais .mienss Schools Toono provido tihe proper Training for Ssoretarial and otiier ce. Free cata(og expia ns. Write W. H. Shaw, Prosidont.",
         "a CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER ST. MARGARETeS COLLEGE 13104 ÇLO T. Z., Troa.oNTO. ONT-AJI.I@ A Reid.utial .and Day Sehool for Girls e Rate George Dickson, M. A., former Principal of Upper Canada College, and lirs. ID C;ourse, fromn ?reparatory to Lr-vest Matriculation and First Vear i Do!iu.sc Science, Physical Education-Cricket, Tennis, Basket Swimrning Bath. E DICKSON. Preaideut. Write fo Prospectus MISS J. X. MACDONALDe B.AX, Principal. tacitestrn8ter Coitteg;e zoronto, Bi VeasRenttal \u0026 ]Dap !5Cbool for 01 Situated opposite Qucena Park, Bloor St. W. Every educational facility provicd. Pupils prepareg Hlonot Matricu Ration. Mus c, Art andi Physic.1 Kducatli Th Scol b a unfailig emphasis upou the. moral as il à Lntlletua: ansat the. developutent of a trite woifljh@ood.w School Reopena Tuesday, Januar 8tix, 1918 FOR CAoENnAR APPx.Y- JOHN A. PATERSON, K.C. MAtS. A. R. GRRO Presldent. Principal. fHead Mafrr: )C. S. FoebsmY, U.A. Proerat.ry, Junior aad Senior' D.partmot..",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER EtB1OitntI4 mib Ma Or~jt#m fer 49frto.~UI 1Ncw coiplete Bufldings erected 1215..Jaty~talu scven acrespayr fit inJ elds Cs«- KIMU.g.NCft 4y.,:TIM LOR11 rItIuHO? OP TORO'O 1Nli.dpal.- MISS IVAISTT. M. A. (D.bl1n. loI fýJt,\u0026ýI IiS A. M Il. HOSSETER. \u003c(atJoe.aa 5'roel Un 1.)L1. eto uaa L.J'w 'A Iýè. F.r Cokratei .114 go . Bswr . art -Ilet 0To.-1.u.t. - 92 1 i rs ner N mssmtth. ail PvIaurIg.ik Enflh Ped. PyiclCutue Vi. ute I nte retaio Pb C Sea ing n t i rt CANADA AUUMN TERMAim CI4UAY SPTKMUE FORn BOYS.. TOR N O .CPySC5 Intrctr o t..Couge S hdCnr nltlni 4p tu a ul , wtUb RESIDENTS SCHOOL FOR\" BOYS 14 9 Zbe atfu ation Modem l Fieof Buidigs.tunre payi]Expressio R. M.t Ctee. Entrane 116 -i caIidae passed. emth Prlmto Frencfor llussra Cultudre Rev.e Cutue InePreWoolkoub.Kk, and A.,mti HArmt, IWIOPe W9ETHSURNEU COLLEGIE, OSHAWÂ, (I ONT.4 RE1T Canada CANADALor Board*\" o ntor o the 2 Coudo fr le nv rs esn for t\u003e.enina,,tioya Miif r duerg andZ ~ llzies an rpaao Deale ithoo remrn.s --c. pltysics -trs11l ond ctg. TO O T h\u003e~rnwt(i, heoasic Ha''otrnofy th i e wudIe et. . ietouo atr ni0 iuw. g~sad.rtIedfur-l ih ti onST ai -tG.ss.TE ITRS0n. SOIE TEE DWIJ URP . 11M kSHFt-IR C LL GE «ki eideh Park fOttaws , OVENDE CHOL OR OY ]3eautiul sitation. odem Freproo Buld n . Ten es pa,rng aed. R.M .EtArt 11, sceranidate Fred. Haths ititl ~aa Vrie or 11strté C Sumar - e. Gn Pite p0orMissE. M. A.o, HaMs E. ieila, Th-eL- S3ihpi",
         "10 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ABVERTISER t', HOME STUDY DEPARTMNEN r OF TIIE NAVAL SERVICE. ROYAL NAVAL, COLLEGE OF CANADA. NNUAI.~ ~ f-r etry of Naval mli.in May eacb h auoe. cantiidat- jolniog teColi K)ut the. 14t Auguat flowing the APicatid o e ry rare.re.clv.d up tothe 13t Aprl v he ect.y.Civil Service msi, Ottaa firorn whorn Wlak .ntry forma can be Ca nlida tri for cxa tiu mnuai bave Pacd their ro-zth bitiiay, and flot r.e-hed th- ,i.teenthi ,,,, h y, on theltJuly followiug the. eiaminat.on. Fu tber detaila cân bc obtained on aplication ta CI . I.ebaratu .U. De.uî 4in..ter of the. Neesi Service, Depariutf the Naval Service, OttLawa. 0. J. DESBARATS. Deputy Minieter (f the. Naval Service. Departmfat of the. Naval Service. Ottawa. March 12,1t917. Unautho.4aed pblicatiou of tii advurti.ement will mot be pald fr QUEN'\"S UNI VERSITI KINGSTON, ONTARIO ARTS EDUCATION MEDICI!4 SCHOOL 0F MINING XINING CHEMICAL MECHANICAL CIVIL ELECTRIC\u0026L ]ENGINEERING GEO. Y. CHOWN, Regitre,. The Royal Military College cf Canada the course, and. ln of AUl kinds . ensur C~nniglo~n ln The. diplotiza of for Domizilon Land of the Law 8ociety The lengrtl Oft The. total cosi sstwas, le *bout 88 The annual corr ecci yemr At the h, For full P\u0026rtit mandant. ROYAl MI 1 of more tvalue and iterest tc the country tha i. Notwlthstanding this, lie ctbject and work understood by the general public. ,ution, desigued p)rimerlir for the purpose of @ scien ce t.\u003e cadets and officers of lte Canailian M id Sandhiurst. \u003enet.\u003e, are ail oMcers on the Active lIst of the. Im la in addition a comlet. staff or prof essor f. trt\u0026nt part of the eolege course. Medical attemi a strictly mtfltary hauts. the Cadets receive a ess3ential to a sourid modern ed ucation. U nding ln Math etnatica, Civil Engineering, Survd th. the College le one of the. mnt valuable featui nt practice of gyjunastice. drIli and outdoor exe ent phyaical condition. Impertal service and Canadian Permanent Fort dered by the autholUes conducting the examit Ivalent toc a niiversity degree. and by tie Regu ns the saine exemnptions nt a B.A. degre. earo, la three terme of 9% m4ionths ssci. iding board. uniform. Instructional material, eu % for admission to the Collete takes place in 18 evera military districts. exnlinatton and for eny otiter Information, AV of the Mlitia Council. Ottawa, Ont., or to the Arts Courses only SUMMER SCHOO L JmIy end LuEut",
         "CANADIÂN MAGIAZINE ADVERTISER The War Charities Act, 1917 DEPARTMENT 0F THE SECRETARY 0F STATE 0F CANADA THE 'War Charities Aýct, 1917, defines \"wair cýharitieS\" as follows: any £uind, institution or association, other than a vhuircl or the Salvation Arxniy, whether eïstahlishied before or after the coin- mencement of this Act, having for its objecta or iimong its objecta the relief of suffering or distreas, or- thie supplying of needs or eoniforts to sufferers fromr the war, or to sol(liers, returned soldiers or thoir famîlfies or dependents, or any other charitable plurpose oonnlecved wvith the present European war. Any question whether a charityv is a war charity shahl be finally deterinne by thie Minister. The Act also provides: (1) It shail not be lawful to make any appeal to the publie for donations or subscriptions in nioney or in kind for aniy war charity as hereinbefore deflned, or to raille or attempt to raise money for any 8uch war charity by promoting any bazaar, sale, entertainmient or exhibition, or by any similar means, unles;s-- (a) the war charity is cithier exempted from registration or is regis- tered under this Act; aind, (b) the approval, in writing of the executive committee, or other governing body of the war eharitY lias been obtained, eithier direetîy or through some person duly authorized to give sulch approval on behalf of sueli governing body; and if any person contravenes any of the provisions of this section hie shalfl be guilty of an offence against thîs Act. (2) This section shallflot apply to, any collection at Divine Service in a place of public worshîp. The Act was assented to on the 2Oth of September, 1917. and the above section so far as it relates to registration is applicable to Wtir Charities on the 20th of December, 1917. After that date, collections mnade otherwise than on behalf of a registered War Charity by sub\u003e seriptions, donations, bazaars, sales, entertainmnrts, exhibitions or simi- lar means of collecting money are illegal. Regulations and information respecting registration inay bc obtain- ed from the undlersigned. TIIOMAS MIILVEY, OttwaDecxubr 3 197.Under-Secretar3r of State.",
         "18 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISIR Opportunlty THE PRICE OFCOAL, lis anewlrin ahmanw's of brea'd and other necessities of 1Ti eap ;, n!s rd#*s lîfe, has doubled in the past ten he ýnr IC'years, Have you încreased your AUt lUif IIanceg t nsuance have sucded yüsterday ininuane Pj2cio.a POlicýonyourUife; yet y hin agin.The New Soma dey laoweve' he may diatin he, eanimeProtection tu additJen te the. possibflity of fal n he\u0026th th rela t S a v in g s P o lic y whic meusa Inreas inhe kkhuýeno'w offer ijiII meet yowdr FOI both tii... ressent if fineds ..t sale te potp»...a décision. \"fo mc aeyo orh\"EXCELI8UO R immutua1d Life luseauc L. 1 F E CIPY of Canada m..dom..-UXCEUIOR LIV!I BLDG.,TORONTO Wterloo-Ontar-;o 1 You Look for SECURITy Whether with the intention of taking out insurance or associating yourself with some Company, you look for security. The Iatest figures emphasize the un- excelled financial position of this Company. amukesa in vrce ever $89.000.000 AS do 10,400,000 Net uflm dé 2,600,0000 Tiiese are reasons why the Comepany is 'known as 'Sotdas the Cowlinent' North Amc'ioen Life Assurance Co. Head Office - TObRONTO",
         "CANADIN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 1 THIE ROYAL BAN19K 0F CANADA Ivioorporat.d lots SapItal Authorizsd - 825,000,000 essri Funde - S 14,324,000 Sapital Pald Up * 12o011,700 Total Asseta.- 295,000,000 HEAD OFFICIE -MONTREAIL 1IMREcT0RSý SIR HERBERT S. HOLT,PN'aieM~ E. L. PRASE, VioeiPrW*,itEF'JO STNKCs. f.Jwm ja-~ Rc4moad G. R. Crowe D. K, Eliiott Hon. W. M1. Thoru. Huich Paton Wm. R,)brrt.oýn A. J. Brown, K.C. W. J. Sheppard C. S. W~ilz AX E, I\u003eymoet C. E. NI 5fr Moetimer B. Davi, G. fl. Duggau C. C. Biackadar John T. Ros. R. MacD) atro G .Sr. KC. Exeoutive Officers. S. L. PeauM, Ma-%gig Director C. F. NeilI nrl. Mna w. B. Torrance, Superintendent of Brainrhc. F. J. Shiernian, A,i.t.,t ii R ICMaaer 365-BRANGMES TH ROUGMOUT CANADA AN D NEWFOUNDLAND-365 AI.. Buacbes lu CUba, PQort Râco, DomlIta* ePPub\"lé Costa Rica, Venezuela, Antigua, Barbado., Dont*\u0026, Grenada janiaca, St. Kitta Tridad ancs Babana Ildandb, Btktlh a=s;d âr~itia Hl'n ura. SAVINOS DEPARTMErIT AT\u0026 A Y^LL. E Buy Peace of Mmnd WE are offcrmng for sae \"h thigs \"ht every man, should buy- PEACE 0F MIND-FREEDOMI FROM CARE PROTECTION FROM WORRY For a smail payuacnt clown we WinI immediately put millions. cf assets bebind our promime ýc provîie for youa Iamuly ini the event of death or for your own oId aile ini the evei of No extra piremium is required for invaluabe OLD AGE ENDOWMENT feature [n our special Reserve-Dividend policeÎ, FuIl inf«monen rcue London Life' Insurance Company HEAD OFFICE : LONDON, CANADA proeident, F.A. S., Manager. Dr. A. 0. JEFFERY. K,C.. E. E. REID), B A., AILA., A-t. Maniage, and Acttiar y",
         "14 CANADIÀN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER THRIFT MONEY IS NEEDED-for the war -fo home emiergencies-for the growing cost of living-for a business start-for a holiday-for old age-for ail purposes. Increase Your Saving, hold down your spending, open a Saving-s Account at The Bank of Tor-onto. Savings Accounts for snall or large sums izivited at ail branches of this Bank. 119 Branches in Canada ASSETS - . $73,000,000 DIRECTORS W. G. GOODERHAM, PRESIDENT JOSEPH HENDERSON, VICE PRESIDENT William Stont. John Maz4ooald, Lt.aCel. A. E. Gooderharn Betg.-Gen. F. S. Muighen, J. L. Eaglehart, William 1. Gaar PaulJ J. Myler, A. H. Campbell. THOS. F. HOW, GENERAL MANAGER John R. Lamnb, Supt. of Branches. D\u003e. C. GRANT, ChiId Inspector.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISETR -o, calilta - - 7,900,000 rie Fund - - 7,421,292 i kepalte 92,10t,072 IAsets e 121,130,58 233 Branohes In Canada. Exteadiaig from the A tlac tic to the, Pacific, Yina Depsrtment at al Branchu. itu r.eeved of $1.00 an~d upward. »Md k.test allowed at bout *urrt rate. G.a.r\" Bakinâ Buam.u. IFERINGS ,dég .1 bonds wlkh we olet sent on ppicion. Em'er Scurli pou- ma hIe qualilu essnt in na ound rvesimenl, conibining SAFETY 0F )RJNCJPAL AND INTEREST Wh 7 HE MOST FAVORABLE VEREST RETURN. Governm.nt - municipal Oorporti@n a.nd Provei incdustrial Bonds. Yldc 8j%/ t et% PV. shah be pleased I. aîd you in tA.e lsechon of a desfrable I»mn'sen. 3MIOT SEMMMIf )RPI?êhIOii-LIPUTED) Canada Permanent Mortgago Corporation Toronto Street, Toronto raid Up Capita 0 8,000,000.00 Resrve Funil . 5,000,000.00 inveetmts . 32,204,782.81 DEPOSITS The Corporation is a LEGAL DEPOSITORY FOR TRUST FUNOS Every facility is afforded deposi- tors. Deposits may be made and withdrawn by mail with perfect convenience. Deposits of one dollar and upwards are welcomed. Interest at Three and One-H1aif Fer Cent per annum is credited and corn- pounded twice a year. DEBENTURES For sums of one hundred dollars and upwards we issuelDebentures bearing a special rate of interest, for which coupons payable haif- yearly are attached. They may be made payable in one or more years, as desired. They are a LEGAL INVESTMENT FOR TRUST FUNDS",
         "18 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Board of DlrectoU's .m. uMenrie, K.C.IL.G., Premlet À\u0026A. lr*ê. - - Vice-presIteIet",
         "I'h~t~gr~pb by Edith S. Wat,.un FOR HER SOLDIER BOY",
         "CANAPTAN NAGAZINE 'V i. L TORONTO, JANUARV, 1918 No 3 IlW S-S. IlP'-fsager, f.D ôr- h are. ca goÎng vesseleer buiit in Canad.,. bl-inm launched ,ut the Rg niicct y ard of the, Ca.,adian Vîkers Limited, Mo4ntrmal QÇ vbe £,tn 0cean fflercbatitflMrtne CANADA'S MIGHT[EST PROBLEM BY J. \\V. NORCROSS lIE estab)lishmnent of an o-ean merchant niarjije Îs the înost important dîetcquestion hefore Canada to-day, for the in eontfined prosperit 'v of thje Dominion wilI depend very 1ar-e- 193 .N upon our abiliiy to siîl oir prod- mits to the inarkets of the world. This we eatnnot do iinlessý we hav theq ships, andl it wou1d.seon that the oniy wvay we can be assurvd of t hein is to follow the exaiiipl of the United States and, build them ourselves.",
         "THE CANADIAN 'MAGAZINE The S.S. \"Orleans\", built at the planýt of the Thor Lron deadwelght capacity. Sb The people of Canada must be awakenevd to the irgency of this prob- lem, and to its vital bearing on the futuire proqperity-, and decvelopment of unir couintry. Thle extraordinary busi- neSs expansion of Canada in the past yoar or, two lias left us somewhat com- placent perhaps as to the future. But we imust remnember that this expansion bas been dlue wholly to*our participa- tion in the war on the side of the ,Allieýs, and is not a normal develop- ment. In three years' time we have becomae a lending instead of a borrow- ing nation, and our foreigu trade bal- ance sheet bas turned tremendously ini our favour. This happy condition might not have been effected in peace tirnes in twenty years. But what about the future? It is ail very well to be optimistic, but facts are facts, and we cannot overlook them. personally, I have always been a firm believer in the importance Of foreign trade to the prosperity of any country, and 1 am one of those who is firmly convinced that Canada eu de- W\\orkx, Toronto. An ocean going vessel of 4,\u003e0S ton le is nOS' in commilssion. velop her export business to enormous proportions. But I realize only too. well that such development can be possible oniy if she has the slips to carry that business. Now suppose the war were to end witli Canada having mnade no0 attempt to establish a mer- chant marine of her own 1 What would happen 1 There would be a dexuand for tonnage such as the world hiad neyer known. Freight rates might be tremendously high, and the markets off ering the best returns would get the ships. Ocean transportation in normal times is based on carrnage of cargo in both directions; that is to, say, the owner wants assurance that if he car- ries a cargo in one direction he will be able to get a return charter at an ac- cessible point, and not have to runi thousands of miles in ballast. Now, Canada 's freiglit is mostly of the bulk variety, the class carnied in peae times by the so-called tramp steamer. But an cxport trade in ravi products neyer made any nation wealthy. We must supply transportation for our",
         "MR- JOSEPH W. NORCRoSS Vi,-Pre*Îdent and Manacinc 1)irector of the Canada Steamship U.nes and Director of Ship Construction, I)fpart. aient o~f Naval Srvice. recognîzed as the. Dominons chîef authority on Maritime aftairs.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE lh, N-thern. Navigation Lïner, S.S. \"Ha ýnjcni? bilt at Collîngwood. Ont. Her gracefui tires arc a trj1bute- to, the sill ut Ortat Lakes naval architects. ma-nu fauturl1-s. \\Ve h1ave a à ertain tonnailge lîow,- but oly thflrouigli grace of theil mrtt, Thlis tonnage prob- aldY-l] ill nt be available aftler the delaatonof pec.GetBritain, thirough intes, suibmnarines, and mnar- ine i-isks,, is losing slipis faster than siie cati build themn, even with her yardis werking niglit andf day to ineet theý demand.ii( Out of a total tonnage of 501111 20 million, Great Bitain will halve lost ait leat five miillion, tons throu l- agenley* of illesbmrn aTonle by the end of the eturreint year. This will rpsetthe resit of only one, year of submnarine frightfulness, and will not take into account the losses ti thev first two and a haif years of the war,. whlen stich mîghty liners as ticlu*tai and the Arabie were sunik. Tn niiaking this statemnent, 1 arn net attemptilig te predilet what the net lmosef British tonnage wilI be when the war is finally concluded, but merely wish te show how a depleted tonnage wilI affect ('aiadiani injtereýsts, Great Britain 's foreign trade is w\\-orldj wide, and if alhe is to retai it sht will have to bend every energy toward that end, andl this in the face of the' great- est competition the world has ever wvit- nessed. In South America, for ini- stance, where before the war Great Britain and Germany lad a practical monopoly, the United States wvill be a sturdy coînpetitor, for shte lias improv- ed the past few years to splendid ef- fect in that field. This xvili îaan that to retain the trade of the southern half of this hemisphere, se important to lier merchants, Great Britain will have to divert a large portion of lier mercliant fleet to South American waters, And the saine condition will apply also te other countries, espeeially those sup- plying the raw materials for Britishi milîs, sueh as the United States and Australia. What, then, wîll be the position of Canada? There will be a certain ton-",
         "AN Ol'E.\\NN MEIII.NT Ml [RNE- nage to the 8t. Lâawnmee of ouse, buit fill the avaihlkabe freight tonnage e-Speeiialy that of the t ramp d-iilante, to car, for the' nîighy exj\u003eOrt l)lsiiess Of the D ominion he t'orteoîig ? bor orw, 1I(Io not think so. Tlhat is %liy 1 tlînk tht' Goverilaent of ('anada lias a prîol'oni d uty to es- tablisit a rit'reliant mnarinie that wrIl inake tue (Anaa fariner ami mnanu- ftrriliitleptleiiet to a degre at brust or the foreigu su ipowr for the ofrrag \u003c4is p'otlîîtts. This inei'cliait luarne, inil111 op\u003einion. shulil\u003c lat'dijt in t'aiadiiaî yalrdsý for tv have yards iii t alîadia sufflioivîîly equippedi tA imil a eoii- sidt'rablu fle'tt. This woultl iot t\u003eily mi\u003eî)y work to tHm eustîîîg yards whosqe uoîderful th'velopiînent inIfiot past two Vears lias het'ei(1e alîast whlIy to Ad îairalty rqiirîîns bu ould)11( aitiordi a iitw fElti of' eiîde vouir to the' ofaiatrr ciiiiiiii- tions, and eitiut nplynitto tW liotîiî'aiît,. of Skjlleî w ot'kms' who haive lwiteî vmi' laigM'I tw lie ii'e of that grmea w ar i itl îstry'. 'Thîe viaul iitetli ofthe (Snionlii shll liiiltiig iiitustry to-tlîî is mm ina- t erial. AI thle present t iniet ler are, nio stvel îiîils ini (Aîimda for th lieiîaîu- faiiet oir P115 Mlts lanuiels, Mr aigles,, the' reusi\u003eoi bAiig tin' total iîîabilitv of th tliiist' stt'El ,\"iiil iiltrv thor Thiiee a ttt'înpt btre plate- liiiii a t ~ nvyil li t iik'li i l eîîi î' iît l iptc's. sibet eivan pleti îl I i t iai e kt ath îîjtî'd liu Slat' l'l l e tI tIIIt partà'uîlar illill iN iclîî' \"dcl iii proîlilut. li4o evtd. al. l'el bi tiOt Nova Sectiaiis. Ilm\\ w bst al otoe bcg AitlUtry (10111d lie deo1 iî'dO. I aînl Ilio pi't'larctl to Savý, luit aliîyraoi ale ftbtai 1,1 wouild bth jsifd The **W. Grant Morden'. largest .f ail Canada' Buiic Freîghter, the quimn ni ihe Canada Steamsh;ps LÎne Fiv.t.",
         "Th, IlWar Fsh*', buuit for the Imperial Munitions Board i the yard att Port Arthur. On,,t l\u003eerhatps the most effective method would he to order a certain amnount of inateriai over a period of say ten years at a figure that would, justify a fair profit on output and render the investment in such plants absolutely safe; mevaning, in other words, that il at ert a i pl 1aniit were not required atter ten years it eouild be dîsmantled with- out financial lues to its buildera. The ui)ÎldÎng of a Canadian mer- chant mnarine is both a national and an imperial obligation, and it is one, i in - v opinion, that the Government shouldj waste no time to put into, effeet. This can best be dune by, the estab- lishmenýjt, of aj commnission aiong the junes, of the National Sh'ilppiuÎg Board of the Ujnited States, which should be emnpowered to consider the mer- c-hant marine question iii ail its phases, to con4truet or purchaseshipe, and to, do anything else that promised to, re- habilitate the Once important oeean marine ofCanada. TheShipsconstruct- ed should bej buit on a programmire that promnisved continuous activity to existing Canadilan yards for at least ten yearg. and the fleet established, 198 N whether by purchase or constructionî, should be capable of carrying at least sixty per cent. of the foreigu trade requirements of the cuuntry, which is the percentage of British trade carried by British ships before the war, Until the deciaration of peace these ships should be operated under gov- ernment control, when they shouid be sold to private interests at prices de- term:ued as equable to ail concerned. For public operation of ocean carriers has neyer proved practicable, and neyer wili. The reasons for this are seifevident. Successful ship opera- tion lies pretty mucli with the person- nel of the company uperating. Private enterprise wiil always reward talent, and talent will go aiways where its qervices wiil be muet reeognized, ex- cept, of course, in times like the pres- ent, when' many of the biggest men in the various countries at war are lending their services tu, the publie at great personal sacrifice. But in ordin- ary times big brames cannot be tempt- ed by the inoderate salaries that are paid to goverument officiais. And the government uf nu cuuntry can pay",
         "The , 1 %Var taking the wate, The 'J .G. Mlaggarty-. of the Can~ada Steamnship Lie hîg Freight Ficet, on the, ways of the Collingwood Shîp- building Company. She im an example ot a modern bulk freighter. She wamlae.nceiien 1914.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE siiipbuildi i gr activity at the Collingw, Oo .%ard. large salaries, as the people would not tolerate sueh a policy for an instant. Goveriiniwnt operationis of ary vcharac- ter. alway* s deter pr1ivateý eniterprise, as timesv oprtin an b(e carricd o11 at at loss-anothor rvasori whyv the mari- t1ime nat11ins have always preferred to encorageprivte eterpie y pref- erenceI or, 'tdsyinsteaid of entering 0hw fitld Mi their, ow'n behiaif. Wh *% shiould thie siprs for the pro- posed ('anadiani inercehant marine be 1,u11t b)Y the Govvrnmient, when the cond)(itionis for, sipihlilng at present ï1re so faorbe will be, nlo doubt, a qîîe4ýion that wviIl mour to the lay- miai whio is uîiniformewd as to the act- uial onrditions. To unesadthe reason for this me inust rememiber that the siuidrand the ship operator areeîtirlydifferent people, just as ds incii fact, as the builder of rail- way equipment and the operator of r-aiiways. The intrinsie value of a ship ii not the value of the element% that have entered into lier construc- tion, but is governed wholly by the earlings she iakes on the investmelit. These are abuiorînai;l tiiries, an(1 eall for eînergency mnsutros. Thus sh ip coni- struction at presclit higli rates, even though the prevailing lîgh freighit rates might seîni to justify it, is iii a sense speeulative. It is impossible to prediet for how long the charges on oeeaii freighit wvill remnain lîigh after the war, but it is seif-evident that even if there is not a sudden break ini the maarket after the declaration of peace, there wiIi be a gradutai deeline to pre- war levels, particuiarly if the struggle is prolonged to a date that will Nvit- ness the consuîiination of the ship- building programme of the allied gov- ernments and of neutral nations, such,. for instance, ast Norway, which last year expended nearly $200,00,000 in new tonnage and this year ha% an eveil more extensive programme. Thuit it is miot fair to, expeet private builders to take sueli a great chance, especially considering the shortage of labour and material. Certainly, the Cariadian owner is ini no position to",
         "AN OCEAN MERCIJANT MARINE tiniamee ShiPs without soute guarantee, as lie lias neither the aaoney nor the eataiblislied business to inake sueli ant Lundertakiîg feasible. A ('anadian îîiereliaît marine, luijît and operated with governmreîit assist- ance,, while 1iuaiarily serviîig Canada, wvould be frue to trade iii any part of the world, thuis adding to the~ wealth of t1ie Dominion by dirawitg tapou the resoureies of other lands. Thisj fleet would in addition, of ('oursiieras tuev material prosperity orfi, thvomitry hy% findimg ready anud profitable iiiiir kets f'or Calnadiani pro(luets and in.- po(rtlig the rim' inaterials lieeded by tu maaaufiiituriîig inustries as well avýistes-ele liaxurîes tîtat eoiutrîi- uitc s0 itli to muake life wtorth liv- ing, A iluerehalit miar-ilie so developed wvould aflforll Canadiaii exporters a de- eidud advaýintage in) rates, ais take the CaLSe of' Japaîî, wluili bsdsretaining ili its coastal privileges for the heuefit of its owui illreanltilu mineiîl, is the sevondî nation il] the' flatter. oft marnnef suibsidiza,;tioli. Evl îl iee iigh freighit raes apnt prs 11ave a 50 per et.reten ove, I long- k-ong, ShanIlghii ilnd MaN;ilai. It i1S said, id(itateas of\u003e national ssidîýilzationI tuev lar'I its of, Japan ar ejyîg r-wni ats while the lhilippiue INIanîls and (lmu are pay- iîîg m110le thanl 1001 îa'wiîm over the Atiotil(er vitaliv iinpo)ît.11 realson for tueetalsmneu of, a ueeh munine1lt, illd ole aiair)togehe frolia eoiueril o iaaroevi, iloties, is the ereatilion of, a trainellui iiato tîpoua w-hiil ('alida uan dr1aw 'for the. proutlof'th Ilaw il1. luull, sooi ort late, site is boumi to Iposse.s. rile nalost for tliait niiiatte a irî'hanî unariate, is tu funuriishtli le uiesav onlmu of oflivers ;1114 llnea, Ilu fis regard G reat Biltin lis beeni « vtelal fortunatle, but lier groo l fortunle eaui be( ailt rdmuted solIly t i M a~eria Jgoifing 1a Great Lakes vesse3 at the Davie Sh'Pb.uilding CoImpas\u003e s plart, at Lauxmon Les, Qe",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE A part of Canada,ý fine iniand waterways fleet, wlikh ,shouId be supplemented by an ocean marine. Po4-i'y of interconnecting the two ser- vice1s. Thuts iu the present war we find that the fighting forces have had to draw výer *y largely on the Naval Re- serve of the mnercantile fleets, and to the uindying glory of the latter it can lie saidl that they have acquitted them- selves with the spirit and sacrifice that are the traditions of the service. Buit the creation of an organization in Canada witl bie more difficuit than in Great Britain, where seafaring is the recognized avocation for families whose forbears have followed it for centuiries. It lias been the experience of every nation that the greatest dif- ficulty ' i establishing a merchant marine is to make the life sufflliently attractive to înduce the youth of the nation to foilow it as a profession. Go- ing to sea means giving up ail the pleasures and comforts of home, and to offset the loss of these the boy muet be promised eompensating advantages. This condition is especially true of Canada, where the standard of liv- ing is very mucli higher than in any of the Old World countries and where the social distinctions are less defined. Such a plan lias been adopted on the Great Lakes, with the resuit that at the present time nearly ail the officers are Canadian born, where only a few years ago the large majority were foreign. Viewed from whatever angle pos- sible, the importance of a merehant marine to the development of a nation cannot be ovcrestimated. The war lias shown that no eountry can afford to depend on foreign carriers for theý safety of its extraneous trade. Thou- sands of years of peace have proved heyond a doubt that the nations mak- ing the greatest development commer- ciàily have been those that have de-. veloped their mercantile interesta. Cobden, the great English economîst,",
         "AN O('EAN MERUILANT MARINE onee said. - 1 shall begin to have hopes for Turkey when I find Turkish ships, buit in Turkish dockyards, munned by Turkish seainen, navigated by Turkishi offilers, and laden with Turkish cargues, sailing out of Turk- ish ports.\" lu these days we do nlot likeo to point to Gcrmany as an ex- ample, for anything. But ne thinking persoîî vani overlouk Germany 's won- degrfuil record of commercial growth iii the 2\u003e5 years before the war. LIn 1890 three-fifths of ail Germnany 's inercan- tuef tonnage was buit in Gireat Brit- ain. Ten yvears later, through a far- sighltoed« poliey of benevolent eonsidera- tion, the German yards were con- strueting aIl the tonnage required 1\u003e3 Germaui own rers and catering to for- eign wuinssa well. Ili the saine decade, too, liritish shiI)pinge throuigh the Suez ('anal deereased front nine, million to sev'en million tons, whule thaýt of Glermnany grew froan une mnd a haîf to it least t xwo mil lion tons. Before the war it wvas gcneralv rei- ognizcd that se» power would bet tho eliief eotitriuting factor to vietor. , Thait is why both Britain and Gierl- mnatn were w'orking su feverishly on thear naval equipumenrt. But it w;,as rrOln the fightîng ships thlait victory' wais ux- pected, imot the humilble inerehlanfillan. And yet it is the peýaivefufl cargo var- rier that is Phai vig the suprenie part iii the trglgiving ail (]lc ert-dit to the inagnitieviat tighltingl ships fttý on constanut vigil are fiolding t1e en- emy at bay. In th \\air afier the vair, 80cailled, the nwcîn magini wiIl have to lead t1w van, andl iii îny opinion the on11Y 'ouintries fliait wil have anl evei ehiim0ý wiIl be t ho.se who have tht' ships tu sund oit on theu tradle routes of tht' world. Theestblih mentof, a ('amunaia occam uint marine is ai national The facilities at Montrel for Expert are unsurpaýse'i.",
         "Caiuaba aîib tbe t1nitcb %tates A HOPEFUL REVIEW 0F PAST AND PRESENT RELATICNS BY A. H. U. COL9UHOUJN DEPUTY MINISTER OF EDUCATION FOR ONTARIO Y ftie relations of Canada aiid thle United States bie- coute more cordial in fu- tur-e, as they well may, thie change must rest on a rautual understanding clearer thanii ain thiat lias yct existed. Sincve tlie Peace: of 1814 the two couni- tries hiavu bwee oni fairly .4atisfactory terînis, Trhere have beeni disputes- oro themii avrîmnnnirîs and danger- ouis--but nio bitter or lasting aniniosi- tics. A simaîl voniirnunity situated hoe- ido a lgeOî,cher-ishes its riglifs with xeedn jealouisy. It is the privile'go of powe-r to be generous, the nesiyof' t w%eakor te lie vigilant. Thev social friciidsliip between fthc fwo peoplus lias for iiiany years licou sin- eclre, Mid utstrd.Proliably no two niatioiis liave (evvr tuaintained sueh cl1ose îwersoial relationis as have thie 1-iitedl statos anid Caniada without a politival colsec.But of this fliere is lot thei slighitvst sigu; in faef, po- litWialv. thev to miations are farther apart thani fhiey have been in the mem- ory of' ainy personi now living. The difcrocosbetwen the two Govern- îtwit ystinsaceuntfor the po- litica oleavge. Bt the political ca- vagecainiiii dlocs exisf ani grow aogiea great anid growing person- al recognition\u003c of each othor 's worth, and ,-Ihat, little estrangemnict yet re- mnaÎis, so think the moen of the north- )?04 orn zone, is duo in large moasure to erroneous views of their own history bred in the boue of the people of the United Stafes. \"Anyfhing but history,\" deelared Walpole, \"because history must be false,\" and there is no denying that from early times the youth of the Ujnited Stafes were inspired by stories of the nation 's foundation and devel- opmnent whieli wore based on whiat could bie very mildly deseribed as a tissue of doliborato tnisinformafion. Possibly the reason for the absence of truth in flie writings of the early Americatî historians was that at thle times in which fhey wrotc somte dissatisfaetion and disunion prevail- cd, and conseqiientlyv if was tîccessary f0 stiffen flic baeks of the people, The conduct of Great Brifain, both ini the Revolutionary War, and in fthe war of 1812, was unduly eensuPed, and lier military achievoments werc ludierous- ly beliftlcd. On the other hand, the achievements of tlie Americans during the saine period were lauded fo a de- grec whicli could only, sooner or later, liring about an inevitablo reaction. This reaction lias boon a long t ime in coming, but if is undoubfedly here. Seholarship and talent are now apply. ing ftle scientiflo method f0 the facfs of United States history, and thie old storios whicli lent fuel to the lire of so many orat ions and cnthusiasm to sev-",
         "('ANAD\u003eA AND THlE L'NITED STATES' eral geuei(ratioîîs of buddiîxg î\u003eatrÎots are Ihqînlg nii\u003c\u003eified before our evýe8. The truth began to be told long ago about the Loyalists. Writers like Tay'- lor-, \\'air Tynxe, Friek, and Fiske se.t forth the other side of the' caise, and the authors of \"The Truc Story of the American Revolution\" aîid \"-My.ths and Facts of the Ainericaxi Revolution\" laid bart' records wlicl riuit have provided straixge reading for those wlio were reared uipon the' inaccuiracies of the' Bancroft seliool. To tht' eredit of inany mode'rn Alfieri- car writers of history they beleve iu the liorieet uise of inaterials a nd ignore the Entgrli Whig tradition that the' Mother Country was alwvays in the' wrong. It is o tlic history writtfen by passion and prejudice that the faînouis jle ictum of ýSir Robert Walpole applies. Th ie Great War has brouglit tht' unitod Staites face to face with reali- fies, and] amonig the, duties of the' erisis le to se hiow thîe past bears upjon the' prescrit. Thîe language of Seixator Chamberilain t September i 2th, 1917), in repIorting advcrsely front thc Coni mnittee of Military AiTairs a bill whîich eliallenged the riglît of tire United States to) raise au arîny by ricans of (vom1pulsoryv service anîd to send ît to figlit in Europe, marks the' chiange of view. l'he report states: -There is ai renso\u003eýn why the casual studecnt of ouI' military history has net grasped the inhere nt weakness of the mili- tia or voluntefier syNstPr'm in the wars which have b)een wediii the United States. For the most part the' histories whieh have aIways been, used1 aR text-books in the schools have d1welt at length open the \u003epIenadid valejur and the patriotismu of the volunteers, maiýking ne distinction between the individilal and the systemn which col- lect ively he gees te make op. The Fourth of July orator and, the demnagegue alike diseus the indivÎd'ual and net the system. ,If sýouiis better and appeals te the pride etf the average American audience te be tola of the valeur of their ancestors. But you wlll remeinher the sterrm ef protest that Anîs raisedI in the last canipaign when a distingu1ishedI cabinet efficer dnred tell a part of the truth about the militin muan of the Revolution. Yet truc it is that but for the tirnely aid of Front(, and the mulitarv instruction cf Von Steuben anid others, Ît ls as certain as \u003c'an be that the Re% olution ef 1776 weuld have resulti.'d disastroU\u003ely for the Coloies)' The' candotir of utteranees like( this wiII flot bc without, effect. Tl' Amern oý i- ean lias mueh te correct andl to fin- learn. Hit n5fot flic practica,,l and sagaclous manî th(e world bel ie(vus lîii to be if lie tolvrates thev vontinuan\u003c'u. ln sehool text-books of (-eggeratgd statemexits whceh hill hlmt iîîto fakwo security at home arid r\u003c'ndr hl ridiculouns abroad. The genrerouis tri- butes to Canada arid tht' Cariadiant Armîy which have appeared in Ameni- eau books, periodials and newspapers duririg thc war botoken a better coin- preliensioxi ot Cnadian NNorith and of our lîride in the British Enipiro. Aud( àt is a sigificant testiinony. to th(, broadriess of the, view of former Amnician îîilaatîse ow taken in aIl parts of tuie Emipire that ffew cducazted persons eauti imatgine( any other ending to tlt' RevoluIition than t1uai w hlid e tul 11011;r11l anîd \\\\mlld îlot have boeli ierhaps more di~l~twxfor Great 1tritaju blian for That American tcxt -books are' re- sponsible for nmuch of the' misuuider. standing that stili existe is a subject which lias been carefully examimmed. A New York busin ess maixii, t rucl(,k by tht' enthusiasmn for France lu fie United States; and the absence of it for Great trîtain tburiîxg t hile war, hîag writtemî a book cnîtbodying the' resuits of a seies of most paiustaking rescarc-hes,' into what American sehool text-books have beemi teachiug for the' Iast twenty years. Professer Shotwell of Column- bia, who furnishes an introduction to the book, deelares that the' texts mott iu use exhibit a \"very limited knowl- edge of tht' actual tacts*. Thiere- has, accordingly, been a distortion lu pers- îwetivc. Anfeiut uurtezdtraditions~ have heetipreute Ren books show a marked improvement, buit thev havoecorne too late to affect ilit- gemiera- *The American Revolution in Our \u0026hbool Tex\u003ct-books. By Charles Altschul. NXew Yor: Dran and C'ompany.",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE tion which has to mou)d policy and fighit the war. Ninety-three text-books were examiined and the author finds in themt -an ineompletenees that makeg for siuperficiality and prejudice, and that is responsible for an impression that, is inaccurate, however correct the staitoeent of narrow fact may be\". The diffieiulty is one experienced in every dlaY lne: to eonvey the right impression where the narrative is arde.The origin of the Repub1ic nteceasarily creates some bias in the Amnerican mind and those who write the hiistory of the separation between thie Mother Country and hier Amenî- can colonies need not fail in patriot- ism ecus they see ail the facts in a truc p)erspective. When the leading mninds of the Republie realîze that a broader, more sympathetie treatment of a great theme la required in the in- tere.sts of truth as well as of the United States itself the reformn will eomie. No foreigu protest eau avail. If England and France had been fed for generations on narrow views of their centuries-long historie struggles they could flot he allies in the present war. Ani example of histonical writing hich ay be verbally right, but ia\u003e' yet produce a wrong impression, is a reoent treatise by Major John Bigelowv. The author frankl\u003e' sets out to dlefeud his country agait intem- perate attackS in certain English newspapers, charging the United States with persîstent\u003e' vîolatiug trea- ties, beginning with the Treat\u003e' of Peacýe in 1783. The tone of the work is historical. It would not be easy to, place the flnger upon a wilful mis- statement. One example will serve for illustration. The treat\u003e' of 1783 pro- miised that Cozugress should recoin- miend to, the several States the pro- tection of the Loyalists as to, their per- sons and propert\u003e'. This Congreas did, but ail the world knows how erueilly the Loyalists were treated. Major Bigelow argues that as Congress fui- filled the letter of its engagement this article of the Treat\u003e' was flot vÎolated b\u003e' the UJnited States. Great Britain, hie argues, did violate the treat\u003e' be- cause she retaincd possession of the western posts, such as Niagara and Detroit. Sucli a technical view has not, however, dictated the verdict of posterit\u003e. Nor did it avail at the tîime if we accept the testimon\u003e' of a witness not usuailly regarded as hostile to the United States. George Washington wrote to a member of Congress: ''It was impolitie and unfortunate, if flot unjust, in those States to pues laws which by fair construction might be cou- sidered as infractions of the Treaty of Peace. H-ad we observed good, faith anud tho western pos.te had been withheld from us by Great Britain we might bavea tp- pealed to God and main for ju»tce.\" The reference to treaties, or parts of treaties, affecting Canada is incom-. plete and thus in striking a sort of balance sheet of mone\u003e' caimis paid by one country to the other the author deprives himself of the advantage ef the $5,500,000 awarded b\u003e' the H1alifax Commission for illegal fishing. The author, one does not doubt, desires te be fair. But his general conclusioni, or summing up, that both countriea have violated several treaties and that the United States \"has more than a safe balance of good faith to, its cred- it\" is not likel\u003e' to pass unchallenged. I t rnay be excellent special pleading, but it is not history and does not get us a step forward on the road to a better undcrstanding. There 15 no reason why the gooê feeling of Canada for the United States should not be stimulated b\u003e' the war, and the sovereign remedy for in- ternational bîekering la respect for each othcr\u003es rights and absolute fair dealîng. Sentiment, without these, will not help much. Time has removecà the chîef causes of ancient controe,.. sies. The future promises fair. A~ feud betweeu London and Washington with Canada as the battleground has become unthinkable. The old boun- dary disputes, whieh MIl the dreary pages of man\u003e' state papers, should -Breaches of Anglo-Amerieanf Treaties. By John Bigelow. New York: Sturgisand Walton Goin.pany.",
         "CANADA AND TUE UNITEJD STATES trouible uis no more since we know al- rnost toj an ineh the limits of our terri- tories. The Fishieries Question, which prv dseveýralI generations of diplo. rnati~tswit poblemsofvarious kiîds, is practically settled. The extradition Iawsi provide for the easy translation of mriscreants who cross t.he boundary in the wrong direction. The bonding privilege-, once termed a concession that miightl be suddenly withdrawn, is seen to be rich ini mutual advantage. International agreemcnts have grown into a mr matter of officiai routine, and eceare can arrange in a di y what Ministers of State vainly fougI t for during weekis of discussion and correspondence. A new era, in short, ha,; dawnced. But it is not the, millen- ninmri, and as each age brings its own apec(iail problemns and dlothies us with fresh responsibilities the opplortunit ies for misuinderstandinigs and for ill-feul- ing mnay present thlemlselvese unider an- other guise, War on a vast scýale, how- ever, hias produced at leas9t one per- manent good. It lias enlightened the people of the Republie as to the mar- tial quality of their Canadian neigh- boums and it bias reminded Canadian. that fate a.nd- fortune have placed them forever alongside one of the rceatest powe-ýrs of the world. Sincc thercgii wais written, there cornes thce aninoutncernent that the National ]Board of Ilistoric Ser- viee luas been f'ornied. This, is al vol- untary bloil'y and its nieinbership) in- cludes somle of the be4ý, known Ilis- torical wvritcrs, andl professors of bis- tory in thle Uitcid States. The bioard lias rceived etrsfromi teachers of history wliolh show that lits work isi eut out for it. An Ohio professor wrote: \"There are mnany« intelligent people of this conunity- whio seem to, have, onily a vaguieudrsni2 of our purpolse inii e war. The feel- ig, that it is a war to defeond our prýo- pe'rty rightsý whichi have bleen inivaded by Grcht 1Britain as -well as by GJer- mnanyv is rather coinion and vaI1s for a campal)ýignl of educat ion\"' A Ken- turky p 1rofessor declared: \"There is difflluty' in imaking the pe'ople s\"s that England's offence is flot about equail to that of Germny . I dlaresay that the spirit o, the Amierican -Revo- lution bas renia aied in this inlounltaîi reion longer ti' 3n iii somne sections.\u003e",
         "M~lbý DO zbeq Ieane Us? BY THE HONOURABLE CHARLES LANGELIER N the November issue of T'he Canadian, Magazine there is an article by Mr. H. O. Hocken which is a libel on the Prov- ince of Quebec. Mr. Heecken falsifies history, in erder that ho may represent Quebec ini the worst colours. I propose te establiali the facts as they are in the liglit of history by in- voklng the testimony not of a Frenchi Canadian historian, but of an Eng- lishman, Mr. Frank Basil Tracy, the author of a remarkable work, \"The Tercentenary of Canada\". Mr. Hlocken begins by recalling the Bebellion of 1837. He affirms that it was produced becanse the French Canadians, giuided by Papineau and encouraged by Catholie clergy, wish- ed te \"shako off the yoke of Great Bri- tain\" and establiali a republie. Now, those who are a littie acquainted with eur history know wbat were the causes of that rebellion. There then existedl intelerable abuses: the publie lands, the mines, the revenues of the coun- try, ail was the property of the Em- pire, whieh disposed of it at its dis- cretion, semetimes te pay the debts of a tee predigal duke, semetimes te cerne to the help o! a needy baronet. Treaties were made that were dismem- bering the provinces and endanger- ing their future witheut consulting the people. Measures o! the highest importance for the internaI econeiny of the provinces were systematiesdly ignored. Those whe emplained. 208 against certain officers of the Croi, were not listened to, or if they wel sornetimes heard, their coiuplain were unavailing, as the Ministers wel not responsible. They held their a] pointment fromn the Crown and ti people, with whose interests they wel entrusted, were neyer consulted. Such a state o! ai! airs could n last. Men of courage and brave hear rose up against such a revolting 87 tem; Howe ini Nova Scotia, Wihnet i New Brunswick, Baldwin ini lppf Canada, Papineau in Lower -Canad fouglit vigorously. They demande that the people be given the contr, of lecal revenues; that the people hia, the riglit te appoint offleers; in. word, they wished te have respensib Ministers t» administer the affairs the country. That was theîr crime!1 The wind et reform was blowiu over the world at that tixue. TI Revolution in France placed Loi, Philippe on the throne; the Belgiai were striving to gain their indepeni ence; Peland rose up against i' tyrants; Italy was in the midst civil war; England was abolialibi slavery iu lier colonies, and repeaihi the Corn Laws. Ail the great mov, ments o! emancipation and liberi were felt amongst us. But do net forget that the flebe lion o! 1837 did not take place mil ini Quebec; it took place aise in TT per Canada, where it was champione by William Lyon Mackenzie; a~nd i our Province ît was upheld by ti",
         "WIIY DO TIIBY DEFAME US? twe elsnswho were the lieutenante ofPaieu As long as the latter confined him- self *to a constitutional agitation, hoe re-cived the aid of the Catholie clergy, whio abandoncd, him as soon as hie preaehedl revoit. This is what I find written in black and white in Mr. Traey's history, Vol. 3, p. 810, FIe wus assisted by WVolfred( Nelsn, a EnlishIman, Who out P'apineau- edPapineau in H98 attack on the British authritis. Y this titan the Romlan ''aithocliçe Chiirch 's inaetivlty cased, and it begain to e-xercite its strong influence againmt s9editiozi. This only infuriated lPapinecui the mors, and he defled the vihurch nadi( led mnany of the people with hili. \" The saine historian in the saine vol- urne, at page 804, in speaking of the miovemepnt preeoinized by Papineau, says further: i'Thiri vas itiqt one agency that rould have stoped ni thiis nonsense and put an end to pli theseý fond direams of independ- ere. That %vas the Catholie Churchi. That Church bcdl showni itelf in criais in the higtory of Caniada under England to be loyl nd wvise in a crisIs. So much te its er edit. \" Anid if is in the face of such facts conisigned te impartial history that Mr. ileeken dares te afflrmn that the Cathoelie clergy made common cause with Papineau te \"shako off the yoke of Great Býritain\"! On the contrary, whenever the in- terests of England were in peril iii our country, thic Catholic clergy rais- ed its voice te preach fldelity tel the King of England. Thus, at the time of the American invasion of Canada, 1813, the clergy preached loyalty. It is again the historian Tracy who will turnish us with the proof iii the sec- ond volume of his histery, at page 597: -Thes attitude of the Roman Catholie BiEbop Briand iindoubtedly did much te hold Ulie hab)itants to some sort of loyalty or at least aeutrality during the struggle. Ire bad iqsued at Mandement Carling atten- tion te thle excellent governelit whieh the Engli,qh Jtad given the habitants, the lib- eralitY witlx whieh the praetiea of the Ro- imai, Catholie religioni wa$ perniitted, and( thoîr own participajion ingvrmct n hie bcsoughit theni te jin hi Urici(, andmp to ropel thîe enemyl.\"1ji nteatnp Later, in 1807. When serious trouble threatencd following the collision bie- tween the ships Chesapeake and Leo- pard, Administrator Dunn ordcred the railitia te hold itself in reainea)vs. What did the Catholie clergy dIo thent It is the histerian Tracy who spcaks, Vol. 2, p. 689:ý \"Tile adinistrator, Duna, orderedl tho miilitiat to ho hlvd in reaidincaqs and] the Roman athol jýihop ssc a mnd(e- menlt whleh was foîll of loyvalty' and pat- rintie injunctiolna te thec habitaatlf4' It is net necessary to go se far baek to prove the leyaltY of the ('atholir clergy, In the dairk heurs through, wh Iich we aire pnssing, Hlis Einrence Cardinal Béýgini, the Pr imate ef thie Church of Canada,' has pubillishied an admirable pastoral letter, in which hie recommends Cthlolies, te do thieir duty by taking part in thec war. Besidvs that, has ho net donc ail in li s powcr te help the lied Cross? Very recent- ly, whilst passing through Hlalifax, did hoe net make a fine appeal in favour ef this work? Must one need recail te Mr. Roc-. ken that they were bis brother Orangeinen who, burned the Parla. ment Buildings in Montreal on the 25th ef April, 1849, and assailed the Governor-Genera4, Lord Elgini, wvith atones and rotten eggzs, w-hen hie was getting inte hMa carnaige after having sanctioned the Indlemnity Bill in faveur of the victims of the trouble of 1837-38? Must one recaîl te, him alse that those who were guilty ef these excesses; were recruited amonng the elite of the Enýjglish socîe ty ef Mentreal? Ail the English clubs, te whieh Lord Elgin belonged -truck off hia naine; the St. Andrew's Sn(oity pushed impropriety se far as te ne- turn the ameunt ef his subseription. These saine people began an agitation in faveur o! annexation with the United States.",
         "THE CANAIDIAN MAGAZINE According te Mfr. Ileeken the vie- tory won by de Salaberry in 1873 signifles nothing; he looks upen it onlyv as a \"skirinishi\" without any im- portance. Nevertheless, de Salaberiy repelled the invasion of 5,000 Ameni- cane, coin manded by iHamipten. 13y a sicilful ni n(puvre, de Salaberry, whe had only 300 seldiers under his cern- niand, succeededl in putting hin te fliiht amd saved the situation. Here is hew the isitorian Tracy, in Vel. 2, p. 730, appreciates the event: 1Tiie credit for tusi- victory was eaxn ed by NPrevogt imiself, althiough he had notl'ng, In do with it, aud be so belittled theo aieiverneatm of the men who really did hrilig it to pase that if was flot for sjoin yearq that the true tacts were givexi aud the real litroea of the affair, de Sala- be(rryv and Mef(Doinueil, reeceived their re- wardl. De Sala1ery 's part in the battie is e-sjevvlally worth notingr, for it was the lin t virtory won by the French Canadians for tic, l3ritisýi flag. It was a humiliatlug expeýrience for the Americaus Wo be trielr ed 1bv any opposition force, aud esrw dlly' te be beaten snd Wo be compellCd to re- treat by a force murh inferior.\"e Aeeording te 'Mr. Hocren, 'One aheuld judge of the success of a hattie bhy the nuinber of dead and net by the resits produced by it. le treats de Salaberry\u003es victery with diedain becausýe only fi!ty dead were found unpon the hattlefid. Yet histery brings te us across the centuries the fanions exploit of the Thermopyles ' wliere three hundred Spartans cheeked the advance of the. formidable arxny Of Xerxes! It tells us aise e! the cele- brated battie e! the. Horaces and Cuiriacres, which determlned the su- premacy of Renie over the city of Aiba. It was by the means o! a manouvre-MlNr. Heeken may eall it a siirxish-that the lat ef the Horaces, fleeing, drew after hlmn the Curiaces whio were following hlm, and, turning suddely, bie killed thern one after the other, thus assuring tihe triumph et ]Ronie. There only remained five dead on the field o! battle and notwith- standing this smail number, history dees well by conimemerati the bat- tic ! Hr. Hocken says further:- \"The French people inI Canada, led by their priests, have taken advantage ef every ciais iu the aif airs of thlis groiutry to wrest special priviloges front the im: peril Government and the Canadian Par- liament.\"1 I have shown already the fallacy of this stupid accusation by proving in the light of history that every timie British interests were threatened in Canada the Catholie elergy intervened te preach Ioyalty to the French Cana- dians who would listen to their voice. After the cession of the country ta England we obtained the retention of our religion and our language. As our fathers had been the first civilized set. tiers in this country, as they had car- ried everywhere the torch of civiliza- tion, it was only ttea evetm the rights and privileges that are dear. est to a proud people. This is wha.t the British authorities understood. Mr. Hoeken pretends that we have profited by the present war to em- phasize Our dlaims te teach the French language which they are trying ta strangle ini Ontario. The fact is that an important group \u0026' our country-. men bas asked that an end be put ta our intestinal divisions here as Franse and England have donc in Europe in order te unitc against the Germns. We only asked for our eempatriots in Ontarie the sanie rights and privileges which we grant te Protestants ini Que. bec. Many right-thinking Eng1ish. men in the sister Province feund the request just; but the Orangemen, dear te Mr. Hoeken, furiously opposed any idea of conciliation. Here as in Eng- land they are and will remain a brand of diseord, a permanent menace ta public tranquillity. Mr. Flocken setties the question per. emptOrily: \" ýThese elerleal leaders know tbat thil claims for the use of French iii the puie sehools of Ontario have ne sanction oi support in the. British North Ainerles Act. \" The thing le net se elear, as we ar going te see.",
         "WIlY DO THEY DEFAME US? In th mi ionth of August, 1866, there wsa question of the enactment of an Education B ill, which had for its ob- jcct the protection of the Protestant miniority in Lower Canada. Sir John .Macdonald opposed it and made the following imporant declaration: \"The dispositions of this bill form a part of the guarantees whicli are fore- seen by the Act of Confederation, and ail the laws on this subjeet in force wheiu C'onfederation will bie accom- plished can no longer thereafier bc modified; otherwise every group (sec- tion) wvould b, exposed to suifer qriev- ances for the redress of which there would not be any remedy.\"-(J. IL. Gray, \"Cor federation of Canada\", vol. 1, p. 366). in thec scheme of the Federal Act as originally drawn, clause 93, which provides for the maintenance of separate schools in ecd Province, did flot exist; it was added in London while the scheme of the Act was be- ing discussed. This clause 93 is very elear. Lt Teads as follows: -ir aind for vachi Province tha Legisla- turewillhav excusie power te miake ia~rviatng to education, 5subject to the tollow)ýiig provi4ions: -,1. Nothing in such a law shail preju- iilally' affect AMY right or privilege re- gairding tieparite ichoolg that any clana of pvrmonq possessed in a Province at the time of thie uinion.\" We find in this text of the law the thouight which was expressed by Sir John maedonald, namnely, that after Coef ederation was established the laws8 concerning education which ex- isted at that time could flot thereafter be modified. Now, what were the rights of the Catholie minority in Ontario? Did it have its separate aehools? Was French tauglit in thei Prom 1763 to 1841, that is te say, for three-quarters of a century, the French Canadians had full freedom, te, erganize and dîreet their primr schools. In 1753, Abbés Hlubert- who later became Bishop of Quebe-- and Pothier taught French classes in Essex to the Canadian descendants of La Mothe-Cadillac, the foiider of Detroit. As fax' bock as 1793 Frenchi was reeognized as an officiar language in the Parlianient of Ontario. The Act of Union conisecrated for the miii- orities of the two Provinces of Que- bec and Ontario the principle of the public separate school. ln 1857 there were Frenchl se-hools in the couinties of Kent and Essex. The 3Oth of May, 1855, the principle of separate schools received its royal sanction ini a law caled Th TahéAc'.I n 1863, at the instigaitioni of thie Iloxuourable R. W. Scott, that organie law, \"'whose prin- cipal object,\" lie said, \"was te give Wo Catholie parents the riglit to instruot their didren aocording 10 their owNn vîews\", vâs again anended and psa id by Parliament. Lt finally received îts definite consecration in 1867 in articles 93 and 133 of the Britishi North America Act. Thiese solein guarantees are at this moment ignored Wo the detrinient of our compatriots of Ontario, whilst we respect thenu in thc Provincre of Qule- bec Wo the profit of Protestants. Lu speaking on thlis subjeet before the Canadian Club at Quelice, tic Ilonour- able Mr. Justice McCorkill, whose breadth of view iswcll. known, said, in addressing hiniself te Sir biorner Gouiu: \"If you did the saine thing Wo the Protestants of this P1rovince there would lie a revoluition.\" The fanious regulation 17 is siuuply the proscription of the French lan- puage lu the sehools. The thing cau hardly lie believed, but it la, neyer- theless, true - the teaching of Germ is more favoured lu the schools than la French 1 This crying injustice did flot pro. vent French Canadianis froin en- listing and doing their duty. If re. cruiting did net mucceed well in thua Province it in beause recruiting of- iCerS, Were Sent into the ceuntry places who could flot speak a word of Frenchi, inste-ad of entrustig witk this duty men lika General Leard and Lîeutenant..ColozW Pelletier, two",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE efficers who pesseas the confidence of their coxupatriets. Moreover, in xaany cases our mcie deserted because their pay was stolon and their fainilies were etarving. But there is a fnrther reason- as I ain wrîting these lines I sec ini The Hlerald of the 5th Novemiber that the nev Miniister of Mýilitia imiself, at a meieting bield in Ilailton\u003c, ias, con- dfemned the mnanner iii which the Gev- ernmrent ca,,rriedl on recruiing. He critivized the former policy. \"I feit thien,\" said Genieral Mew- burn, '\u003catid I feel 110W that there were grave istqakes in our reeruiting sys- temn. The splendid old regiments that hiad been the backbone of recruiing had not. been allowved te keep their identity. Battalions had been sent eut and split uip inito drafts. The re- suit was theusands of surplus offleers.\"* 1t is previselY ini regard te this mnethiod that Frencli Canadians coin- plainied. By thuis spliting up the battaliens, to spreadl themn among other units, all enithi,îasma and ambi- tien were thereby taken away. There was only the 22nd whieh sueceeded in maintaining ils unity, thanks to the energetie and intelligent intervention ef Major Asei.We have aise seen how it distinguished itseif and brouglit bioueur te its race. Hlere, then, is the explanation of theý littie suecess ef rccruiting among us. Notwvitlistaûndîng their opposition te the law ef conscription, we note that Frenchi Canadians are submitting te the law. This is what Tke Chronicle (Quebee) said in itis issue ef the 3rd Noveniber: \"Tite rptturns fromn Queb)ec city yester- das'y showed a suirprlsing increase in total registrations. Tho pereentage of Qnlebec city registrations in respect of available populiation bias hitherto been low. Recent rettirrs haive incrensed Qiiebee 's percent- age Ro mnuch that t'e cit 'y now stands well up in tlxe list. The mninimulm percentage of inlcrease in Çupbec yesterday was bigh- er than in any district except Kingston.\" TI's intote bad for the maost French eity in Canada! Another serious grievance diseev- ered by Mr. Hoeken is that French Canadians take the liberty ef going to live in Ontario. Hie secs in1 this tact a diabolical plot on the part of the Jesuits who would thus try te in- vade Ontarie, a sister Province. Dees he forget that the first men who -put foot on that soil were French? W hen the English came later, the former did net dreamn of resenting the intrusion. Aecording te Mr. iloeken, the Freceh Canadians should not be allowed te croSs the Ottawa River, and de yeni kuow why 7 It is because they are such a prolifie race that before long tI\u0026ey would found a new Quebee! I do not know of the right being denied te the English te cstablish themselves in Qucbec, and there hav- ing nunierons chidren! Why shonld our race net have the saine right in Ontario 1 Mr. Hoeken strengthens bis asser- tion by saying that Sir Lomer Gouin roused the indignation of Ontario by having a Iaw adopted in the sesson of 1916 whicli anthorizes the school commissions te levy five pcr cent, on their revenues te help the Frenchi Canadians te figlit the laws of Ou- tarie. H1e qualifies sucb a law, as atroci ans. Well, te caini the indignation ef this brave Orangeman, let him per- mit me te tell him that what hie says is âbsolutely untrue. H1e has enly te ensuit the statutes ef Qucbec te be connced that bie bas deeivedl his readers, that snch a Iaw does net ex- îst. Yet another windxnill whicb this modern Don Quixote can ne longer assail! A last Word. flere is another peari that I tind ini the syxnpatbetic article written in regard te nas. It regards the suppos,,j ignorance of eur people: -Those eeclesiastical raiers of Quie)'. hold, the fortunes of every Quebec rinn that Province in the. )ollow of their biauds. When the educated classes amnoxg the French Canadiens exrhibit this child- like obediencet to tihe priests in the per- formance of their publie duty, how eaun",
         "WIIY DO TIIEY DEFAME US? w. wvonder nt the docility of the habitant? Hli. educationi la so sadly neglccted that lie is entirely ignorant of affairs, and Mes Mental processesI rovolve around the sub- jeert of the barnyard.\"1 These few lines contain as many fÂlsehoods as words, they show that lie whJo %%rot(, i.s not ut ail conversant wvil what ai1 c iii the Province of Undi(outtedlly our publie men en- tertaini the grcaýtest respect for the clergy: but to pretend that the clergy hol thern in thei hollow of their bands la a very dlifferent matter. The Catho- lic clergy for a long tixne was closely Iinked wvith thie Conservative party. Things have vhangedl much since then; a great number of pesabelong to the Liberal party, and the episeopate itself bas ceasedi to be hostile. It is not true either, exeept in what eau- cernas religious inatters, that fue habi- tants bllnidly obey their curés. lu 1896,. notwvithistandiuig the mande- ment of the bishiops, notwithstanding the denunciations o! a certain nurin- bier of curés againa.t Laurier, the lat- ter achiieve(d ai brilliant victory. bitter whlen there was a question o! r-egidalt- ing thje -sebools o! Manitoba, what was Sýir Wilfrid's attitude? This is hiow hie expressed hixnself- Wilit br said, that oecupying a posi- lioa of tii nature [recognizod ehief of thje Lýiberal partyl that 1 will bc dietatcd to ag to the lino of cownet 1 should fol- low in this Parliamient ont account of toa- sonst),.t commcrind thcmisolves te the con- gelecnces of mnY Cto colleagues, but do mot CoMmend tbemnselvcs to the consciences of wly P'rotestaýnt colleagues I No, as long a.s I will oeupy a sent; in this Flouse, as long as 1 ocetipy the pont that I now oc-~ CUPy',- every timeo it wil be neeessary for in( to takev a stand on làny question what- ever, I will take thtat sttnd, not front the point of vleNw of Catholicýism, flot from tho v1ew of Protestanti9m, buit I will take it for Tnotives that caa ippeal te the con- sciences of ail mcn, independently of their falitb,1 for Motives that appeal to ail mien whe love justice, freedom and toleratîon2' (Hansard, Mareh 2Oth, 1896, P. 18). ls that the language of a mnan who, j, under the domination o! the clergy?7 ,No. it is the language of a great states- man who stands above racial and re- lgions prejudices. It also shows plainly that our pub- lic men are flot under the tutorage o! the clergy in uon-religiotis matters and that the habitants are not slaves as Mr. llocken assert. In regard to edueation, the Pro- vince of Queljee nced flot envy On- tarîo. I amn go ig to prove rny asser- tion from figuresý taken freux publie documents. According to the last report o! thie Superintendent of Public TInstruc(tîin, 1911-it la the la-st one 1 have at, hand -the number of elemnentary sehools was then 5,905, attended by 111,458 boys and 114,980 girls, mnakiuig a total of 226,.438 childrvri; there are 676 inodel schools atteuded by 5:3,175 boys4 and 52,211 girls, which makes a total of 106,386; there are 22_3 academiesý attended by 24,48,3 boys and 31,816 girls, or a total of -56,299 pupils. Apart froun theuse scolthere are eleven normal sehols,, attended, by 840 pupils, of whoxn 174 are boys and 676 girls; to these must bie added eleven sebools of practice, wh-ichl are atteuded by 1,269 pupils, o! whonx 290 -are boys and 979 girls. Our classical clgewhich nun- ber nineteen, are atteuded by 7,140 boys. We have also four universities, whose courses are followed by 2,793 boys and 341 girls, a total of 3,134 pupÎls; there are eleven arts and trades schools followed by 2,538 pu- pils; seventy-five niglit seolfoi- lowed hy 5,265 boys and 56;3 girls, a total of 5,838; we have aIse four achools for deaf, dntnb and blind, at- tended by 229 boys and 326 girls, a total of 555. Ail these figures represent a grand total of 410,422 pupils who attend these varions institutions. Public instruction lias assnmed large proportions, due in great part to the grants made by the Goveru.. ment of Sir Lomer Glouin. ln 1913.. 14 the budget o! publie instruction, which before was $783,592, rose to",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE $1,373,355, an increase of 260 per cent. Many cemplaints werc heard for a long turne that there were no schools where our young men could be forin- cd for any other than the liberal pro- fessions. The Gonin Governinent coin- pleted our educational systein by establishing an engineering school; ît created at thîe saine turne two tecli- nical sehools, one in Quebec and the other in Montreal, which are attended by over 800 pupils. French Canadians are descendants of a donghty and valiant race whom it is difficuit to discourage. They dling te their language and they will mnaintain it in spite of the efforts that are inade at the present in Ontario te wrest it froin thein. If that Province persists in its persecution o! the French ninority, it will be xiailed te the pillory of history, without having succeedcd in its design, because a race dees not dTic. Sucli a situation can- flot endure, and in a country as free as ours, the voice of 2,500,000 French Canadians will finally be heard! The mnisunderstandings between Quebec and Ontario arise frorn our net knowing each other sufflciently; our neighbours do not understand Frenchi and do not wish te leara it. This prevents thein frein reading our newspapers, frein learning our truc mentality and keeping theinselves postéd on what is taking place in Que- bec. We, on the other hand, arc fa- miliar enougli with the English Ian- pliage to read English newspapers and keep in touch with what is tran- spiring in the sister Provinces. Why would they not do the saine as we do? Why do they flot visit our country places? If they would do se their unjust prejudices would disappear a.nd harmony would reign bctween the two races whom Providence bas pîse- cd side by side on this continent. For a long tirne England and France were enemnies, aud to-day, after exchanging visita, after haviug becoine better acquainted, these two nations have contracted a friendship which, cemented by their blood spi ed on the battleflelds, bids fair to indissoluble. Why should flot f. saine thing take place here? Each ra possesses its own peculiar qualiti and good only can resuit froin thE mutual contact. This is what w well said by Lord Dufferin when ', was our Governor-General, in rep to an addrcss presented to him by t Legisiative Assemnbly : \"The reciprocal action of our natioz indiosynerasies, said lie, introduces hr Our existence a verdure, a freshnesa, variety, a colour, an electrie impulse whl without it would be wanting; it would a very unwise policy to try te, cause thi te disappear. ' It was fidelity to our langua which caused our wonderful develc ment. This is what Louis MadelU a noted Frenchi author, one day i knowledged when he wrote: 1 1That handful of French peasants, afl 1763, without culture and without leade was going te be, it would seem, submera by the Anglo-Saxon wave. Mlenaced an inundation, agitated arme were extez ed toward France. France did flot con~ she coula net. Then this people, thiq bra people, in order to resist the Oncomi wave, fastened thomselves tu a rock; was their language. The language sa', the people and caused it to remain, triumph. It is a great lesson.\"e This rock which saved us lu the pi wiIl be our mainstay to the end; t assults that are made on it will r be able to shake it. War bau cementcd friendship '1 tween England and France. 'W ahould flot that saie friendship cemented between these two grE races who inhabit this land of erica?1 In conclusion, I wÎll offer for t meditation o! our detractors the be£ tîful sentiments so admirably expre cd in an article o! The London Tit dated the lst of October, 1914: \"'Auidat s0 many sorrows, thid v brings at Ieaut one joy: ît has made brothers, it bas drawn EnglÎsh and Frei more elesely together than two poo were ever before, united. After centnu of quarrels, behold there bas sprnaç between us a sort of miilsnium of frie ahip.\"e",
         "TO HIM 13Y MARGARET YANDES BRYAN H jE stood alone. The cold, damp drîzzle of a wintry day Swept ail about him. Yet 1 saw hin smile, AfId saw him stay there, (Close beside the window full of Christmas toys. A nd other chîidren came and stood And Iooked with eager eyes. Yet they were pulled by hurrying hauds away, 1Eacýh hoping in hia heart on Christmnaa Day T1,hat gun or drum would be upon bis tree. Stili the boy gazed on; And then there came te me A Ionging to perhaps fill up that littie heart with joy, Beeause, you sc, I, too, lad been a boy, llad stood out in the dusk, cold and alone, Longing witl aching heart for love and home. So, thinking thus, 1 gently sipoke te him. \"Niee toys, I Said. 1le looked up with a amile, Ani eager, happy smile that made lis face, Muel pmnched and drawn with cold, A welcome place for tired eyes te dwell. And then as if for love of me, he said:- \"Ilere, Mister, move in so, you kîn sec.\" 1 did, while he explained with Winsme boyish art The thought which lay the nearest to his heart. \"Them other kids, they ail must go away; Mit, miser, 1 kmn stay and stay, For mother's up in heaven, and, you see, S'he sends the angels with these sights for me,\") And then he smiled again and then was gene, Vanisled amid the hurrying buay erowd. 1 started after, and agaixi I seemed te seS That eager, happy face aile up at me, And, somehow, 1 saw life as i.t should be. Ah, littie ragged boy!1 Where\u003eer you go, lui this vast dream of ours, Sînile on!1 and thus wîthin that heart ef yours, ge fond and true, May only mother'a angels cmr for you.",
         "'Zbe %Last Crickl in tbc isaçg BY BEATRICE REDPATH H1E crowd jostled ber. A fat man breathing heav- ily from bis exertions was pushing bis way in- to the tent, and Sue wedged berseif in close- Iy behind him, taking a step forward eacli timne lie moved. Above the sound ot the shuffling feet and the noise of laughter and exclamation Sue ceuld hear thev voice of the conjuror. She puaqhed forwvard eagerly, extending a solidl elbow wvhen somaeone threatened to usurp ber place. It was bot in the tent, 'for the sun had been blazing on it ail day, and there was9 a nauseating smeil of orainges, pop-corn and peanuts. But Suie was deterrmined not te be foiled inhJer effort te see everything i the cirrus. She had looked forward to it for so long, witli auch anticipation; and, if anything, it exceeded ber ex- pectationa. Now she stood lest in ad- mniration before the lady in erimoson tiglits who had gailoped around the ring, standing en a white horse and kissing lier bands to the spetaters, whuile a tiglit-rope walkcr badl beld lier spell-bound with fear and wonder. A t len gth some of those in the front row thinned out and Sue feund lier- self standing directly before the little table on which the cenjurer had laid out ail the paraphernalia, et his trade. Ire was a tail, thin man witli hair slightly graying at bis temples, and Sque, accustemed to the ruatie inhabit- ants of Beanaville, theuglit she bad neyer seen anyone like him before. \",You see thia handkerehief, ladies and gentlemen,\" lie was sayÎng, dan- 216 gling a briglit red liandkerchief be- fore the interested spectators. Sue stood watching him with eager eyes and flushed cheeks, exhibiting an animated interest in lis performance, till lie paused to smile at her with au appraising glance. She grew crini- son, for he appeared ta single lier eut for ail his attention as if lie were per- torming bis tricks for lier alone, whîle lie was laughing liglitly as thougli con- texnptuous ef wliat le was doing. There was the bowl of goldfisli that appeared magicaUly underneatli the bandkercbief; tlere was the rabbit pulled ont by its long white cars freom tbe dusty recessea of a dingy silk liat; there was the much-tlnmbed pack et carda; there were all the usual tricksa of the trade; and altlougli Sue had neyer seen anytbing like tbem befere ber interest in tlie tricks waned bc- fore lier intercat ini the conjuror lum- self. Hie was so whlly unlike any- one she had ever known and she was fascinated by thc cool brazen case ef thc man. Slie was glad that sbe lad worn lier dress witli thc pink stripes, even theugli it lad looked like ramn, and she was glad that Joe had net brouglit lier after ail. At the tiine sbe had accused him of unkindneas, she liad even wept a few tears because lic could not be persuaded to take an afternoon frai bis work te bring lier te thc cîrcus. ',A wornan looks fine going with-. out lier liusband,\" slic lad complaineij witli soie bitterness--but 110W ahe was glad that lie bad stayed away. llnder caver of the gencral laugliter as the cenjuror pcrformed a trick",
         "THE LAST TRICK IN THE ÉAG with an especial deftness, hie whisper- ed a few words to bier in praise of lier prettiness, and Sue thrîlled at his daring. She left the tent with the remain- (fer of the spectators wlicn the per- formnance ,vas over, but she lingei'ed juet a littie distance from tlic tent, for she feit, sure that the conjuror woufld join her whecn lie liad packed away hie tinlgs in readiness for the even.ting performncie. She was amaz- cd at hierseif, but it was as tliough hie wvere a magnet attracting her-as thouigli shle were powerless to do other- wvise. The dufllness of lier life, the iitter inonotoniy of tlie farm routine liad ney,%er seerned so unhearable, and si,, feit as thougli she must snatch a littie of the glaînour of the circus for herseif before thle day was, ove\u003er. She reralled ft lady ]in thie crimison tiglits and she strov'e to fimitate lier littie airs and gracs, practising coquettieli gncson an occasional passerby. And in a few minutes the conjuror camen ont of thle tent looking as tliougli lie wvere seekirng someone, and then seeing bier lie îimmediately joined lier as thougli tliey wvere old friends. She, founid littie to gay to hirn, but alie glaniced( often at him fromn under the broad brirn of her liat, whîle lie hiad plenity of conversation, if it was onlly to lauigli at l3eansville and its inhabitants. She feit as thougli lie thoroughly depIised the littie village where she lived, and eonsequentlye hated it the ntiore. fier one fear was that ahe shonld appear ignorant and rmltie, so, she gave full vent to ber aecorn of everything, witli a bitterness thant surprised hirn. She eoiild not help a rising feeling of envy for the life these, people lived in contrast writli her own on the farm where day followed day in monoton- ous order. It was 5\u003c\u003e gay in the cli,- cus-tent, there was 80 machl glamour, r., much life and merriment, wbule the band played encli pretty tunes. \"IYou cau\u003et be knowing wliat it is like te be dul»she eomplaîned with a pout, \"Why I mÎglit as well bie a cabbage growing in a field as living ail rny life tliis ways with nothing to sec. lt's no Mie at ail, and the neigh- bours about so duli. 1 lic eryingý mly eyes Ont some days witb jusqt tIli wisli- ing to be away from it aiil.\" The conjurer, if aniythîntg, wls amused at tlie violence of lier asser- tions, as lie appeared iiiiiisedj ateey thing. lus was a kindly m iirth tliat saw reason for laugliter in every- thing, even were the laug7Iter te be0 turned on himacîIf. Sule collot un.1 \u003cIcrstand a lauigliter thant wvas net the parts scorn. The ihbtnsof Ucanjs- ville were not îiàclinied to mei(rrliment of this sort, they lauigliedi xnostlý 1o dereiaeso t0 Sule lis Iillahtr strulck at the very roots of lier life, and in hier sudniftainfor fihe mnan shc thorouiglly depsdali liat she had ever knw.For .1oewha was Joc but one of theserutie won the conjuror was regarding wvithl sncb mereîlêcss, fiun. \"You inean iftV\" lie asked, neow loolç- ing down ant lier fluislied ac nd blonde prettiness witli a sillile te hii. self for lier hittle affected wys \"Von mean that you bate ail thIis?- with a wave of bis band fihatincu a swampy meadow alnd a trild](-lookinig herse browsing beside a fencVe. Sue nodded bier liead eneirgeticailly. \"I'm hating it so that Fi'n neaý,r devad with the liatingr of it,\"1 she rsodd The conjuirer smniled. \"It's surely a pity' to find yourself hating the world we liv-e in,\"Ile said, .9whcn tlierc's se mucli to liedplesur in. Yonr bnsband, now. A\\re yen hating himV\" \"Yes, I ail],\" snapped Suie, for the moment believiîng she mnInjt it, in the liglit of bis relfusal. te take lier to tlie circus. The eonjurer shruigged hie shoul- ders and whistled softly. \"That sensto lie alwas thle way with wolrien,\" lie \u0026aid, \u003c'tliey -mnst be liating wliat they've got. I1fteyr free, they're ail for getting tied nup, and if tlieyre tied up tliey're al] for getting free. I've never taken muiiel",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE stock in them myseif, tliougli 1 don't say but, that I like a pretty face when I see one-till I sec a pretier one. I like it se, mucli that Fra near for- getting everything else.\" le Ieoked down at lier ini a way that brouglit the colour flying into Sue'es face. \"Do you be liking minet1\" alie ask- ed, strivinig to be bold, but witli a sud- den access o! shynees. \"I think perhaps I do,\" said tlie conjuror, and wîtb a liglt laugli lie bent over end kissed lier. «Youi're a magicien, aren't you 1\" said Sue, struggling te regain some of ber composure. \"4Yen cen do most anything you want te, I suppose?\" Thie cenjuror laughed. Sue's min- gled rcnseand naïveté puzzled and at the same time attracted liim. Thtat she tssu e naïveté lie had no doubt, but aIe did it cleverly eneugli te imake it attractive. \"I suppose, then,\" seid Sue, «1that y4u eould take a gold coin from un- der your pillow every morning just by wishiing it.\" The conjurer laugi ed again lieart- îly. She was certai ly prettier and more cbarming witi lier childlike way of speaking than anytliing thet lie could have expected te flnd in the dreb litie village ef Beanaville. Farin- er's wives in lis experience were al- ways represented by a cliecked apren, large feet and a general air of utilîty. But Sue's feet în lier tliek buekled slioes were smail and weil-Àliaped, and lier dress witli the pink stripes mock- ed et tlie very idea ef usefulness. \"Tliat's simple,\" lie answered, and putting lis arm around lier lie kissed lier again. \"The cireus goes on te-morrew at six o'elo\u003cSk,» lie sid. \"New, suppose I were magielan enougli te take yeu along, wliat would yeu sayt\" \"Oli!\" said Sue with a sigli, \"«If only yon were,» and lier mouth droop- ed et tlie corner~s as 8he tliouglit liow duli 11f e would be to-morrew-slie lied forgo tten that life would relapse again into its old monotofly. \"They're ail the same,\" remarke, the conjuror to the browsing hoerse a finally lie watclied Sue going slowl. homeward, \"every one of them afte wliat they liaven't got. A liappy w( mani is as rare to find as~ a snowflak in June,» and with a smile lie Ieunf ed back in the direction of the cireui tents, whicli appeared like musliroom, of gigantie size rising out of the grea, fields. It was late when Sue arrive back et the farm, and she was trou bling witli excitement as she enteire. the lighted kitchen. She thought a she fiung oiff lier bat 'tliat the f aru bouse liad neyer appeared so crud and bare, for lier mind was full of th conjuror and of ail the flattery the he had whispered te lier. If abe we as pretty as lie had said she was sur ly wasted on a f arm hidden awa wbere there was no oneC to tell lier )ioi pretty she was. Joe liad neyer tol lier that lier liair was like sunbeam or-or any of tlie pretty things the the conjuror lied said. Joe, wlio was sitting smoking hi pipe in front of the kitelien stov, looked Up witli a repreaclifül glau\u003c as slie caminu. \"I suppose that youre net thinkin tliat a man's bungry after lis day work iii tlie fields,\" lie said witli aex degree of irritation, \"tliat yeu u be out tini this heur. And new 1 muj be waîting tiil you go and take 0 your best tliings before you get tQ supper,\" lie added, witl à, look ( scorn for Sue's Pink dress and ht wide liat witli tlie pink rilbeons. Thiis was too mudli for Sue ini h present state of mîmd. ler eyes bla ed witli anger. 'Tliat's a you're ever thinking of she stormed, «\"wletlier you get yoy supper on turne. I suppose that\u003esa a woman's for, just te see that yc get fed. If's never ef my enjoyme, tliat yen think se long as you're sati fied and net kept waiting. Weil should have known better than to bal mnarried a common f armer. 1 wý foolili for sure n\u003et te be looking higý er--not te be iuarring sorneone w",
         "THE LAST TRICK IN THE BAG woud be thinking more of me than that 1 was just here to get bis meals.\" The tears camie înto her eyes as she thonghit howv littie site was appreciated and how different it might have been il she had marricd someone like the eonjuiror. Joe, surprised by her Sud- deni outbuirst, put down hia pipe and got iup rathe(r awkwardly. \"Th ere, the(re,\" he said, \"I was sure- ]y forgetting ail about the cireus. 1 was a bit tired, ami a man's bound to lie hasty whe(n ho's hungry for bis suipper and kept waîting. Run along now and take off your pretty things aind Fil1 set the table. The kettle's boiling a1readyv,\" Buit Serfsdto be propitiated. Site was ang7ry, and1 she was deter- mined] to reinain so, and she eontinued thrnlugbout the evening to treat .Toe wiith an air of Iofty disdain. Site was suire that no woman had ever been qulite s0 uinhappy, and ber life ap- pe(ared inexpre.,sably dreary and withouit interest alter the giamour of the circus, and la the Iight of the con- juror's attractions. Long after Joe had fallen asleep she Iay in the darkness with the tears wet on ber cbeeks as she ruminated on lier uunhappiness. Beyond the lit- tic villa!ge of Beansville the world was suirely full of wonderful things, and site had so, many more years of life stretching before lier in which she miglit enjoy them. But iu Beansville site would grow old without ever liav- ing Iived, with lines appearing on lier sinootit face while the lustre Ieft ber hair. Ail niglit Sue tossed Metles$IY On ber piliow, aud in the morning rose Stijl aggrievedl to prepare an early breakfast, as Joe had some business to transact in the next town and must make an early start. Site still per- sisted in ber anger against hlm aud watebed hlmi drive oiff with a frown, refusing a parting word. Then slow- Iy site .vent upstaira aud took down iter pink dress and lier broad hat with the. pink ribitons and slowiy and de- terminedly site put them on. Site knew now that she had inten,1lcd this ail along--she was going withl 1l t econ- juror! The morning was fresh and swevt and dewy as Suie startcdl offars the fields ini the d1irection of the cir- cus-tentR. The sky wa hiliiantfl. vivîdly bine, anid the air se dFtll of the song of birds, althoughý1 there were nio bi rds to be seen. it was as thougl-i the air itself was sinigingl whilst the smnell of varly pýrimiroses camie pleasant and sweet fromIl the hege.Sue's sp-irits bounm1d. anid it was with a pleasaint exiemn hat sie rau acros the fieldas, hier shoes damip from the thick dow. As she camie near the, ciroius fields site saw that everything was nieand von- fusion, with people rnighither aud 1hither, and ei sih Ioiutilg goning on as wagon after wagon wvas iloe or tents were taken dlown. Therv was not inuei giaminor here, anud for a few moments Su1e stood eîdee m wished that site had] not conl e, N one paid any attention to li r, they were ail too bulsy to notice bler, an(d she was just thinking that after, ail site bad better turiu back whcn she saw the conjuror ieaintg againist a feue Some distance off, a c-igarette between bis lips. He greetedi ler without anyv apparent surpr)ise xcp with a sliglit lifting of his eyebrows. '\"Titis la good of you,» lie said, \"to conie and see us off.-\" Sue feit the colour rusiting into ber chteeks, and site tried to kocp iii bier head and not look eniharrassedl. It was barder titan she lad imagined. '\u003cI'm coming with you,- site an- nouneed defiantly. \"l want to join, the circus. I'm neyer going back to Joe.\" Thte conjuror regarded lier in sil- ence wile h. blew the sutoke from bis cigarette lu slow spirals. \"So that'a it,\" he said élowiy, t\"Yor're eoming with me.?' Sue iooked at him from under thte brim of iter bat, smilîng and blushing. \"Aren't you wanting me, after ail 1\" site questioned.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE The conjuror was suent for a mo- ment, and then lie lauglied lightly and tlirew away bis cigarette. \"0f course, inm wanting you if tliat's how it is,\" lie saîd, looking down at lier tRI she blushed even more vividly, \"I'm not one to be refusing a pretty face for a travelling compan- 'oi\" They started in advanee of the rest of the circus and Sue feit a trifle dis- appointed in hÎs manner towards hier, for she bad been inclined to bie very dramatic, and bis careless good hu- mour seemed scarcely suitable for an occasion of sunob solemn import. But the glamour of tlie life before hier and tlie con juror's attraction soon made lier forget everything but liow pleas- ant it was ta bie walking along tlie country roads in thie sweet-amelling morning air witli sucli a companion. Hie lbad so muci to talk about, lie made lier laugli so constantly tliat she tlioaght a lifetime spent with snoli a compariîon would lie one of continu- oua happinesa. Slie neyer questîoned but that hie wua in love witli her-iad lie not wliîspered words to lier tlie evening before that liad senýtlie col- our flying into lier cheeks--and liad lie nlot kissed lier? She thrilled even now at the memory oftliose kisses. They scarcely met anyone as tbey went along tlic rond, onlY an occa- sional cart jogged past, going 9loWlY in tlie ruts tbat seamcd tlie road. Sue talked to him now quite naturallY, forgetting to assume lier littie man- nerismas of yestcrday. Slie was as a thoughilesa child out on a frolie, and as hie Iistenied to lier, as lie watelied lier, lis mnannler underwent a subtie chiange. Thc sun was liot and at timea tliey stopped ta rest under a tree tliat threw au inviting aliade, lie lying on his back witli has armas under lis liead, wliule Sue crouclied down on the soft mosa beside hlm. It was pleasant there witb tlie fields stretching away as far a% the eyea could sc, the feucca dwindfing to a mere uine iu tlie dis- tance. But Sue did not care ta look at the fields, nor at tic blue sky with its white fleece of clouda. Uer eyes were tired of these--she wauted to bear lim talk instead of tlie life of cities--of night made brigliter than day hy a thc'usand liglits. \"Those like Joe are happy euough in tlie fields,\" alie said witb scorn, \"\u003cbut you are different. You'd liate it just like 1 do. Joe's only a common farn- er. lie don't know liow duil it lie fer those whose tastes are different.» The conjuror was silent, staring up into the sky where the elouds Were white foam spreading across tlie blu. \"You're a magician, you are,\" said Sue witli pride, \"That's different ta being a fariner.\" The conjuror sifted somne pine nec-. dies between bis fingers before lie answered. \"I'm by way of being a poor sort of magician,\" lie said at last. «lj'u not working as mueli magie as yoi»r Joe la doing wheu he's simply plant-. iug a field. 1 can take a rabbit out of a liat-so long's I have the rabbit -but I eouldn't put life into evenga blade of grass. Your Joe la nearer being a magician than 1 am-0-h, life ia not so duli,\" lie went on more slow.. ly, \"life ia not sa dreary-it'a what you brÎng to life tbat makes it what it ia. It'a lil\u003ce those tliat corne tW look nt my trieks. Some come ready tQ seoff--otliers corne to lie amused-and tlicy fiud amusement, And so0 it is with life. Tbere's plenty to scoif at in life-but if you'rc happy yourei you'l flnd plenty to bic liappy about-~ if you're interested you'Ul fiud lots tliat's interesting-but if you're dnu yourself-you'll find life duli.Oh don't you sec it's wliat we bring to lit\u003ce every tinte. Life itself la about the saine for most of us. It's wiat we bring to life that makes it wliat it laY1 Sue listened wlde-cycd. Sic had neyer lieard anyone talk like this b... fore. In Beansville people accepted tliings witiout question or tliougj, ' if tliere was a badhlarvest tliey grue,. bled and coniplained at tic liarde-9 of ticir life, and if tiere wasa aoo",
         "THE LAST TRICK IN THE BAG one they were thankful, but only con- sidered it their due. The conjuror waa opening up new vistas to her, but there was no longer between them the attitude of woman and lover. It was ail gone-he did flot even look at hcr with the eyes of yesterday-he did not scem to notice that shte was pretty any more, and she wondercd if lie was disappointed in her. And now she glanced anxionsly up at the sky, for thick dJark clouds were rising in heavy banks and there was a low murmur of thunder that was coming nearer and nearer. Sue was afraid of thun- derstorms. In the corner of the big kitchen there was a wide settie where she always went to bide her hcad be- neatb cuishiions in the advent of a storm. Ami here she was out in the open fields with no sign of shelter and the storm would break upon them in a few moments. She was ashamed to tel] the conjuror of ber fears, for he had grown se distant, se remote, as thougli he scarcely noticed her any more. Hle was not noticing the storm either, and now a few big drops splashed down on her thin dress and Sue shrank from tbem with a littie ,shiver as she glanced at the angry sky. She feit very frightcned and lonely and more and more she longed for the comfortable homelike kitehen with Joe eomiug in with a laugh for her fears, but at the same time shutting the blinds to preveut ber from seeing the lightning darting Înto the room. For now the rain was coming down in thin shining sheets, and the con juror Iaugbed as it trickled down bis face. \"We get used to this sort of thing,\" he said. '\"I suppose you don't mind a bit of raim. Sometimes one is glad enough of it after a bot dusty day tramping the roads. Ramn is a ten- derer tbing than sun, I think, as a woînan's tears are tenderer than ber rnniIes.\" Sue could not tell him bow she dreaded tbe crash of tbe tbunder tbat ueemed to corne so close. She longed with ber wbole beart to, go back, but she feared bis mockiug laugh sbould she tell him that she had alrcady changed lier mind. Anyway, it was teoc late, for she was miles away from home, and terrible as it ivas to be out in the storm with the cnnjuror beside ber, she could not tbink of being out in it alone--she did not Cycu know the way back, and dusk ivas already creeping among the trees and along the hedgcs. It was ail so different from what ahe bad thouglit when she bad left ber home so gaily that îforflifg witb the soft words of tbe conjuror stili echo- ing ini ber ears. Ail ber big romance bad faded away inte sometbing quite despieahIe, andi it seemed to bie thé conjuror hîmself who wO.s ebowingr it te lier i that liglit. She walked -ith ber eyes on the ground and occasion. ally a tear ran downl ber checks and mingled with the rain-dropsi. ghe wondered wbat Joe would be thinking when lie came back te the empty bouse and found ber gone, and witb ail ber bcart she wisbed berself there to ffing ber arms around him when be came mn. And now sbe had donc soinethîng irretrievable, and she eould neyer go back to bim. Ail the time tbe conjuror was talk- ing baîf to himseif and baif te ber, Sue tbougbt, althougb part of tbe time sbe was not even histening to wbat lie was saying. \"Some say itfs nature--and some eall it spirit,\" Ilie was saying, \u003c\"but I eaUl it the Great Conjuror-none of us cau learn His tricks no matter bow bard we try. Wby, child, you Say you've neyer seen anytbing go won- derful as tbe few cheap tricks 1 do to fool some simple ruBtica bY. Wbat about day and night-life and death -tricks, real tricks these, and baving need to be done by the Master Con- jurer. Oh, there are no end te the trCks Hle does every day before our eyes, and you never groW tired watcb- ing-youa never knùW the ficyt trick that He wilI take out Of the bag to startie and amaze. Oh, ebild, you won't flnd the days dill if you j1ust",
         "222 THE CANADI keep watching the tricks that the Great Conjuror is doing. You wou't think mucli of uiy eheap trieks then, find you won't think mueh of me either. I guess your Joe is more near- ]y iu tnuch with the Great Conjuror than 1 amn. 1 guess he can show you more than 1 eau if you just ask hîm. iii oniy a poor kind of conjuror with a bagfiil of tricks.-\" herain had ail cleared away now and the sm-ell of the damp earth rose pieaaniyfragrantiy, fresh. The hiedges and trees dripped and droop- ed heaviiy, while the conjuror breath- cd the fresh air with a pleased satis- faction, but 'Sue% heart wag heavier thaut before as she looked up at a few faint stars coming out iu the sky. It was terrible what site had done, and now there was no heip for it. She was here at niglit alone with this strainger.-and Joe-oh, how she long- cd for Joe and hîs clumsy kindly ways!1 \"It's what's in a mau's heart, not what's lu his head that matters,\"' the conjurer continued, \"and I gaess the manti tat is nearest to, the great sim- pie things has the beat iu his heart. Yon ean't work out ln the sun and amneil the good earth and know the wind on your face aud ttake Up with cvii thoughts.\" It was Joe that lie was ehowing her--Joe-now that she had lost him forever i She had neyer feit so louie- iy-so wretched-so iguorant of lit e. \"I didn't know at firat,\" the con- juror said thoughtfully, \"the kind you were. You had ail the ways of a AN MAGAZINE differeut sort. But you're ouly a ehid crying out for the snn-and we don't get the suri, you know-we're not intended to. If we just catch a gimrpseof-it now and then that's ai that's good for us.\" Sue was sobbing now, her fingers covcring her face.. 'Il think you've had your lesson,'\" he said, \"and there's one trick we conjurors dou't do-we don't turu children into sorrowful womeu. But there's still one more trick 1 eau do,»l he continued cheerfnully, -the very iast trick in the bag-if You cross that stile and yonder fild you'll be at home in five minutes, and in time to cook your hushand's supper.\" Sue uncovered her face and looked about her in astonishment. There was the chimney of lier own house with the smoke curling Up in a thir spiral, and there was the top of the taîl elm. The con juror had led her haek titrougli the dusk while lie had been talking-and she had thouglit herself miles away front home---he had led lier back to lier own door!1 Site was speechiess ln lier sudden joy and relief, and ini her emnbarras... ment she fouud no words to say to him as lie stood tail and sileut and remote in the gathcring dusk. Witli the tears stiil wet ou her cheeks and with a littie sob that was, ail relief sh.e turued aud rau in the direction )ie had pointed out, wliile the conjuror stood with a smile on his lips wateh.. ing the last flieker of lier dress ln the dusk. Theu with a careless shrug lie turned back luto the fields.",
         "IN THE FOREST l3y Pascal Dagnan-Bouveret One of the French Paintints exhibîted at the Canadian National ExhNbtion",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "r1bc Z'ýCzitress at %ant,ý IYIORACE ANNESLEY VACHELL an hor eyeone, It with a long lit]pronc, Ili- any buwyi th1 al sanbeam a and~b e hesbtenSat With tnev a mag-lnlial on Il, 4exhib)ited a ridi i s -11hodlolse, col d iii win ter !i hot in ,ilinier, a chiurcli, Il Parsom- ge wo hlotels andff haif il dozen sion. Aftpr theepdrne whv, .Tl 1u went eadlog, otf theseO buildinIgs were emlpty' . Onle hotel, flic Granyd, kept opeix,beue the fine w itedut of flic foothills niahs ~aflemn ad shbeepienv ab- normallJ'., thirst.y. The Granid was runi by an ex-faro deie\u003er adgeneral Il-rolund sport, 1 have forgottent bis patronyinie, but wve caIIled him Nosey, not without reason. Uc TT nixed mzncokal OlIf of whiîsky whieh was jilditciolsly bIende¶1j by imsel.f d1own ecellr. Nosey tended his own bar, played eards, eu2t haïr, and was the tallent talker ini thie couinty. 1Il'ia liai,, and proud of it,\"' he wold( sa4y. We Sat at the feet of thiis Gamaliel and absorbed his enktiails and con- versation. The odds were te» f0 one --nd nio tàkers-that Nosey Couild Outtalk any manu lu our crowd. We admitted frankly that lie had ideas. The pa:rtieuilir idea Of deringfor a waitress waa hi. Viii groing bhin, he old u Ili lnsing, big llnney, by. \"Where you steal 'it V» . ziked itild Nosey vihd \"i 1 ,ole it riglit 1nuh jýi mm with fifty tholluSand in1» teasi Noh)odybllvdth. Sva as Our ï1iitedexrenewtNoy was reaonably osf, NoSeycon «1 boghf peai nekiac wit thtbuch o' bi,anekabo, oSong wears niiglt 1nd1 ay. )-fol mlust ha'l Inadle a !lt wifhi lier iajeiifsty t\"ý 'I 1id Élfl 1t I hed ter gz-4e ler flie eoid Phuc-k. No mail gits, Sn fe4d lp wifli wimnokas I do(. Thte besf of 'emn kiiider Saur on me., 13ut wvimmelln, bolias hirue.SIiligin' CWe alted expýeetnfîyN. Nosey Pulled a paper front behind the bar. \"Yon seen tis adveýrfisemientt? l Us a dandy.\"l «Yours, Nosey t 'Minle, my son. Liste»:'ane immlediate, a yoilng sprv, gýod-look- in\" Wa-itress 'for first-elass hotel in the, eountry.' WaI, boys, I bat. to stick a surprise into ye, but she's doo ter-d.ay.Y Buid breasted the. bar.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Il This is mine. 'We'll drink the Iady's health riglit now. Coine on uip, ail Of ye.- The San Ljoreuzo Stage rolled into santy about an hotur later. By that time the health of the. young-spry- good-looking wuitress had been drun\u003c wlth enthusiasmi thriee. None of uis, however, believed in the adJectives. But we were thrilled at the advent of amy stranger in petticeats. Santy hoasted a schoolrna'uir of years as uincertain as ber temper. She baud- led lier sehelars rnas4tertully and was a solid pillai, of the County Teruper- anep Association. Our cuittie poules shi.d uit the sight of ber. Surne of the land boom settiers huid broiught wives aud daugliters tu the feethills. Cuill themn polar whbite trash, aud have donie with it. As Bud put it, the Santy stage was set for a star. and the. question obtruded itself-did it carry one?1 A eoiumn of dust appeared in the south-ea.st, and halt-a-dozen ot ns lit cigarettes as we ranged Up in front, ot the hotel. \"Anythlng for nme?\" asked Nosey of the. stage-driver. \" Inside passenger,» replied the stage-driver. A tail, slim yeung wornan get eut, carrying a large satchel. Sh. wore a duet-proof veil and a lon whitey- gray eloak. 5Sh. adresdNeyi a elear ealm voice: \" la this the Grand Hotell» Nosey replied iu the affirmative. Bud said hastily: IlLemme take yer gril t Hank Parkinson wbuapered te mie: \"On. uip on Bud.» \",wait,»1 said I. Bud's offer was ignored. Nosey led the. way into the hotel, and the yi\u003eiiig wornun followed in silenc.. Bud laughed. Hlaik miarmui'ed re- flectiveiy: \"W-Vhar did the ehieken git tue axe?\"ý We went back te the bar. Pres- ently Nosey appeared. His face in- dieated surprise aud lineasiiiess, An~d bis voice. although tee Ioiid fer grn teel society, suink te a whîsper. \"Boys,-\" be said solemuly. IIShe's4 a peach, a wîinuer.\" \"«What's she won, Nosey?Yo V \"lBeys 'mi a liar if she ain't a Iady-quilty! Wîimmeni i, and allers WilI be, pule1s te Me, but WhyV sbe answered xny leetie 'ad' bangs Buinagher. Mebbe 1 wiorded it tee qlick. Wai, ye'l se ber to-morrer all righ. We did. lu boueur of the stranger we toiik dlinner at the Grand. Maine-w. were instructed to su address lier-- waited upon us. She was eertainly very attractive and gruiceful. And lier brewn bair, su 1 nioticed, was beautifully doue. Obviuuisly, aIse, she took cuire et lier bauds. To ail our questionsý-we didu't ask mauy- slie replied lu monosyllables. Sh. surveyed us eaimiy and derisivey. Tt was a chilI meal. Bud, the meust enterprisîng et the cempany, maid. a bad break. \"De yeu like Santyl'\" be asked ouri \u003c'It's quiiet,\" she replled deuiureiy, Bud winked uit ber. \"We kin whoep thirgq up, if yoýj say se,\" lie assured ber. Mamne's face remained imp\" e Her eyes rested for a moment upon Bud's ingenious countenancle. To our deliglit lie hhisbhed- Then sh passed on, blaudly indifferent. Hak, wlio bad net read bis ChauteaUbri. and, gave us te uuderstand that the diseonifiture ef liii friend waa aat aitegether displeasing te him. Atter dinner Nosey commendlei our table mauners. \"Barrin' Bud,» b.e was kn enou\u003ch te say, \"ye behaved 11ke perý feet gen'iemen. 'Mare lu high-toed This ain't her stamnpin'-ground. But by Jing! 1 recon sbe means to tak ahoit and stay ou. 1 suspicea some that aiie'd pull stakes this r- ing. But I was nîlatook. Neb she' here f or ber health.» Bud hazarded anotuer conjeetuf..",
         "THE WAITRESS AT ISANTY - Mcbbe she's aifter, a pearl neck- laee.\"! Nosey replied happiiy: -She's a peari îe Marne, and it's iii to mie that she don't fait amnozigs swine. llank, the, parlotir trioks voui (Io with yer knifeý didn't amnuse lier any.\u003e When T seeni Joe Ituck ie ser- %-iette into hie p)ooket, 1 surmnied that ,he, winvedl. TIland( it over, sýon!1\" -Joe prodiwed the napilkiin and \"set uip \" the drinks. Marnie was; toasted onie again. Biud, who was rny sm-art- est cewboy, rode back to the ranch with nie. Hie put adequately lito, words tii. question that was biting tre: \u003cSav- what the hell's she doin' berer Afortnight passed. Being a slack tiiue on the ranch we spent some agreeable hours ini Santy at the Grand Rotel. One thing was rer- tain. Marne, as waitress, developed inte a stellar attraction of the first magnitude. She treated ail and suin- dry alike with demure courtesy. She took thi. air in thre company of the hotel eek, a melancholy and aged fe- muaie. She refused pleasantly invi- taions te go \"buggy-riding.\" 'But her reserve, when waiting upon us, seradually thawed. Let it be recorded, aise, that iinperceptibly she raised the tone of table talk. Under mueh pro- vocatlin ahe corrected grammatical bllinders with a amile that to'ok th ,ting out of ber admonitions. Hank ,n Rud became promising pupils. Rach confided i me that hie waa the writhing victim of the grand paasion. Bud broke eut into poetry. llank bougiit a Prince Albert colat, satin- linled. 1 do net affirmn that Marnie encuraedthe boys, but ah. did not disourgethem. Watching lier cloey, 1 eherished the conviction that they amused lier. Moreover, they kept Cther aspirants at a dis- Aout a week later, Nosey Led me n, suad after exacting a pledge of secrecy mnade an a,4touingrL an- nouinceinent, \u003c'Marne ain*t ,\\-at she, aipears te bc. For two yerT ruil a barber shop in Petaimnia. I hold the- quick- shavin' record, shaved sxt-he mii uinder the hour, by Jing: Yes. sir, what 1 don't kinuwý abhout the barber business eould lie set dewnvi on a dime. Marne wvesrs a wig.- A wig- one or the best, tee. Goodl wigs rini into big ioney. 1 reokon she muet hey two. Yes\u003edavy 1 took a squint at ber waahin'. No frills, ye understand, but fine linan- a dead give-away.»' \"Mteaningtr \"Marne is no wvaitress. Shec's lu hid1iny-s1ure 1» -\"None of our bsns. \"Yer dead rigbt. That'a why I told ye. I've bin in hidun' mioren onet, Thai9a bin big rewardaq offered fer me. Yes, qir, I've bin wanted by haif a dozen sheriffs-damn 'emi! The pint is- air they wantin' Marne?\" \" Your ' pint, Nesey, is as big as a ba;rrel- Two mien, 1 know, are wvanting MN-ame-Buid Norcrees an(] Rank Parkinson. They want bier se badly that there nxiay b. trouble.\" \",Pshaw! is 'Main. wantedi by the perl ice 9\" \"Search me.\" \"ltdl tiekie ile pflumi ter dleath Wur fool the. police. -\"Pv. balf a notion te give _Main. a hint that wayY \"'Don't! If she is hidiug, she's chosen a snug place. A hint frein von might scare bier out of it-\" \" Mebbe yer right.» After this enfldential talk with Nosey I looked with ever-increasing interest and curiosity at, our waitreas. Uer aungular detachment, had become explicable upon a hypothesis which in itself geemned incredible.. The girls eyes were se honest. Slh. carried a high band. lier laugh had the. ster- ling ring te it. Nosey, wheu I cama- ally mentioued these things. to him, pitied my ignorance and iepe? ene.",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 1'When 1 played cards for a livin', and 1 was a Jim Dandy at it, a down- snd.-outer, what mnade the suckers play witli me? My lionest face, by Jing! Mary's littie lamib an' me lia' bin twins. Marne's face ie lier fortin' and Viii lookin' for lier pliotograpli il) The Police Gazette. 1If 1 was- twenityv years younger, I'd want the purty sinner miyseif.\" « Bud aud Hfank would make it Il'vely for you.'\u003e ccI'd eat thern two galoots for brYeaikfast snd be liungry again by 1 returned to the ranch a ninch worried mnax. During two years Hanik and Budf had been devotedl friends; niow Marnev stoodj betwveený thenii. Santy wals not big enougli to liold 111v two beet eowboys. They behiavedl like dlog\", growling over a bone. On ther range thiey went differ- ent waiys. About the barn and in the hionse tliey, glared fîercelyr at Paeh other. Eahmocked the other, and yet Pe\u003cli - with l tecolo.,ssal conceit ieh erli baraeterizes vour true native son of the Golden WVest-believed that Maine wss bis for the asking. But they didn't ask. 1 wondfered whether I eould breathie a warning word into Mamne's car. fin ýanty, she had bee-n the only peýrsoni, maie or fernale, whio liad treated mie consistently with a rathçr chilling depference. 1 feit sure that my 'position as tie owner of a large ranchi had nothing to do witli ler attitude towards me. ler deference, if it ould bc really ealled that, was mmucl more mubtie. It involved the r-ecognition of class distinctions. BIad she beeni an E\"nglishiworn i alould have understood lier perfeetly. Al- waye there, was the difficulty of get- ting lier aJone. Next day, 1 seized my first oppor- tunity. Nosey told me that the ancient eook was out for the afternoon, paying visite in Sanity. Marne, i learned, was iii the kitchen. 1 found lier reading a book whicli mie closed a-s 1 entered. 1 saluted ber gravely, and theui plunged headlong. \"Marne, there's trouble at th rancli-house, and you're at tie bottoi of it.Y \"cA=n I V'\u003e «Yes. Rank and Bud, good boy: are crazy about you. Loeo I Bua writee poetry, nud IIauk ides liry self in a prince A\\lbert ýoat.» ' 1 fix tliem. Yout ]eave it te mg They're nice boys. I'd liste to nxak trou ble between thein. Can't the keep tlie peace for a bit louiger?!\" \"I don'% know. Tfiat sort i0 trouble gets acute mighity quiek.»1 \"l'Il watch ont. Dorn't you worry I Sýhe lookýed at mle penisily, with faint srnile curving, lier red lips. was near enougli to glance careles-4 ait lier nice browui lair, vlas e~ quisitely arranged. If slkie wore wig, it was certainly one of thie bes I took rnly leave more puizzled thft ever. Nosey was waiting for ie i the bar. \"Anyluk\" I repeated the conversation, Noe nodded. \"Pisyin' fer time, is she? that's a heap better'n do'it. Sa -'ve a notion to give a bail. We\", hev a hog-killin'clbato\" \"Are you a dancer, Noescy \" \"A dancer -nme? 1i won th world's ehampionship, when 1 wvs kid. I daneed for seveuteen hl, 1 quit dancin' after that.\" «Why t\" \"Wad, sir, after I'd downed th other competitors, I notieed tbat in pardrier wasý kinder lirnp ond lis1e$ý 1Ibad toecarrylber toliereeat, and doctor got to work on bier. ils9j that sh'd bin dead two heuirs. That' what made me quit. New, about thi yere bal;- we'il dance in the dinine rooni, and liev supper in thxe bar, You scare up a big crowdY' \"i1 wondrr if Marne dancesf' . es t est sardines?»I",
         "TuE1. WVAITRESS AT SANTY A\\part fromr what may he describedî aýs flic crowning surpriseP at the end of it, to ble relatcd in flue tilme, there wasýç lthe gýathePring togcthetr of a very reînairkaible cýrowdf. 01ur foothiille harbouired some, deprt hararcrs, eattl4hiecs td the Ilke, Io whlom ilie lure of theý fiestaf wasirsstbe Tl(ickets for one gteanandl his ladly friuiifd were, sold at a dollar pie. Nosc(y was noV optimjist enogh expeet to mnake inoneyl, ont of thef balI proper. A profit ern- mensratewithi theý trouble taken wolild begw ae at the( bar. llanh aqpcairPd iii is. lrineew Albert, 11,7d wore a blak orning Coat of ine . !Inli oWest ter is ani invio- lsa ]law%: in troulefý beforeý women. Gowboyvs left thIl1r gunis\" a tIl i h vm. 'we averged fli cavaliers tW one lady, buit that mladethng livelier for thte girls. A local flIddlr, al sheep- horder, was instruieted to dIo lis beat. Marne, o! course, was; the Belle of the Bi. I worc a frock fasliioned byv herseif out of eheese clofli. 1 ney-er wisli ln take the floor with a Jigliter or better performer. he was kind eniougli to give mne thec first waltz. As we flnislied a youngu man enitered the room, stood for ani in- s;tant in the doorway, glanccd round himn, and thon siled. 1 tlioughti lie wvas siiing- at me. Out of the, corner o! my eye 1 saw Mamne's face. Sheý Wals very pale, and lier Pey es hield an, odd furtive expression. This van- ished liimediately, so qicklyI indeed that 1 thouight I hll been mnistaken. The yoilng ilanl approaehed. «Hello, Giene.\" fle put outI lis hiand and g'rasped bers. I bowed and left then. Aýs I did so 1 saw Bud staring hard at the qtranger. lIank, just across the rooril, stared iilao. 1 turned to glance at our waitress. Site was witispering bo the stranger, as ho stood smiling at ber. They edged back ont o! te crowd. Budcarne ap tomeaFndsaid MBay, you know that giiy'l\" .. 1ee ý,tw hlmi before,\" 1 said. IlSaine licre. 1 roekon te eut hm ouiter the herd pronto.\", lieappoaeedMaine, and 1 itad crofyenoughi to follow imii at a disecet istnce. lieelaitaeod flic netdance, ami carricd off Mllme triiniphiantly. llanik oked disap-1 poined. TIc strangor smle, ur- veigthe er w ith a1 somwhat deiielift Of his eybrws li migt hve corneo ouft of thie buis\", buit le was flot o! tblen., 1 sileitu 111 as a eity' clerk. By- all odds ho( ias the luin dsomes,-t mlan i i te rouaii. Duiring file neit two heours 1 waS tryingp to deteriaine whiethoer a comedy - or a tragredy was hingif played under, in n rose. Mariedace witl mnany mon, but aft er oacI da , he re- turned te the, strnmger. Nobod 'y was s;urprised to se(- thcti supig - goth ler. Obiu l f) be,iifud sd Miark hiad joineýd isue le tIuoini- mnon desire to - out » adagru rival. I fouifd thin togethier, dink- ing- Noscyv's i rflimmauto cockails No Isupper for therni ThIll boys w on thie friendîleattems NoseyV wVis busy, bchlind his blar, ltsppr tables wcre sprea at1w othler end o! 0wt room, witl a c-urint discreîly hiding flep bar fromn fatir and ensorl- ing eyes. After 'uprlie, curtain coluld le- takenl aon d thre roomi given over to flic mni. Then suad not tilithn, those maiking or hunt- ing trouble could ceunI tlicelIvs froo agents. At vupe ohse man waiîed lupon himlf aud his partuecr. I heard Bud say Vo llanik: \"I've a notion te biorry a guin front Nosey. Tii ycre stranger inay ha iteeIled.» Hank replied mouirnfiilly: «Nosey ain't te sport lie useter Whten titey saw me, each affectefi a too boisterous hilarity. Somphow 1 felt sorry for lthe stranger. After snpper we had a treat. Mam# and lte atrangeIr took te floor to.- geter. In titoso days, the. two-step was almost unk-nown. One two-step",
         "THE, CANADIAN MAGAZINE offiy figured upon the. prc hung upon the. wali beh fiddler. He. struok up a Seuui At once 1 knew that Il Gene prefess-,ional daneer, as grai \"Adonis\" Dixey, aud mue) wa buiid. 1 knew aise t two-step had beau prexuised when the programme was di, Bud fancied himsaif as asa bad teid ail tihe boys to b. Il when th(, two-step was playe watobed the gyrsting pair, c of grins upen the faces of the Hauk, however, was quite asi Bud. Marne had promisec mupper withi him. IUder cuinstances, 1 thought it pri have, a word with Nesey. him below, taking down the Wheýn I recited the facte, he mIl aed creleuuIy: \"Yen were bragging abo dancing. Yeu ought te %ea low at it.»' \"I wil, said NosieY. Îi and was backin mistakabie expreý In a moment of e, noie weuild twvitel bis niekuamne. It Hie took my.arm., IlThis thing ii hearseiy. \"lDo Mame's hluggi'r' I den't. T' This isn't the. fi stepped together.) I t mnay be Nosey.», \u003c'Oh, rot,\" 1 re ,-an talc te the hj theni dewn bard, :air between twe o job te see that the rai with thii strai 1osey's answer. I1 ain't wOrlll a notion te gat a We'Ul bave that longer. Hle went euts gramme herses were hitched te a double i ind the of rails. When hce cme baek Smarch. nose was stili twitching. »was a IlGo, gît Bank and Bud -qu ceful as Thar ain't a moment Wo lose.\" iof the I obeyed-wondering. Bud2 hat this Rlank asked no0 questions, 1 fai to l3ud that they counted me in as a tb awn up. party. Nosey had found an un( icer, aud study te serve drinks. Re beckoi areund \" us inte the kitchen. d. Bud IlBeys,\",he said te Blank aud B ouscious \"Marne bas double-cros-ed ye. a ~\"boys\". she 1\" angry as Bud answered grîmiy: Ite est IlThe fun ain't over yet.\" the cir- IlNow, yeu twe beys are spo udent to D'ye want te, heap red hot ceala 1 feund Mame's head t She ain't fer eit curtain. of ye. This in a big chance te whistIed. eve-n with her in a big way.\u003e \"I1 ain't guessin' ne riddles 1 ut your night, old socks.\" this fei- Nosey's voice sank te a meleè matie whisper. 1 can't remem ou wsit whether or net ha had beau a woi famous acter. ng-room, \" Boys, outside, under the big i an un- oak, air the Sherif o this yere col, his face. and two depities.\" kie mnan's «Geai\" posbly, «They're' waitin' fer them t iug now. steppers. It's my idee that we feol 'em. The Lord jined husbU he said an' wif e, let net man put 'arn as ýw who der.\" IlHusband au' wif e \" friands. IlCountarfeiters, beth of 'an. r\"ve twe- was inthe green goods business oi These twe air champions,\" replied 'Suffering Mike 1\" \"The San Antone Kid aud cii snd 1 wife. They was both dancers. b as let hate te thiuk that my dance iaji, lears the 'arn in the panitentiary.\u003e It's our -Wa ware stupefied inte silence. r aquar- had read the storyin the Ppp Romance had tinctured an othier ne, sordid taie. The police had m",
         "THE WAITRESS AT SANTY Nosey chuckled and blinked. IlThat's big rnoney in the way of reward. You boys kin gît even that a way-.\" \",You go to blazes.), «'Nosey lias a plan,\" I suggested. - Yes, boys, 1 hev. Marne has two wîg-s. The KCid ain't overly big, and his face la as smooth as bers. The offieni traeked hirn here. They don't know about Marne. Anyway, we muaiit take that chance. If you two bovs escorted, two ladies down Mongolia Avenoo, with the moon full on yer faces. I'd bet what'à ini the till ye'd fool that crowd under the live oak* They'1l be watchin' the Kid's bronecho. 'And,-\" he looked liard at mne, \" the rancli-hoiige ain't a mile away.\" We nodded eolerinly. Nosey managed the details with consummate art. We thrce werv as wax in has bands. The uniwritteni law helped us. The sherlif and bis depu- ties had to consider popular opinion. To break up a pleasant party was against ail precedent. They were con- tent to wvait tilt the guests dispersed. The Kid changed into the working dress of a waitress in bis wlfe's room. Several couples, after supper, wenit for a stroil ait clair de la lune. Nosv and i cnlgagedl tbhe sihpriff in conversation, aisssuming jocularly that theyv were after sorne of our cattlic4iftinig friends. 1 saw Bud and ITnank corne out of the bote], eadh with an ai-i encireling his coin. paniion. Bi3d broke into song, as lie passed lis. I want yer, nia hone\u003e', yes 1 doý.\" The ladies were- discreetl\u003e' Veiled. Next day, when tbe Kid and hia wife were over the bille and far away, I said to Buid and Tlank: Il Whidli of youi two boys wal1ked wtli Mfarne? '\u003cice did,»ý said Bud. \"We spun a dollar about it. I aquieezed Mame good and bard.\" I{ank snickered: \",Marne kissed mue wheu I told lier good(-byve.e\" Nosey didn't advertise for an\"ther waitress.",
         "i1Y BLANCHE GERTRUDE ROBBINS DRAWING BY JOHN RUSSELL UIAKNG the snowflakes fromi bis overcoat, Ro- bcrit Standishi bur-st into thle kitehien with a sense or boyishniess forcign to tiie eustoiary air of digity t ,i t accoinmaied bis protes- sorshiip. Throwing down the arinful of vergreeni tait lie swept withi sucd t riumph through the dloorway, lie fluing off coat and cap, and, sweeping it up again in lis long inuscular arma., hec earriedi it iiito the room. that was part Iibrnry, part living-room. Droping is buindie in a corner, he stooped over the rugged stonie tire- placec and Igtdthe fagots heaped upon the grt olding out bis long thin bIanda to the blaze, lie stoodi wa-ýtchin 'g flie flames, bis lean, dlark faue wýith ils ecarly chiselled features stern in the flickering flrelight. Thon, turningr, le lifted a log, silvery with its coating- of bark, fromn the wicker baskot anid threw it into the blaze. A senlse of aatisfaetion glowed in bis soul as the flarnes crackled mer- rily' . Ie liad gone in-rto the deptîs of the blisi to luniit this flrewood. The Christimas hieartlires at least sliould manke rrnerry. Tlrewing the second log on the blaqze, lie leaned lis elbow against the rugged stone of the fireplace, bis tall, sparle figure standing loosely, witli a toneh of relaxationl in its attitude. The sober, deep-set, gray eyee stu- dlied( tIc mass of evergr4efl with its spri.nkling of rose bernieR. He lad h1ad a long tramip througli thle wi hu-Lnting out thie grVeen stif. ,Bit becart lad wýarmcd,( to t!he ' cci it had net for mainy mnontha. j buit that juniper vinle Ilad ai eluded MM. l1e was glad that he persevered iuntil lie foiind( lt. W\\ýitl a sense of or haa ment of ser-1iusness, and learnille 111( enitered into prepaIrationsI! foi xncrry-makingý. Fairly in tIcý dai lad sent old Rahltewoman:Il over the way w1lo kept hlis cottage and cooked bis xnas int lie to buy the Cbristmas-i dimner. TIen, with a sudd(en scnse 4,f li ntess, bis heart throbbed uhy spirîit of tîeé boy deserting it and ing in its place the fiopekssýcfi age. Yes, hie liad madfe recdy,. y( lad no reasen to believe thait 1 would accept the invitationr Ila lad sent lier, asking bier to spené Christmastide with biim. le h!id written that letter flercely-pounidîngi pulses, but net had lie breathied. through, it liis derniess for lier nor the theugbl reconeillation. Hie lad penned, a pie,, cold, straiglitforward invita Thc rnockery of itivtn his to spend tlie Cbristmastide in lier bomne! lHe lnglied barshly and b ing, caulg bt uip the poker, probiuý",
         "THE UTNBIDDEN {4FUiESTl anti th lnelinesa hadtughlt hit:! to winderstand juast al littie mlore of hier natuire. B\u003erte tt iej badi( bieen, te) expeet-I such verit of beIr aJte have( demanded1 thlat sho ooria-l se striotly to hI-s *imlivt of'lvig lu n mlut1burast of'psin suli as hadl Shaýken Ilis selriidcly, wilen !irst 11e founod lier, hie had luteeiher freni tlle ver-Y lap of' luixu. i ad responided, ani 'in deoa ï th îe fury of beowil peo ie.lat1 ari himr te aeeept4 is cota s homne. If o li er owii peoie- had l he1r off!, aýil m Ilýh ve g'one( wuil. But fliecotag hadl swarmeli d witIl theose fate oif lbiinti aihiguo er thei extavagnce.Aid lie biat re,- bellei. ll hat ual hougit tllat blis d111 ritionli ýt lor utr a'il thle gaudyI(I uplendouolr of the,( oil life, out fronm ile' cotagehoe coélt 111:1rt thel-, lt heart7, ef a hl'q tkn awayV fromi lier thie grlitter-ingl friolishi toYs that weeshrive1liin ber soil. 1-e hI,,( thaughl she waý maide of stIerue(r stufr. Hie hi en jta flie deppfi or lier yea,-ring sureainig eult te noler, bigger thiings ini life ill.an hier peopýle baiknwn Ani titis yeanig-ttedearncs,ýs of bier wini- oir)es-a draiwi Ilim irresýistily to ber. .As lie lbaýd seniglit Ont then Wilti, erepiPng thinIga. orfiîle floeweri world ani evelopeti tbem. throuigh hi,, tireiesa; stuidy gnd experimnt, te a bard ier, richer growth, lie liad( yrit t develop tlie ini anvl sol of Elnid Cairr. But wvitli the hipleasî flowers of thle wild b. liad workedl gradutaly , pai- tient]yv net witli thie ab.lrupt pressuire h. haad lient upon thle WiIl of Ihlegil wife. h ha atidne imi to kneow that lie, alone, culti nat salisfy lier: that she still craveti glanlour and ex- AUl on the impulse of the moment, hc had decided the turning point. His wife mu\u0026st ehoose between ber ow rnt»1Ie and-hinself. qlle bad ehosepn ntîd iilt very' hour of bler 410ice hadi gee way frolm Ibe otaeri- ing- withi lier broi-ter ueurga spindor.neyer tulr!lig beri hcadl fIctIn ila luxuiviriouislyý motfelicti cai-r te lookk aiR er StauldishI. AhaiOf beor Lay the g ore f a sutntmt'r cam , lmig witlhroe Poehint iber lheiro \\I wa 10s onlIh Yer- trampiî ;l the woods, or ai eteIlug tn uip le 0i- rap)iti te b)reaki îleý tuoniot- nyI. SjIhe baId matie brchýoiee anti hiad eti i,,i ta beIýir own paple If hw baIII nl * peuvret i ont i- fle ](efier lte loneolilncas cfr 11w nibe nes ,îlfor bi vatn in -fietn wrecbnglir fromIuxur ant e- travaance li iglit bave opt for borne1f for Ihe ii\u003c Iristeî\u0026 cas sie eef, wntet tcrnem. tlînt Slbe 1- -f lie M cota e, in al Ibat linie. S-tartlIt ai lt,,g nifeaue f ltefac, e mmcd rm piefi p paein jlte floo reîledy Tf nv behir, been willii te ae- eior people deug wtb ber der irf inlit eo ng l ie xnigbt grad 17a11V haýve, ed1 lier mln a knowledgee of \u002blte beuyof siil~-Ille i,- î!le Ulbristsid(e ïin bisetlgwod lirelu le ruged tone fireplacer, a biIoieerre niu in Iber libra-ry v dirner, Fie augied basi, neeinglaugb) as the f iashetirross lis, mental vis- ion tbre Chirist'mRs be liat spent with Endspeople two years tigo. Llghta and revelry I Spiendour andi sumpt- uous feastingt (Guests erowding tbe grent rooms, atlfling wltb the per-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE fumei of ilot-hlouse bloorn! music and importeti entertaflers catering to the spirit of the 1uerry-making mansion! Iow he hati loathed. it ail for the. reagl CJhristrnas spirit was lacking. lI all that dazzling splendour, Enid- bis love-bati shone with lustrons purity as if sh. did not belong there. Born as bchad been to aknowledge of poverty andi working his way to the goal of bis ambitions--a protes- sorship in botany-lie bati scornied over-indulgence. Eniti bat known no otiier lite, Andi in bis foolhardiness lie bat doubtiess stampeti out the. de- sire that would bave spnrred ber soni on to attain biglier ideals. Footsteps on the floor above arous- ed the. man\u0026 from bis meditation andi he pauseti agaixi by tbe fireplace, lis- tening. O1l1 Rachiel back from the. city?1 But b. bad told ber to stay tiiere over night, that sbe rnight be the firat at the mnarket li the. rorning. Hie ralsed bis beati suddenly, a flashi of icredulity ligliting bis dcep- set eyes. Tbe soft swisb of skirts qouxided on the stairway. Hie leari forward eap$ry, bis beart pouxidiug witb the sweet mysterionaness of the. Jft 74\u0026ALt. 1\u0026L hall, tiiex as t parteti, the blaiz tbrew a ligiit ov twlligbt. It was thiew The. sane queel laughter glowxi eyes and the. g brown hair, coi] soft, .elixiging ge ber helght, anýJ touch of woma bim. Andi wit] sorness cf iiel «Exild t\" b. \"Robert-t-it was gooti of you ask me to corne,\u003e she began, the. rnn of ber voice sending the blondi pulaii bot throngh bis being. '\u003cGooti !\" b. mutteredth tiekly, was good of you to corne. 1 hard dfared hope for that. You see, the. c\u003c tage is uxiebangeti, anti I bave titi merry-rnaking to ciTer yon.»- CeI was not thinking of that when came,\" protested the. woman, a shad4 darkening ber eyes, \"I was flot su trorn your letter that yen wanted i for myself-perhaps only to ma yonr Christmas less lonely. There something about the Christrnaati that rnocks us in our lon)eliness,\" «Enid,\" broke in the. man, hunuý igto take bier li bis arns, yetci scions of the restraint ah.e foreeti lu on hirn, «surely you understood i better than that. Anl these inoni I've been crying out for yen. Son tirnes I tbouight the. eau of My sm must reacb you clparly.\" A sutiden illumination of the dE face anti a tired lîttie sigb, that voluntarily escapeti ber lips. «lp, haps 1 heard, bnt tiid flot uuderstwu You sec, 1 was very young in the. we of the. worth-wbule lite,» iii. wblsp cd softly, adding, \"So mneh has eu, ixito rny tif. since I left yen-»ý \"Years and years ago,\" the. m breatiiet heavily. «(Oxly last May,\" the woman srni wistfully. \"I did. flot kuew what n Iiterests might bave -crne ixito yç lite. It seemeti ixicreduble that ti sheuld remxain untauged. Ycn 1 thatthis is thefirst tine yonu h aiketi ne te corne borne-\" \"But, surely, Eniti, you kxiew itv yoar borne to come te wben yon wi cd,\" protesteti the. mani iotly. «Yen sent me ont frcrn the cottag qh, fl( ihPk ira u7 hfti - 49a ' tihe If laugi- OntstretV of the againsit",
         "i.g b, John Ru.well \"Suddenly the, wSna raim.d her head, ber eas luntinoim witli a my5tiýj ight.",
         "TUIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE lie bowed bis hecad in remeorse as the wornaui eenti.uued lier passionate out- break. \"But 1 was neot sure that I wanjted to corne bac~k uintil-uniitil your letter camne. Thien 1 could flot wait for the Christmnas Eve. No, you ace 1 carne a dayealr. Robert Standish ralsed lus eyca, but as lie met the glerlous radiance of lier face their siglit blurred. There was a ewcliarr te lier womaniliness that eiallelnged( hmii. Mysterieusly awect was lier ernile, as thouigli she liad lived thireughi more years than hie in their separation. Yet it were imnpos- Sible that slie eould have suiffercd mnore. And she had corne at biis cal. Su)pose she haad dcrnianded that lie go te hier peeples borne and bring lier badc.I te the cottage? Alluringly beautiful she stood by the deep arincliêir. Would sbe corne ne sUnleci ing s caugh ing s) prett~y Out. lkm. the glow ef stood tenise witb Ceniscieus ef a bis liead, glane- girl-wif e. le Ier figure sway- stronig arma. trie iire ot iii achinig lieart crushing lic alon.ate embrace. Theri toiward the deep leather cl ed lier gently down unti restcd aýgainst bis shoul\u003c bot face beut to meet lier «Oh, Robert-dearest- se blacici Ail those mon yen were. blaink,» rnurmii man, \"tliere were days net wem tb care te live. laihdevery extravagi thiuking tliey weuld rnlak yoen. Tt was bitterness, bý to loathe Iuxury and I or you 1\" HIe could not answer, sa siouate enasesthe d1e\u003c the tuinîlt in hi, ma. , lie uuderstoed wby lie liad ont bis entreaty for forgiý letter. lie w ( anedt ftite r sure of lier dear lips in the heur of soiil's outbreak. Thien iu the glory twilight, with the fliekýeringl, blaze the bireh. legs sbadowing 1the, laU\u003c ed roern, there was silencetw4 them. Suddenly the wornanii e 1 hcad, lier eyes iumnus whha n tical liglit, lier fingers tenling she rufdthe man'*sshkofli bair wilhlier old-timie p)layvulnE'ss \"Bobs, T forgot to tell yoen thai did flot ýorne alone. I brought,ý a gu1 witbi mc. Ife is upstairs inte u roomi-restiug,.\" End\"thie mnr broken, a cordant note lu bis voire. bu \"I- 1 cd only yotu te corne.J- up lie is oeue ef your own pel. \",yes, lie is eue of Ili pv pe, answcred readily, slipping f\"ri emblracew, \"yeni sec, I did tIc liow tbiugs miglit standbewn I tougit f Ibreuiglit tî[is gucat miglit lessen the catraugent-» «Enid, eouldni't yeo tut mlçl le give yen only gladness thiis Crsi tide V» \"I was net sure,\" alie pretested1 rnocking smnile lu lier bluie ee. sides, Ju-, the gucst I broi would flot let me corne wlleth Ie wonild bave rebellnd notstoî ily against my cornîng boere aie Êou will give liim a weleomec, WC yen! We liave been se liappy- niglit, tliat I1 dare asic thatý, ye'i oj your lieart even te your unbid( fhwe looking oat liglit of lier e.yca i. The sweotness e lice tbrillcd bis bce -ily frein bis chair, acrous bis eyes.",
         "THE UNBIWDEN GUEST c-aIlrz haei(k otl,\"I believe he will love it , RoetStaiffdisl movedl qlowly to- war' h irpae stretehlingý_ ont hlis hanii ïi a gcsture ofhcpeses lier pe pl an they. eo1uld flot leave . ti.!Ie aloile onle Chirisftmas evell. Jn1e- fhe d ilientioned( ]lisnc- na me J- lte brother, altoge,(ther por ;,z fin bis over-i 11dIlge(nc, eoairsýe i- his- gýariJh spienrdoiir, withi a Foottep ~onde onthe stairway. Ho mst sed imiseif f'or the inevit- able. ibut neo, the guest was stili in the gustrom. id %vas emn eager or one brief momelnt alone, withi ber. fin aehn a g11lmpse OF the- passion s1llbrerýI his Soul. '- wcr tlears1 ini thewomn' ec, bt-r thliglit on hrfc 'so wornou rndiance, and iii lir arnicz dowy fannl.A littie eooi,-. hif- profi4 ' ro h bun ind End' cli V ek -1 n clstoth bb \"Oh. l~ bcdi«n' lie 'won41erful?\" ~ o \u003c I ~ n v t h a t l i . i s a i l adih Adlejtdepssfls witbI li's blsd old ntrsu a Thie giriarmns held ont theoir bur- deul 'lai te mii, speeebless, with his her onîgse tlnmulltu]ously, tiil it rcntfed against his sleeve. In-. tinetively bIis arms reace out, draw;TIng the baby for[n close to hi. be'art 11u an ecstasy of embrace. Tho, wonm, standing beside the man lu the gloir of the firelight, reat- .d he.r ebieek against the baby head, prattlii!ig sweet - joyouly sireet - .'Oh, Junior, arent ire glad te get home te daddy? Just as if ire shrnild niot hiave known enouigh tri cornie witb- ont hlmii asking uis! It was yeur seveth brthdy wsn't it, littie Bois, thiat blesed lefter carne. Your maillmy didnt wntIo wait al day, butI ILI those fusçsy oldl dlotors just innad i s wait til] yen wvrc, three whiole weeiks o](1, bifby kiins. No, your ddy didln1t \u003ca sk yoli ta coi-la homei for Christinas, bu t Bobs Jiunior wasn't golngý to let blis mlother cornle withouit hlim, A szob 1t1agl o th nu in bnigover,ý Ilie trs I ae into the( gIrlisbli arma, \"Le(,t mec look at i'm vls oitr hcamrt agcain, deaýjreat,» he nstd,\"it will semmore real. No, I can't ht'- lieve it ye.It is tee vondeirfll., hoe prtstd is voice, hollow with hnliki- î içking inito theo deep armehaI,ýir, the girlimothe(r oplenud Up ther roll of fln- nul, iIangt1ie pinik tocs' thatt tIc ilîgi.Cvrn the tinyv rose\"- bud finigeýrs with lier kisestiid coxe vith a pretty teay \"Ju t ie quile, for your dady 1)ed yenoi go. Ileesspe o get and ail thosýe fieautiful, woodsey greens to banrg uiptoigt. Dropping on1 his ne the insuT reet- cd is rouli1, tne he gi thesaînydhekof thie be.Con- lbis bair, hep turnevd biis eyes, kindled\u003c, withi thet lighit (if adoration. toward lier. \"The iunbidden guest lias a111 (if nxy hieart as well as the hiosp)itality of thie lottage,»\" le laughedi gladly. \"Robs, dear, your letter only asked meo for tf li itatd, protosted the girl-mother. «'We're wa\u003citîig-- little Bobis and 1-to be asked to stay along-fis lolng--» The man leined forwirrd eagerly, bis arms reaehlng out and eircin _g tÈc motbeî, aud ble, For a long ilient moment lie kuneit there, boired beneath the sireet benedietien o.f bis wife and the littie uubidde.n gust, who had coine home to *fay.",
         "Miiar PIrîccs anb MJlar 'Zbri AN ANALYSIS 0F THE PURCHASING POWER 0F THE DOLLAR BY S. A. CUDMORE ASSISTANT PROFESSOR OF POLI1'ICAL ECONOMY, UNIVERSITY 0F TOROt :JRING the past fifteen or twenty years we ini Can- ada, in eoinnion with the people of all other civil- ized countries, have been experiencing a world- pricea-a world-wide fai sing power of the dollar. nomenon lias been giveii the diminishing dollar». ini the purchasing power bnhqa fr) r.nnq whieh 1 Deen mi ty of I Profeus books, Xoneiv' 1 at- have tjori- witlî ibis r of ir is tiatd izae woriu-wluu ri whîch too\u0026 place due to thes gre, world's stock of glupply o! gold wý 1914 iucreaaing n stock of commod a certain flxed a the 23.22 grains gold dollar, woul change for the sea modities in geneý for twenty years The question of lar, even before ti 2V b)eing a mnerely acaeideie( orw. Ail persons who derived their su] froin fixed salaries or. annuitil bond interest f ound their ecor position gradually beeorniing v Their llxed incomnes commande ahnost every year frein 1896 to a smaller stock, of oininodities thi the previous year, and it is on modities, not on gold, that one Wage-earners ,vere similarly affi but they w iere usually able, ly ai or negotiations or by the mere o tion of the law of supply and dei to secure increased wages corresl ing to the increased eost of living great industrial disturbances u, period. liowever, wePre Iarg.ly d the efforts of wage-earners to s these wages, and ighlt never liai curred if the puirchaksing pow, rnoney had remained rolativel) txonary. The net decrease in the purc* power of mouey before the wai been estiniated by our Labour DE mient at Ottawa. Aceording t statsties based on the average 1 of over two hundred counnodibie tieles which cost $100 111 1899, $135.50 ini 1914, an intcrease of r, Iv one-third, or at thp rate of 1",
         "WAR PRICES AND WAR THIIRTT could have bought for $100 at the beginning of one year, cost hîim $102.50 at the beginning of the next. This le a phenomnenon of ifinite imi- portance. When the purchatsinig powver of the dollar is rapidly deeiniing, it is uanally froin the ind(ividualns' point of vlew a mistake to save xnonvy, The interest wbich he earns on mroney saved is barely, if at ail, sufficient to make uip for the delinev in thie pur- rhazing power of the princilpal suxu. There is no doubt thiat this faet lias eontrubuted Iargely to the spread of spedthrift habits among our popula- Up to 1914, however, the decrease i thie purchusing power of the dollar was coniparatively slow and regular. Sice the war began, it lias been phe-. nomeually and distressingly rapid, and the people witli smail fixed in- cornes have been excefedi'ngly liard hit, Takig the figures fromi the Septeni- ber number of The Labour Gaze1t, 1 find that on» the average commliodities in general whieli cost wholesale $100 iu 1899 snd $136.30 ini August, 1914, cost $151.50 in August, 1915, $180.70 in Auguat 1916 and $245.00 in August 1917. This enorznous rise ini prices during the war is fundamentally different froxu the. slow, steady increase of the aut\u0026bellum period. Its cause is not au ierease ini the stock of gold, but a eres i commodîties due to the withdrawal from ordinary eeonomic production of enormous numbhers of men called to military servic-e, or em- ployed on the manufacture of muini- tions aud other war supplies, Raw materials, too, are scarce and expen- Sie boti Ïbecause of the lessened la- bour force available for their produe.- tion, and beeause of the enormous oousumption oecasioned by the war. The more rapid ris. ln prices dur- ing the peat year la at least partly Be.ouuted for by the. extraordinarily bad harvest of 191 in North Ameries suld gnrly throughout the world. The conomic atrain and stress pro- cluoed by this abnormal risc ln prices b\"e bVein terrific. People witli salaries and fixed incomes have fouind their position worse every day; wage-earn- irs, iii spite of their patriotien, have found themeselves fareed to strike for a living wage « To soin( extent, tlie rise ln tlie cost of food and elothing lias been muade up for by thv fail in rete bt rents theimelves, iii our Eastern cities at ail events, are niow on the upgrade. If this le to continue~ the future la dark indeed. Thle war' is not enided and will not lie ended for aniother Year., penliape for two. Wliat is t. become of uis if the! next yrear or two s'howv as rapid încreases in pries as the lastif General searoity and famine prives, eomplieated and lncrreaaed by enormnous taxation and] labour distuirb-, ances of ail kinds wlll be the onfly pos- sible outeomie if tii. ris. in prives con- linuies. llowevter, I believe that it will flot conitinuev. Witli considerable difflden'cv 1 woiild venture tc\u003e express tlic opinion that the ri,;v in prives lias well-nigli tourbed i ts limiit. The enormous inerease of liearly one-third in geuers.l price since 1916 lias been largely, if not inainly. du. to the. rrop failitre o\u003ef that y ear. With a reasonably good harvest in 1917, witli imnproved distribution aud more economnical consuraption, it seemas to me thait any inerease in renta, prices of metals, etc., wîll b. offset by the drop in food prives. 1 believe that, wliatev.r may bappen to the price of individual commodities, general price have nearly or qnlte reached their maximum. This, if true, is afact ofgreat sig. nifleauce. Froxu the, individuaPu8 point of view, it lias flot \"paid\" to save mucney in 1914, or in 1915, or in 1916 in order to spend it iu 1917. That money with its interest lias not i 1917 the. same purehasing power as the principal liad lu 1914 or 1915 or 1916. If. liowever, prices bave r.aehed their maximum aud are llkely to be soon on the down-gradle, saving mnay well be eneouraged. Savig, besides being a",
         "THE~ CANADIAN MAGAZINE highily pýatriotie duty, may.be exceed- ingly profitable to the saver. IIow will this happen? Supposing that 1918 or the early part of 1919 secs the end of the war, 1920 will wit- nes the beginning of a returni to nor- nllil peace-time conditions. l'le mil- lions of men who have been fightung, the other millions now emiployved ini maigmuniitions, wiiil once mlore be- conei producers. Matiy of the, womuen who have, taken the miW s places will dutcsremnain permianently i in-. duistry and will iii part miake iip for those wlio have been kîlled and dis- abled. Prodluction will go on with greatfer 4 floieucy thani ever before, for onr ninfcuesas wcil a,; those of otheýr cuteshave learnncd a great dleal duruing the wvar. Tlue reit of tins will be thiat the Presuen :tiwa-tiine scaircity of rommijodi- tics ion longer exist. The mnain ocause o! hil war-tlime pric-es will have pased awy and prices wilI a(;- origyfail, aind fall very consider- al.ThuWy will not, se far as 1 can se rainla to theoir 11913 paetm lev\u0026l, sue i ncreasipg stoc-k of goldi wilprnhnhl)y continue te diiui\u0026h the parehsin~Power 0! the gold d1ollar. fitis, th10 taxation rieciessary to Î!et 0h1ntrsto war-dubt will gen. eraly ncrasethe cost of producmig comodiiesof all ldinds. 'Allowung fortheLauini the purcbiasilig power of goId vand for war taxation. the prob- able ,%,-!ici O! genilt commodi0lties whiehL rcsn $36 iii 1913 wiil 1be 11me (hnr botween $150 and $0,or 1-t 1.- iay\u003e $160 ais aui average, for the sa fi f Sitl.pli(citv. andf base our futitre alc ltos upoi it. This nrleans that goods win AiiiAgnt 1917 cost. $2415 will in 1920 est $160-that goods wichl now cost $1.00 will then cent oilly 6.5 1/3 cents. Suppeungthis te be f airly accurate, what follows? Briefiy tua;: that as in former years it did not \"I the salaried man or the workma save on account of thle unicrease of eral prices, now it is going to them exceedingly well to save ot couint of the prospective fali of eral prices. The workm-an who $86 for a $100 war bond wiil prob iltid that his $1l00 ini 1920 will bila as mucli as $150 wiil buy Nomiially, indeed, the worker to-dJay ivests $86l in a. war certifi to reeive $100 in 1920, is car- abouit five per cent. per amni or money. Really and aotnially the )v er, who ilistcald o! speniding his xi aves it and ilivests it iii a war 1 will, if My e* elain Vre even proximnately correct, reeeive in in interest aniii ncra pure i117 power fromi tct t twenty per cent.f per inniiii for tie 't years' uise cf' , hii one. Similarl,those who are, abie ti vest miore Large!.y ini the Dominion boan will, eseilyif they re-in their interest, receive a boilltifiu1 ward for their thrift wheni the wz over and thc after-war declin prices has one, set in, Thuis, tliough saving at the pro timie miay be for mnany of us exe ingly hard ini view o! the high pr yet iwepersevere ini our efforts do save we are certain to reap a reward. Thiere lias neyer been a. 1 iu the history of the world wheu(\" in.- was more dlesirable and in co quence there has neyer been a. 1 whl-en savingis lkey to be more ply rewarded. The reward coni neot solely, net even mainly, in mioney paid to the saver as inter but in the increased purchasing po of the dollars which constitute principal saved and invested.",
         "HARBOUR 0F ST. IVES By Harry Britton One of the Canadîan Paînitig.eahl~ at the C.inadian National Exiit,,",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "BY HARRIS MERTON LYON 'R. AlIONOQUIN- TUTS PABST was breathîng dulcetly into the telephone : \"Yes, Samimy. Yes. Two for toniglht at the Garrick. If you'll be #,o kind. Nice little show, ainj't it? Yen. Yes. Mrs. P. sends lier regards snd said st niglit slie'd like to sec it. Ye.. _Well, 1 didn1t promise lier; 1 said I\u003ed sc you about it to-day. Glad the housea are so good. Yea. Well, Fmn-yes, I know liow tbey ui\u003et be running after you for passes. W.' awfully kind of vou to take care of me. Anything I eau do to return the favour-yoii know. Anid the wite wll thank you personially. Oh, you won't b. on thc door. I-ye., yes- I get 'emn at the box offlice?1 Oh, ihoe.ks! Just step upto thebox ofice sudj ask for tliem. Ail right; al rijght. Say-that was a peacli of a story yoil had i the papers this maorning. Iloneat. Don't want to gweiI your head or anything like that, Sauimy, buit-yes3--but thiat's the best ptunt that's been plilled in this littie old towu for years. Conigratulat ions. Congratulations. WeII, er--good-bye.\" ,%Ir. Alphons\u003e Quiutus Pabst put down the. receiver with a slow exhauet of bottled-up brcatli tlirough his lips. The little old town was New York. The telephoflic process just described i13 kuown as \u003c1,ummuing theatre tic- kets\". You do a four-dollar favour fo pres agent and then you try your best to extract four hundred dollars' worth of tlieatre tickets in return. for the favour. It requiire8 inucili dulcet breatli and flattery, and flot everybody cari dû it. Buti Mvr. Alphonso Quintus l'abat eouli. NIr. ])abat knew how to play the. New York garne, whieh is the epitome ot the Amnerican gaume. 'When youai e- pel air frein your lumgs it ia carbon dioxide gas. Nlr. Pabst knew the value of gas in, as the Fourth of July gasmen say, «tii...\" United S1tates_ Mr. Pabst was flot generally kunowi) by bis full and resounding and dlig- nifled name, Aiphonso Quintus Pabst. fle was, as a mile, addressed in a genial way as «P\u003eud\"- -Pud l'abat. This was beeause lie mppeared in eartlily formn as a pleasajnt, fat young person witli a beamning, 11oony) face as full as a cheese and supported by a coinfortable, well-fed extra chin, Rtfr. Pabst was comfortably ballaste-1 with fleali for a mn oily thirty-two years old. Ile was Comnfortably ganb- cd in decent garmeuits and lii. lite lay along pleasant, easy, liming ways; there was se mnuch oil in NMr. Pabst that lis ways were bound to b. smnootli. Air. Pabst, beiug plunmp and genial, smoked cigarettes- A cigarette look- ed exceedingly well iu hi. rotuind vis- age; a cigar would have leoked sliglit- ly ineongruous. He now drew ont a box ot eleven-cent cigarettes and lit one, inhaled a breath, blew it slowly through bis nope and along with the. sinoke lie blew a remark to the. office boy: \"If Mr. Biddle cornes iu, tel] hlma 1 have goe out t. lunc~h anud",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE won't ho back this aft-ernoon.\" Mr. Pabst \"rented» office spaco from Mr. Biddle. The quotation marks are thore to show that ho never, nover paid the rent. In ample, leieurely fashion -Mr. Pabst permitted the ele'vator te carry hlm down to the street, and here hoe paused. FIe was wondering whether he should go north on Broadway to the chop bouse or south on Broad- way te the rathekeller. Somehody had to pay for Mr. Pabst's lunch. His luck atood botter in the rathskeller. ~Bef oro ho got to his destination, however, ho met another-I was go- te say Mr. Pabst, but this person was thin and smadl and very jerky and nervous and important. Not that Mr. Pab~st was not important, but that thie was another sort of importance, this wuu the too voluble importance of a mnu net as cornfortably ballasted as waa Mrt. Pabst. The thin littIe man told how ho had landed a big story that morning whieh weuld net him eighty dollars before ho was tbrough with it. Then ho rapidly borrowed a cigarette. Thon ho a8ked Mr,. Pabst te come have lunch with blm. It is only due to 1fr. ?abst's insight and knowledge of mon that wo should chromlcle tho fact that ho wagged hie hoad and declind the invitation. \"I have another engagement,\" said Mr. Pabst. You see, neithor of them. had any money. lBy soin. oeeit precms, they neither of thein evor had any money, and yot continuod this miraculous torroatrial careor day by day 'wfthout famishing and vanishing into thin air. Instead, it was their breatb which vaniéhed, in a continual stroam, into the thin air-their earbon di- ozide gag. Mr. Alphonse Quintus Pud Pabst was a tipster; not on the races. net on the stock market. Ho was simply a newspaper reporter who bad esd for sevoral maliclous resnte re- port. That is, Mfr. Pabst said thoy were malicious reasons when ho spoke of them at ail; but he rarely spoke of them. And x'ow hÎs funqution life was to pick up the akelotona good \"atories\", choice morsels news, of sensation, of what for a b ter word let us cail ultra-tact, a sei these bare boues in Park Roiv cormorant city effitors. Fie circul; ed about the town and listoned gossip. In the gossip occaaionally would detect somethîug which woi look weII in printer's ink. lHe woij go te a telephone and aond iu ti '\u003ctip\" te a newspaper and the nov paper would put a reporter on t case te investigate ii. The report would find, cither that it was or w not true, and would thon write it i anyway because it was sucb ago story. As a tÎpster, Mr. Pabst w a mollifluous, roseate, pulchritudi ous muccess. Mrs. Pabst and ho wo clothes and, dined nt night. Almq every night. Dr. A. Z. Botts sat lu the rat skeller alone, thnumming on the ta\u003e] waiting for a New York waiter come and take hie order. F'irst ate a piece of the broad whleh w always statîoned at that table; th, ho drank a gulp of the water wjii some careless underling had plae* betore him. Then ho thrammied t] table. Thon ho ate a piece of brea Thon ho drank some more water. F had been doing this for fftee0 mi utes. Ho was gradually losing h appetite. Betore ho knew it, the amiable eh dow ot M.r. Pabst was lapon him. '«Hello, Pud 1\" exclaimed this il nocont man. \"Sit down and bal luncheon with me. Looking for an, body lu particular? Ne? Sit d- and oat with me.\" MIr. Pabst graciously did go. N Pabst was an ontertainlng talker. J lcnew overybody of importance w entened the rathskeller, and ho tol littie storles about them. (Yeuln",
         "He-lo PAd ! tc)aimed ihi, ivnoent man. SI', do-n tid mI -th \", -ts of germs and knives, andi foodi alyses and how a surgeon could le a dog's Ieg onto a ehieken with- t kilhing either the dog or the chie- n for at lest twenty-four hotirs; ~o spent heurs over a microscope, Brlng at a littie drop of something other; andi who studieti French iply so that he could'read the lat- unanthentic work on hypnotisai a cure for tuberculosi%-i say, Dr. ttas, ail wrapped up in this coin- med aromna of thaumatiirgy until liter.lly andi physicaily reeked ,h t,had veryIittle idea of those idily-colourod personaities whieh k. up the great outside world, of W Yeirk. Hie would not have known lian Russell frein President Taft, it hati net been for the newapapers ofren prlntixig p'ictures of both of 'M, Therefore Dr. Botta thought gicetly of 1fIr. Pabst. MNr. Pabst 1 once got hlm written up for pedy piece of snrgery at Bellevue. To hlm, Mr. Pabst was ail-powerfuil ia a vague world of s\u003c-are headles, editorials, and \"Snnday supplenients., Therefore, he diti a very unethioal thing. lie did not know any better at the tinie. lHe doe new. \"Why,\" saiti 'Mr. Pabst, merely by way of mnaking conversation andi with no serions intention in his mind, \"don't yen do a littie advertising for yvourself, Doet You're getting start- cd here in a pretty substantial way now. Ativertise the fact. Shoot the bunik into 'em. This whole town's nothing but bnk. hot air, big noise, The fellow that mnakes the biggest noise gets the goodc; in tht. town. Saine way ail over this country. Look at ail your higli muckyniuek surgeons with their rabbitR' eyes rfedot a coal miner, et ceter..» \"Isn't ethicaj,» saiti Botts crisply. \"I'd simply lower myseif in the esi mate of the profession, Can't eve put a card in h papers?'",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"Aw, I dou't mea.n thatl There's other ways of advertising yourself. Lot me do it for yen.\" Now atr last Mr. Pabst's oye. were glowing; his braiu was busy; he was on the scout. Here was something worth wastiug his time over. 'qI don't know-I've often wished I got more credit for what 1 do,\" aaid Botts slowly. «Now there's that case of arterioaclerosis ln a mani seventy- five years oid that 1-\" \"No sheutin that. Oot ta have a screeob. Something good and yeilow tbat'll bonce a feiler off of a streot car while he's reading it. Sormething like outtlng a mn's head off and-\" '\u003cHow, haw!W romarked Botta heavily. «Cnt a man's head off.\" «That's all rilht,\" retorted Mr. Pabst. 're pulled atories acros that were pretty near tbat bad. Lis- ten bore. Wn omako a bot V\" \"No, I don't want te, make a bot.» \"'Waiut to make a bot 1» pnrsued Mr. Pabst lu bis best New York\u003c style. \"Want ta inake a bet? If yon want to make a bot on it, l'Il juat bot yen five hndred dollars I eau maire yen 1niown frein one end of this couutry te the. other, frein Seattle to Boston, frein Minneapolis to San Antone, lu- aide of three weeks!\"1 \"Ilotnourably 1\" \"H-oinouraibly,» asaerted Mr. Pabst, a bit vagnoely. \"Juat as henourable as the microbe theory.» «If yen eau do that honourably,\" said the iuggish, Botta, awùoe and shining, \"l'Il give yen ftve huudred dollars!', \"DIouie \" said Mr. Pabst improasive- ,y, drawiug up his double chin with fIhmness and dealing- the table a good ,imack with bis fat baud. 1'IIaw, haw! Cro ahead J\" rospond- ëd Botts. ,cyou've got te stand by me clear tbrough it,»1 warued Mr. Pabst. «Got to, obey endors and do as 1 tell yen and keep your head elosed as to iiow \"Auytbling lu boueur,» assented Botta. ,,Wllen (Io you beginr' \"To-morraw morniug,» ansv Mr. Pabst. Dr. Botte paid the li coin- checkr and they shook hauds The next marnig lu the per; columan of The New York Heralti appeared the following amaziug maunication. WÂNTED-Â RIGHT EÂR. One sand doUlarb cash will ho paid for j human ear ini sound condition. sox b. mal1e, and Wny healthy men neêd M Addremm, Iierald\", 465. City dleeks ail oror tewu tE genulue thrill that morulug; by desirs i. moant those deuirs in r paper offices at which sit the o voreus insatiate pensons pelitely edcity editors. It isacn.torn f 1 remarirable meni to search eaj through rival newspapers every hunting for ucws which they car velop for their own paper. r select items whlcb have been pc \"ceovered\" by the opposition; find hits of greater stonies wherE opposition ha. slunred or faite they interview people that the 0 sition simply mentioned withaii terviewing; above ail, tboy seau the. greed of a fino-toothed eemb tanglod hank of niystery, the pers columun, whore woe or mania or sian is baif bidden and only obv te the oue pair of oye. it i. for. City editors go at su\u003cch ccolu with scissors. They clip items ingly out of such colmua. They p tiien onte pleces of papen and thiein asslguimeuts. They giv. t to their crack reporters and tell t to stay ou that job until they b: iu a Harouu-al-Raschid atory. a oneo f thein iissed the thegmýs dollar car. Net a eue of tbern fa te have bis crack reporter have laindlord addresa a letteof etuai .ons AIph fp1 4",
         "** s - ti thet,ý %ÎIe»cýe p .t M the .1.4 ecd galvaically undler the force of the hidden batter.y. On the third day the. slow anfolding of the mniracle b.- gan. Mr. Pabst's dalcet 'voice wvent over the wire to Ragg, city editor: \"I've gta line on thxe thouaand-dlollar car,-\" h. drawled. Ragg's eyes simply flared. They were old friends. He knew what was eomning; s0 he said : \"llow mach?» ,'1 don't know maich about it,\u003e' went on the imperturbable voice. \"AU 1 know lu that it is a feller naxned Botts. I Jooked throagh the directory and a;potted an A. Z. Botts, M.]),, that looked likely. He's at 26 WVest 56th Street. Coaldu't get anything machi out 4f hum, bat 1 believe he's the tel- low. 1 want fifty, Ragg. l'Il sc you later.»\u003e ,A. Z. Botts was the man; _Mr. Pabst go the , Mty dollars. But Dr. Botta would not talk. Botta was faithtal to instructions. That niglit Ragg\u003es 1nape carried as mach of a story as possible, phis a littie that was illpos- sible. The next morning the Bott8's door- bell was kept warmi ander the fevýer- ish ringing of reporters' fIbts. Aýise the hallway and the street in f ront, of the house were comfortaly filled with rag-gedl park persons wheo were willing to barter beth Pare and a leg or two for a thousand dollars. Noth- ing could be obtained out of Botta, biit there was a good baman interest stery in the poor, bedraggled wretehes whe thronged to sell a part o! their fleah to keep the rest o! it alive in a dreary world. Lady reporters, bru- tally knewn as the \"synupathy squad\", and the «sob aisters\", went out te the. Botta offire and interviewed wrck after wreck, getting a lit, story from. eaeh in whueh no mention of whiskey wvas made, although the lady report- ers came baek te the office saturated with its plaintive breath. More re- portera came; some from Germna papers. Those that were tiiere did",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE niot dare go away for fear aerneth would euddenly happen, and tl number was conutantly augrnented droves of freeli arrivais, spare ni extra writera, tipeters even, ané few police. Botts was getting nE ouas, but he etill held iran. His nu had been put in the papera new; rould not withdraw and say iti al] a sham. fIe could flot tell reporters anything for the very g\u003c reason that he did not Imow anyth t4, tell. Mrr. Pabst had net given 1 ariy vital statisties in the matter. q thing dragged on thrce days and atrain on al] aides wa-s intense. ready the Associated- Press was ginnlng te *hhnper the news (auch it Ves\u003e out through the country. Si day came around and aixewed unanimit-Y of Suanday editor gen by the fact that ne les. ihan f( coloured aupplernents carrled Ramie story, viz., a doctor with a gl kulfe frorn whioh droDDed real i torunat. Pl te segments ted line.~ 1 his hand on anad appeari toulLv ai i. INGT WORTH V A maihematic it out te arnni twenty-five thon low Lis arithmet ed the amuns ance companles anythlng fatal 1 and eyes of thei .Monday carne nesa. The. City ate. \"Give 'err Alexander Buah, 000l City editei phrase, «Aceuai acy,\". \"The fell ing graft onto eornebody, don't he? t teir an interview with han then lin w by he admits it. Then say lie was en couraged to do this because of 1a What'\u003es-his-names experiments c ýrv- dog. You remember the time ,mne grafted a guinea pig's tail en, he dog. No. Guinea pigs haven't v'as tails, have they ? Well, get the sira the of that operatien. Use this Bott.a )od Iow for your Iead and then switi ing and tell that. The people don't iim what they get just 80 yen give 7he sornething?» the This was donc. It had the de.E Al- effeet. It loosened Mr. Pud Pa be- tigbtly-cloaed fist and the news as allowed to be pub1islhed. In- \"Balloon Numnber One! 1' le the niounced. \"Tell me net in anour iua nuanhers ail the suckers are a \u003eur Now we'll shoot 'cm a littie pros the tus that will inake even the beoyi )ry The Daily (J.metery~ rise up and -ed pitate with April emotions.» ýss- It appeared on neatly typewri -in- sheets handed te every reporter ini- ealled at the Botta office that day et- bellboy in wealthy brasa buttons in a wealthier brase conversation hi ara ed eut the staternente. Dr. Botts en- not in tewn, but the statement .an enough. as Briefiy, it deposed that Dr. P was about te perferm. the. very A ficult operation of gratting a r W ear ento a poor, unfortunate P EF- burg millionaire, who, having hal roll steel ini hie earlier days and 1 -ed ing thereby cerne it an aeei\u003c nd which Lad deprived hlm of hie b.- and now having reached a on nt- opulence whieh demianded i Lr- quent presence at society funet",
         "\"GAS\" - t ,êt ,ver ge-itIcon. 1w saM exublwractlyau. Tb11- ' ank GA \" ymnent of a pink Pelluloid ear; but [in unfortunately the millionaire, nlg by this time rather old and ken in his nervous -,ystk-m-, had n frequently annoyed to find this \u003eiiratus beeoming detached when- r lie jerked bis head-which lie ; always doing-or whenever he qtehed bis head on the riglit side. ,0the pink began to change colour, 1 frori a nice ripe dentifrice hue beê.mne rather variegated and eking. Therefore, lie had deter- ledl upo» having a real live ear. ,j beig a mn of enormous wealth, intended to, have the soundest, Ithiemt ear lie could get for has riey. whether it fitted in with the ~era contour of his head or not, 1 *hether it resembled its left bru- r or the eolour of lus face or flot, ;idi wau the statement. It may at lfrnt appearance seeni to be a ,d pioeS of newspaper writing, but va eouiningly contrived su by Mr. uIt in the knowledgé that city edi- tors would find mucli food in it. The naine of the millionaire was. for ob- vious reasons, being withheld by Dr. Botte. This had the followiug remilt: that every enterpriaing newspaper in the city unearthed the photographs of ten or twelve Pittsburg millionairesq who had mnade their 'way up froni the rolling mills; that these photogYaphs were etrungr across the page, earh one having a riglit ear carefully painted out by the office photographer;- that the. query was printed above the string o! pictures: \"WICF ONE IS THE MILLION- AITRE ?\" Ail over the country peuple began talking o! the marvellous operatioti. Medical men o! al] sorts- mnd degre.. of intellect clipped out the item and pasted it in a scraphook or sent it tu other medical men for fear they liad nul seen it. The story of Cie\u003e de Merode and the question as to, whe- ther qhe wo-re lier bair dowzi over",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE her cars because there weren't a cars, whereas there was plenty hair, was revived and passed aroun A prize contest was conduicted lit New York paper and was miinick, ail over the country: twenty-five di lars for the best answer te the qui tion: \"Would you seil your ear for tbeusand dollars?» Miss Laura Jonu a New York stenographer, won ti~ with the reply: \"Olt, foot !\" Mr. Pabst kept duly out of sig while Bott4 went practically out bis mmid. Him life was a noisy nigt mare of reporters, reporters wbe we gettlng more and more obstinate their demanids for some practie proof that bis famous operation w te actnally take place. As joseph, M. Bunk, the world-rexiowned ma, aging editor of The. Wkoop SynG rate, phrased it: \"I don't mind fee ing fakes anid lies to the Aýmeric, pepl ninety per Cent. of the time, tbeyre gond fakes. But 1 don't ev( kËnow wbether tbis is a gond fakei neot ' Therefore Mr. Pabst lit a cigaret and said te Botts: c'This is a goc fahe. Pli stake my reputation as press agent that thus is tiie best thre ring, basdruam, fuxl-sized dirigib fake that has evor been fed out of barrel te a bungry nation. I sho lem!ý They den't want truth. A hy wat is tefr leaio f huink of trutb, and, se belp me Bo' lTIl gri if tan PmwI1 tinne in bis 1 i 'Mr. Pabgl was a Pittsb sure, he was der awhite wrapped np only the tip e as he Iay in Botts suite. side hlm lay the. nmmy car and peck This second Who bad Sn statements ai axy days before, The curtain s were, of An anmethetie silence permeat id. roem. Reporters were admittE a tiously on tiptoe and te themn ed with sundry soft deprecatory ii \u003e1- of the head aud bands, whispe 's- \"There has been se inucb fol al rumpus over this affair that I ,s, -seehow 1am going to beable uis Form the operation here. I t shall have te remeve them bot lit quiet place, if T can get thxe ne( of Ponvenienees there. No; 1 haveý it- gun operating yet\"-he had a re strained smnile on bis face as 1 i it; Botts hadl lost-fifteen poi ai weight-\"I couildn't ]et yen iý as know, if I had begun it. That as gentlemen. Please go ont qule, ri- do not think Tshalloperate i îi- City.\" d- Mr. Pabst riibbed his hande in when he went te be treated if Botts offlee for sore, thiroat, mn idea of Pud Pabst's that,» sa ir other reporters. \"le tbinks hi( on the inside if hie becemes a te of the dock\"Y )d Pabst ebuckled to Botts: a yen se. You're famons and two e- haven't gene by yet. It'a ail le ail bot air, al] talk, That\u003e. a a country wants.\" lie waved a w pressive, fat arn. \"The. biggest, Il of suekers narder the. bine sky . a bew we feed 'ein tus stuif. Il, b, instance, me-, Pnd Pabst-and i other feilers, littie fellers 11ki.xm st how we ean band it te 'enl Ri )r ber old flarnui's saying abou Sliking te be humbugged? B, )e onght to, have been a newspapei i- WbVy, I've put bum peIiticii ls office thiq way. Little me! P've it ed keep fellers fren gomng te th c I've belned gyiv, çYrqýh zç*p**ê",
         "££OAS» hw I go about it to be able to skini these people ail the time. «Whyt 1 firm1y believe they've got eo doped with dope stuif now that they don't want ta know the truth about al thing.», Ife atopped and lit a cigarette, a glowing fat youth puffed with pride. -You tadk about a free press, Botta. Rats! It simply means-the press is free to dIo as it likes. Somne fellow with a bunoh of coin etarte a newa- paper and begins Wo grind his axe. Ife pute a lime across the front page: \"The People's Forum\". Hlm for the people! - Yewithi anl axe. \"I think it must be because they are ail pretty insincere propostions themeselves. Mayhc that's it. Dog cat dog. Maybe not. We're going Wo Philadeiphia in an hour.\" Botta gasped. «\"What do wc wamt to go there for?1\" \"Carry out our bluff about this be- ing too much of a rough bouse to try to perform a delicate operation iný. If we ]eave suxddenly, they\u003eil spot P1hiladeiphia all right. W-, quiet.\" In Phiadelphia the noise got aroumnd-mirysterioiisly by telephone fromn New York, a day after Botts bail left. But the Philadelphia mews- paer men were unable Wo locate the faoua Dr. A. Z. Bottsanmd his pa- tient any-wlere. H1e wa8 at none of the. hotels, had appcared in noue of the. hospitala. Reporters stayed np ail night on the seareli, only Wo re.- turn tn their office-, andl be vieiouely .nrsedl for coming ba\u003cek empty-handed. Crack men almost lest their jobs through ineompetence that day ini Pbuladelphia. She wanted Wo beat ,New York out on the big -,tory. She faileil. At noon the tip went round that flotts was at the Beilevue-Stratford Hotel. They went here and found him. He was just slamming the door of bis room on the fifth floor andi bad big watch in one hanil andi his case of intuets ailpa**edup in the For Il,( tiret tirne in the w holusi- ness of the thousandi-doilar 0ear, [)r. A. Z. Botta srniled al genuino sile. \"It'~~ ail over 7ýnvue,- said e1xuberintly, als a mlanl whlo has Juet finishied al succerssful eperation. -AI over. Thanit God. A\\nd 1 have just five ilmites Wo ratchl my trali. Y eV, the, operation \\was very, very suieces- fu. Yles, I ay say I arn iiiightily relieveti. GÀood-bye.\" Two ilmys later Mr, Aiphonso Quin. tus Pabst, strolling down Broadway, smingii a cigarette, mft Býo1t. \"Itoldl yeu g;o\u003e' said Mr. Pabet. lal a mnatter of gas, gai, gi You donx't have Io mnean anythinig by it: just so it's entertainînig. Sec? 13yi the way, you owe met thant live huam- dred.\" 'A, wa just gassing mnyse[f when 1 saidJ that,» replied Pýabt, Mr. Pabqt gazeil at him xni](lly ai a man wbo ses thinig, far, fair wy For two moinents ho gazeil thuns. Theu hie reacheil ont anti warly graispei(l cýheerfully, \"you are, otie of usj. I gladl 'y we''lcoe youl inte the Amiint- c-d Fraternity of Balloon Ji;e Ped,(- iers. 1 maiY neot sec o ye agaiT ror sýix melnthe, but yon will muerced. Yoil have a gond Iung expansion, and you know how to express; yourqelf lu bap- pyv, mneaninglesa words.» Dr. Botta ]aad an air of miistit. \"Ooing mwily V\" \"Peuni,\"amnounet Mr. Paýbat hlamdly. \"Petuinia, thre Great Re- ,torative. Sundry mid-weaýtern legla. lators are casting slurs upon its fair name. The proprietore, have beekon- ed mne into thre KÇansas wild, P'abst andi the press muet save Petunia. Yoni know the flower; charming, redolet petunia. Wby Shotili net nature's; American noblemen quaif the essence of the fiower, anti continue tû quaif it and quaff it and quaff jt? In the ',pringtime at fifty cents a bottie; ini Octoher wbien the h.art is sadL\" Mr. Pabst lit a cigarette andi smiledt \"IYon will bear from Petunia andl Pabst in farthest Kanas.\u003e'",
         "ENJGLANJD INI ARCDS IX.-I*HB EHEMY IN ENGLAND ni o t inconsistent, 'h it is unfortiln- -bat those charac- ics wvhich, in time tee, are eounted te LtioU's credit, in tes stand to its dis- f 1alnfnl init\u003c the liîrre COU~ and the great pr the defe, bevomne 1 war a i risked. te morali path of altpred tory is ri part if] verse thau ever before \\vas bot grether even by the thinnest Vi The ancient Romans, whose do ivas more ambitious but infinit, effective and extensive, nev tempted the feat of welding sui fusqion of tongule, such divern character, suieh uincongeniai as Great Britain has governed out serions strife for geneT Neeessarily it had perfore ti government of indulgence, of i sions, of licenee. To weave in fabrie the Scotsman and the and the, Obinese, and the hi distinct units of a hundred con the world, imprinted that cj 'Englisb character whîeli has him a cosmopolite. Tt has bis mind to a thousand vagai individiial belief. Tt bas -open hand to the puny communities tant sections which would havi beneath the notice of any oth tien. Tt bas opened its doors 1 i t Ownî ontcasts, d with !OWP Up a firm clonsm(er oniy vioI~ Behind Eng1art of the enemy in prineiples af gov lield tegether an",
         "ENGLAND IN ARMS France and Spain and Italy found a home there; the Nihilists of Russia fled there before the sword of unre- Ienting Czarisxn; the polit leal out- cists of a score of eountrieq swarmied te the littie, island( that refused to 2ive thein up Io the, a7vngiig hand of Uieir own counitres. And, mnorv dan- gereus than aIll thev spie(s of the( ina- tiens that tragin spiues as, a featuire of tbe national systemn, foutnd there their mnart of exehiange, their de1vinq grenind, their inost, profitable source of the informiation which mniglit some day be u1sed agzaintf thle oulntry'N that Rave themn shelter. It lias al1way'%s heen presented as the best jus-tifie.i- tien (if this attitude that the Annr- c.hit and tbe polit ienl exiles who ba;rbouir the-re haveý thirown aud their dwngereus tenets in their relntionsqhip te England_ But il i- a defence whlèb has been repudiated more often thai bias been mnade public and frein which couit ries frienlyv te Great Britain have suffered almirost wltbeont protest. When Winstor Churchill turned maciihine guins on th~e foreign crîmmials of a street in gî'astEnd London he was but laying the. fouxidation for ain v nl1ightenlment whicb bias been sprcading over 1Eng- land sinice the greatest war in his- tor revealIed new national prin- ciplea. But tolerance \u003clied bard. [ndeed- it is not dead, thougli the Empire pays for it in human blood. \u003c)eeý itý let these truths pene- trate ini any examination of the treat- ment that bas been ineted te the .nemnY allen in Rngland. No nation, and especially not England, ean throw amide the principles of geniera- tinthat bave bulilt up) siuch an Em- pire, Add thereto the sporting lu- Stinects of the Englishmnan, the desire to give even the most powerful and Mpaig enemy the privileges of open combat, and there opens 1uP morne- thngo the reasons behind file Ipni- ee whieh met the. fernian and thle foud .er homes in the British Taieq. Cnsier therewith,~ tee, the freedomn of action which these%( for- eigLners enjo ' ed for so long thalt they had1( becu able to miake themaclves.ý powers in flic liidf baci(kedl by the officiai support of thieir own govern- mlet s5, alided by flic co-operat ion of a million felIlow-e\u003cnitrymefýi n la ther par-tq of the( wvorld. These men hand wormedi their way into thle very na- tional frainmork, of finance and in- dustry* and commerce, even iute poli- tics,. They hand qtormned woeiety' with godI( iindi kirigly* honours. They laid mnarried their sons sud daughferi to Englisil dauglitersand sons, offen, if is certain, mierely in pursuit et the eommon aini of inifluence. They hand wvon or putrehased stauuehes(,t friende. in civil as in political life. They hield mnany oftheli imposing properties whieh eommanded respect and suh- servienee as anelent rights. la tbe lieouse of Commions were ardent dle- fenders whose ilonesty hax never bePri imnpuge'd, als Weil as a few oithers whose, motives mniglit well be ques- tioned. Se that wben the, war broke nt fheY had behind themn thle Englisi, wall of tradition, file flrm support of influiential friends, the trust et *.he powers who alone eould curtail thoir liberties, and the pride of the Eng- lisilman who diodainq te excite ili- self over any peril. Tiley were mnany times entreneiled. To the mnan on the street it would seemr te be file part ot wisdom lu- stantly te proteet fie nation against tlhc machinations of thrc enemy resi- dlent. B3ut the man on the strict fads file way te action long. Canada, aq well as En gland, bias been indul- gent te the (4erxnan ln if.s mnids. The politiclan is bound by different viewis, by differeut motives and ucesesities. Tt happenied that in fthe British lieu1se at the outbreak of war the Home Office was under on. whose sympa- fhies were loyal enougil but more axe- fively teleraut. Indeed, the. hend ot thxe office has af ail thnes eoposrned himslf witb the enemy allen snd bis rightr, snd poe tu oe Chan is",
         "THE CAJADIAN MAGAZINE agreeable te the publie and te, hie tellow Ministers. Tt inay be more the fauit o.f the estimated dies ot the ofice than of the maxn himsqelf. Wlth the deelaration of war nothing was done te, Contrel the ,py. Evid- ences of his handiwork were rot only suspected but revealel li a score of Cases. Prexuinent Gernians, Icnown te be lIn the f aveur of the Kaiser, were affrded their customary liberties. Enemny firins whose interests were wvholly Germran were perniitted te enduct their busixiesses along the usuai lines. England, with its eycs firmnly fixed on the star ef its lofty priixeiple in entering the war, was far ahove the crude pettiness of li- dividual coercion and limitation. Glowing speseches, that mniglit have sounded weil iu hlatery bad Great Britain won the war during the first four months, were délivered by the page to convince the public that we were wagmng war on Kaiseriain, not on the ipdivldual Germnan. Tt sounded well, but the publie was goixig ly sight net by souxid. And iu the meantima the individual Ger- manxin many cases was doing his ut- the war drt snd Austria eut natural eording te t to preveut. plain Joneu( on the froi place te goo out changin by the press of helplessn\u003c terminatien exact retril mans who their homela a German cc ln a foreign ing hisGern effeect on the Only whez 1915, dropp Britons and the public take the course et inte its oewn hands. Each ra follewed by rieting in the PF et Lon don that threatened more than the destruction if German sheps or înjury to Germans. Tlo hold the miob ir the Governmexit was forced t. steps te interu 20,000 Germiai Austrians throughout Englan haste the ixiteruments wcre é upen, but it was noticeable tin, the uninflueitial Germians touched, with here and there note te, make the total builk The relegation te private lite Prince et Battenbcrg- frein hii tion of autherity iu the niavy c the war was but eue ot thecse pandering te, public clameour A realizlng the justice et thie p At thc turne the interninenta mencedl there was establilhed P vlsory Conunlttee whose dutfi apparently beeni te find greut excuslig preminent Germans Iiternmexit, net te interu. Tn Eist of axigry queries whieh hav, threwn at the Geverument b thusiastie Britous in the Houae, are. remarkably tew replies po te ixiterument upon the advlee ( emmittee, whilc every lerm large lias been protectcd by i perted findinga. Ail ever En well-known Germanq weut aboul daily work, neot quiietlyv an(d ir sivcly, but beasttully. M a stances have been quoted ef a ixig ridicule ot their enemies. cau't intemu me \" lias been lutiri impuident Gexmans lu the fai angry tathers whose sens have threugh the release ot inforru that eau have been obtaîned1 through sples. In the turne of Asquith tIie",
         "-~ -~ ENGLAND IN ARMS land distiirbed and suffering from a war that ineonvenienced him littie. He wasz clothied and fed and waited upon as fewv Englishmen. His wife was9 pald an allowanee of from five to, ten shillings a week more than that allowed the wife of the British soIdier ftghting in France. Ilis business was mun for himn, either by an English de- puty who paid him the profits, or lie waa, permiitted( occasional freedomn to ovemc it. In the two years and more of the Asquith war Premier- ship scarcely a German business- was eilosed down, aithougli hundreds o! tbmi were. tbeoreticaily under con- trol. Asquiith's lax mnethods mnade action repugnant, ini spite of the con- stant protea8t of an influiential press. To be sure Enemy Trading Acts were inroucdintended to prevent enemiy profit, but there was notbing to prevent a Briton carrying on the busine-ss ,,nd pilinig up the profits to b. paid the Oermian proprietor after th. war is over. lMany of these G1er- nian firmns even secured large con- tracts from the Goverument at the expense of the British firmis. The entry o! Lloyd George into the. fieldý proînised more than it e!- fectedJ. lie foundf himself faced by a people m[oreý intent on the noise of proteat thain an effective action to ssqiafy thait proteat. They saw and rsented the freedom of the enemy in the country and to somne extent backed the steps necesa,,ry to curtail it;: but the ways o! the. country intervenied, and had it flot been for papers like th Norttheliffe press there wouldl have been little more donc th.an to interii s fcw, powerless ierchants who hiad thns fiir escaped. Vien, too, the Court of Appeal came to the protec- tion of the Germnan. Taking advan- tage of the laws o! the land-laws lie would have lauglied at in his owu conr-many a German secured bis liberty. The Court of Appeai delrOtbat a German at large in d n lan]i not an enemy alien, and debte were collected on the streirgth .f it. Lloyd George did, without delay, v place in initeýýrmuelit Sever1al o! the best known Germains whose imi- mnunity hitherto had beeu a mat 'ter of manrvel and whose brazennes; threat- enied a popular uprising. But aiways there was evident a desire more to ap. pease the public than to effeet. a puib- lic benefit. From the beginning the eocreion of German subjeets and niaturalized Germans lias been witli a view to exercising officiai control as little as Possible. The Hlome Office, driven by a group o! influential Britons who4pe sympa- thies fromn the first have been with Gcrmany, has undertaken the came o! the Gernian resident, and liloyd George's Administration lias aitered this attitude little. Officiai appeals were sent ail ov,-r the country for firmes to engage interned aliens. There wau, nu doubt, the excuse thiit it would save the expense of lnitemn- ment, but there was far more te danger that these moen, who had beaui considered dangerous enougli to look away from the public, would lie able to resuime moot of their former ac- tivities and opportunities for evil;, and there was the subtie folly of se- euring good jobs for ai foi, whose re- lentless style o! war!are placed thi be.yond more thani inere human con- sideration. The move was diseounted fromn the first by' the indignant re- fusai o! empIoyersý to tlimow open their shops to tbe Penmy. A comimittee haid beau formed early in the war for the benefit o! the alien euemy, its funds provided by soxue o! the best known natnralized Germans, German admirers, and paci- fist\u0026. Iu the list were included such significaut names as Hadan~e, Beit, a promineut Goveruiment Officiai. and the Cadbury B3rothers. The influence o! the. latter wae great. As the pro- prietors of two London daily papers, they bad beau insistently declaring f rom the firat rumours o! war that it was impossible, that Bxritain iun- derstood Gemmany; anid ever aine, qq Quaker--, tl\u003eey have beeau din",
         "THE OANADIAN MAGAZINE suoh a word dare be mentioned. Public difguat expressed itself meSt effectively when a county Prisoners of War Coenmittee returned Mr. B. Cadbury (these are the (Jadburys of cecoa faine) the five pounds hie had contributed, on the ground tbat they could not accept it ini the face of a personal contribution of £750 and a firin contribution of £1,500 to, the funds for interned and uninterned aliens. This pro-enemy cemmittce was constantly at work endeavouring te case the lot of the enexny alien, sollciting work for him, purchasing luxuries denied our prisoners in \u003cJermany, and generally presenting his en8e te, the nuthoritiesa ind the businesses iu course, Here sud that had eye was took up a reason but that they might their former methods of life, on their incomes. Hiere anc Germans who had been interi appeared ini their old haunts ý public explanati\u003cin. For se these someone had -one bail, were allowed out for a sort of h and still others were released word of influential friends or knôwn resens. The lot of th( in interninent continued te, b fortable. At the time when tli try wus rationiîng itself, the Gi in Doünington HIall and Ale: Palace were allowed mueh largg supplies, and only when prote made in the flouse was a chai troduced. To-day, when tJiousî homes are unahie to, secuir, through transportation diffil Alexandra Palace is amply si An example of superlative i to the German is that ini Donn Rall there are 115 servants t, on 389 German offcer. And stili there were at the 1 of 1917 about 22,000 German Anstrians at large, lese, than U, thein women; and at the hast r given in the flouse several thoi were living in areas that are prohibited. where the meet va information is obtainable. One mnent CGerman purclxssed r. through his son an estate wll mile of a hili eommanding a. view over the ses, and in the it was stated that lie lied been a] fined for trading with the eneni bis son for showing a briglit Ji, night. An uuinterned Germi arrested wvith important secret tary documents and an officer' bag ini bis possession, with G csiling-up papers in hlm pooke eejebrated Austrian Painter a row been taken into custody (h Was fOuffht ont hefa, fl-A.",
         "ENGLAND IN ARMS land of bis birth, w; weoll of bis eumnity to \"the predatory Serbiani natîin\". A Oerman was shot by ant offleer for iii- trigues with the latter*s wifie, after the police had knowni for mionitlîs kt' bis enigin and bis associationi withi a womnan executed as a spy. Two fouln- dations of German mnonksz wvre unttil recently allowed comnplete freedom in England. On the very day the papers announeed a fine of £100 against al B3ritish engineer for, attemipting to purchase without a permit a pistol for experimentinig, the Eniglish Coni- mul-Genieral for Montenegro arrived ut a summer resort in England witb an Auistrian valet who had been ex- emtd frem internment by the Home Ofe.Several Oerrnan women have been fennd doing service in the homes of British officers. The British wife of an interned German was reently lightly fined for attempting to pur- rhsse an aeroplane se*ating four and capable of flying to Gerrnany . A\\s tiiore are many (lerinan escaped of- fiens stili at large the affair assuimed a serions aspect. Svep the Governimen)t itself seemed dipsdte do its best in its own de- partments for the Germans. In the entral telegraph office were, at one time since the middle of 1917, eight men, ini addition to Belgians, not IBri- t-born. A young mnan who elaimed ,xemption from military service on the. ground tbat bis parents were Ger- man wss found employed in a Gev- pmet telegraph ofice, througb whlch the most important secrets pass- ed, although substitutes offered theni- ~Ie.The assistant constructor at an important dockyard was the sor ,)f a tGenian father and had visited Q7ermaniy shortly before the war. A natiiralized Geninan was pcrmiitted te liys close to a large acrodrome. The gise f Bloekades appealed for the xeptlon of a young Germait on its ,gmff-and the tribunal granted it. Aý 0nn f German descent %vas appoint- ýd 13nitiçh Commercial Attaché at rhe Hsffl, althengi' bis brother liad d1ready been convicted of disloyalty, aild only the peirsiltIliet olutcry or' thw press obitained udis sa after thec (-overtilment bad once refuse(] te yieldl to public indignation. In1deed, froni the first it bats be vonstalnt struIggle1 betweeni the public and the Government or certaini pow- erful interests in the Governiment, The latter have Stendily rfsdte take the, steps necessary te everceme the spy evil uintil they were forced te it by the people; and evenl thl e Eglisbl people have endured what fewý o)the(r c!ounltries would permit. New ami theni soine public body witil Sufficient power te inake itself heard bas acted. -School trustees have dismissed their pro-German teachers, snd won their cases when the law was appealedt te. At lest one University rid itseif of two or three Germun profes.rl after the Germait naines altracted public- attention. The guardians of a sqpe, cially' fitted hospital re! useil te av- cept more Giernlian wounded wheni they% found that tbeir enitire main bilding was filled witb 1,700 Ger- mans, wbile in the annex were a thon- sand British. As the apparails pro- vided was unexceiled in England, the guardians claimed that it eei, should be more largely open to Bri. tisli wounided. Inail this favouritirn te the Ger- mils were bouud up the energies of the pacifists and conscientious objec- tors. In public meetings before their friends, in their owu press, in the leuse of Uemmons, the most was miade by these meu of fair treatient to the enemy, their ides ot fairne.. being favouritisin. E1very month or two a question was ssked eencerning complaints about the the food at the interninent camps, altheugh the ra- tions were superior te, that whieh was allowed the Britisb soldier, No cein- plaints seein to have been made at the. vamps themeelves. but there were, ai- ways triends in the lieuse anxious to ferestail rationiug. The. sanie influ- ence that rendered the, British bloc- kade se ineffective uuutil the Unuifed States aeted was at wqrk freni the",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE beginninig of the war to protect thte enemy \u0026lien i England. «While Great Britain wasa llowing to percolate through its blockade net the very es- sentials o! life i the enemy countries, is was alsa handing out tû German prisoners anxd to the interned treat- mnent not aecorded our own soldiers at home and not expeeted or asked for our internied in Oermany. But the question of the blockade ineluded other issues that bound Great Bni- tain's bauds, releasing thein onfly when the United States stood behind it at the source of supplies. Whiit tem- pers one's sympathy with the diffilnt position Britain finds herseif iru in supplying neutral eountries is t that food was even being shij South Ameriea. Yet it is not for Canada to ci En gland's pacifists have never I lowed the freedom o! expression ed by a few traitorous spirits î ada; noir lias such political Wi mnade of pro-Germans in Engi bas characterized political ope in Western Canada. The band enemy aliens is theoretically of plan and action, but in the day life of a nation, even s there are interests and infiluen2 seexn wilhing to sacrifice the c to, the worst o! focs.. The next article of this series will be \"Mhe Humnan Side\", describing vellana work for the welfare of the distressed in England.",
         "The Canadian Magaine",
         "pssthe. 1»raing by Louis Ratmackeru TEE CHILDREN 0F BELGIVM",
         "Fingýr TFNaJ M,11 ltqut\"batlç the Mar. tit Caniaba BY LAURA B. DURAND ,TIONS 0F ME,ýHANICAL DEVICES PROM PHOTQGRAPMS BY COURTESY 0F HART HOUSE !SMM E most important and most splendid problem eonfronting us in Can- ada at the present time ia the equitabie return of our civilian armY to ristrial life of oui' counxtry. dl it wiIl reniai» the pararnotnt em until it la, righitly solved. is one whicb appeals universally r patriotim and imagination as dians, as well as powerfuilly to ieonomlc interests. Lt is a pro- net only of to,-day but of the e, demanding co-operation in Iutlpn, t» whieh every Canadian d contribute hi, quota of effort acrifie. F'or the iusnuer of that on will materially shape oui' na- \"This la net ,sy ate withi ail others to raise the( coxa- mulnit 'vWith ail its Unite to the high- est plane of efflciency. The sentimental aspects of dealing wlth our retiurned soldiers sud sailors aire familiar to tia al], and have ton long aetuated the conduct of the pub- lie snd formed their opinion. Lion- izlug and entertaintuent are but fleet- ing expreasiQns of the eountry's grati- tude. We must face realities. The Government is doing its part most credtabl, ud publie endeavour should fily support its plans and provisions. E very industrialiit, every employer of labour in every Provinoe of the. Dominion is more or less deep- ly concerned in the return of oui' men to industrial lits. They owe it as a patriotie duty te sist the state in replacing and retraining disabled soldiers. But in doing se their pri- vate interests will -not gliffp Pnu i-",
         "Panuramic View of the. gardens of iC (Reproduc.d h) vourteny of the , Take a conceret. instance : John Smnith is a crippled soldliir, with ai famnily, drawlng a pension based on, say, 100 per cent. of disability. Whicb) is the sounder eeonomie policy: to maintain that cripple in idlenes for the balance of bis life, or to make him employable and productive, and bappler mnd heaithier for being fully occupied and iuseful ini the commun- ity t Our returned men sbould realize, however, that, while the. nation is un- der an obligation to rebiabilitate thern te the. utinot as citizens who have bc- corne dimabled in our defence, they, on their side, bave stili a part te per- terni withln the limit of their capaci- tics, and toecontinue to be good citi- zens. Tiie MilltarY Hospitals Comnmis- sion was appointed ln Jnne, 1915, by Order-in-Cýouneil, to deal with the. situation created by the war in Can- ada and bias niow a higbly organiv and efficient systemn operatiz througbout the Dominion in evei phase of caring for returned meu. lias welcomed the. assistance of pu riotie citizens wbo have given ai equippedt convalescent hospitals ai bornes, but bas not relied upon thi source for the purpose. Tii. Commi Rion now operates fifty cenvalecei bospitals, provides accommodation twenty-two general hospitals, li, tbree clearing bospitals at the pori conducts four sanatoria for tube cular cases, uises sixteen sanatoria b sides, and cares for cases of ment disability in the principal hospita for theinsane in Canada. It isechee iug to learn that fewer of our ni( have been blinded in the war up to t nri.nt, tint titan waa ffaarçpd- Of t]",
         "diritary c0ovacuent HospàtaJ, 1917. .ILC., Mr. W. E, Scgworth) t'a Park, London, the great lu- )n for the blind established by rthur Pearson. Here, he re- 4imen are learning with unex- 1 rapidity and facility to get ,ter of their handicap\". Sbllnded men have returned to a, three of whom are being in- dl, tw\u003c\u003e are filling good posi. xhile the other four do not de- iiatrative purposea the pitals Commission is di- 'ur branches, each with itor, dealing respective- portation, discipline and ýth hospitals and sana- thi buildings, works, @e., ational training and re- mining engi- sat named lily efficient Çidner, MIr. Segsworth impresaes me as a mani of exceptional energ.y and enthuasm, pmsssed of a thorough coimprehen- sion of the seope and vital imnportance of the task lie has undertaken, and a deterinination by employing the best mnethodsand enlisting the co-operation of ail the people, to sec it through, to the credit and welfare of Canada. In October of 1915 an inter-provin- cial conference took place in Ottawa and a farseeing programme of pro-. vincial organization was adopted. This entailed thic appointment of pro. vincial comissi,,ions to co-operate -with the central body in caring for return. ed men and replacing them in indus. trial life. The Ontario Soldiers' Aid Commis-. sion has its headquartens at 116 Col- lege Street, Toronto. Mr. W. W, Nichol is the superintendent of re- education for the -Province. Ini an hour-s coinversation he reviewed the",
         ". 1 Fixed Wkycd. *th a)umme.tq emshe lias in hand, re- chat ive have about 350 da o! ccupations tor rio. Up te Septemtber ta been providod for lu f thone, throughi classes ned snd the teehulcal e Province. W. wore rce interrupted by re- one reportlng his time mae in the Moler Bar- nas IL right yet re- A sec- tuber- mlonita atter ai route mawr\u003cvh, and veloped tutberculosis. Mr. Nivlhol foresîees the solution re-eduvat ion of returuied men biy ti, emnploymnent iu private factorios j 4hops. A vory fair gygtemn of mF tenance of amanand is family wl lie la undergoiug tuition bas h, organizod by the Mlilitary HIompil Commission. Ovor fifty men, so 1 have availed themselves of this op7 tuinlty in Ontario. A 'busins loge has been opened in the Cent Young Nien's Christian .\u0026umioati lncluding classes in tolegraphy. Pr ary education clases are very p« lar, and it 1, the dotermination ot Commission to roturu no illiterates civil lite amontR mon capableof lea wasS ravouraeiy YOOI' bol. The. lad, *1* h; grapher prier toe nl, seen active service, i seau, having talion a 264",
         "Circumduction Of Wrist tenth, only, ivili require re-education. This phase egin, uaually, until a man red froni the convalescent rt in some cases whilr stili it and attending vocational bas rJbçsen bis new occui. is privileged te begin fils coneurrently, bel ore dis- ents are on the roUas \u003ecational classqes and !reasing since attend- rnmnnmi'v. A vnpri.. apprirently, along witli a worlcing nie- quaintance with induatrial life, Re-education falls into tw\u003e phlisel 1, Fuinctional re-edueation (physi- val training). 2. Vocational re-educantion. This latter, again, lias two phseos (a) Colivalescenit work. (b) Industrial wrork. Vocational convalescent work, now conxpulsory, bans proved to bave a higli therapeu(tii value. This new order of thinga iq hailed with immense satisfaction and relief by' administrators. wbose deepest dre.ad is that returned inen mnay lie. corne \"'instituitiona.lized'\", Ever vPre. caution will bi, taken ta make sc disaLstrous issue of the warimoibe The temptation presented to ,heýr n to idis eonstant. For from aie 10 tbree years tlx'ir eomnillnding oers bave thouglit and plannedi for tiiem, tbey bave been fed ami cýlotbe,I uIltil personal initiative bias been almost ex- tinguished. After the miffering from their wounds was allayed thley spellt weeks and montha in, bospitals and convalescent bornes in England ini a ___j",
         "forWa~ Sotmiff .an\u0026k sate of painpered and glorified ille- nous. They have been weleolnod homo as hava.,, but they mruat be preservedl to Canada as mci, and] re-trained ILS prospective citizens agalix. Diseipline 110w reqnires evsry lit returned mn bo parade for work dnving live honrs every day, one hour being devoted to physicai exerelse. One half-holiday a week only is allowed. Th'e pro- grme for the day is very fual ml.zssad workrooxns are jxrovided in or niear the bospitals. Men zuay reniew acquaintauco wlth sehooI books or seok training in new arsIand handierafts,. in typewrithxg and atençgraphy, bookkeeping and related brarchem. Wheeve condi(itionis are favourable their attenition la directed to garden- ing, poultry farmiisg and bee-ke the work being m.ade profita\u003e thein by flic sale of their pro It is thoughit thiat if an attractlv settliment policy is adopted t- Commission the strains of choir bc trned frinc~ «indoor jobW\" t direction. Lookinig to the futt mnotor mneehariies the Commls devoting mueli attention o doe ment of that induatry. And a mt ujew industry will be opened up of orthopedies, or prosthetia",
         "LIQUIDATING THE WAII IN CANAD\u003eA nd private energies com- la stiil tlid, cvory da\u0026Y th Ynew and better dvcs ,entrated anid deep je the sire of the Frenehi people le, initerests or thev who1le the legisiation adopted ie-9 to ho ideal. 1rfso ident of the Cmiso c~ de France,. lias hevn f'or Sexperiîuenting ini hinian ind is, perliaps, the inost ed mari ini the world to- !aelinig is very i7ifluientiail treatmient and re-ndura- ýtainl is highly orgallized sauires, as in ail depart- !military service. Inideed, led developmnent ini the, eornvalesvent ,ioldiers by ms hias been eul d e h lad organized inistitil- s phase a numiber of cen- 4iCominand De(pots» had it by Major Tait NMeKen- '. , ait the instance of Sir gh, D)iree(tor-Gieeral of rviee. Major MeKenzie, who is a \u003cJauadian by birth, anid formn- erly of flic staff of MjcGilI University, Illete profeýssorsliip of phi«ysical training in the faclity of dhit Seli- (1cu iii the Uilivcraity of Penulsyl- vania. lreeigte England for milhtary* duty iii the, sprinig of 1915, lie wa aaehied to the hevadquarters staff' at Aldershot, in physical inspee- tioli. hi1 the' pursulit of bis duties hie swgrvat numbers of disabled mn loafing Ii Red ('ros Iospitals and regmenal epos, selsafremn every stanidpoilit, a burdenl Io itemeelves, and rapidly deterioratinig itnto in- validiam under thc eombinied influene of sYmpathy aild idlinesa. In hiLs re- port lie urged the segregatien of ti class in rnilitary camps where physival trvatment ceuld ho admiuistered. This WaS in \\Auguast, 1915. Hae waa in- structed at ontc ta organize tiie de- tatilq, and ini two ioti' lime had ustablished the first command depot al Ileaton Park, where lu \"huttmenta» over 4,000 niient were assembhled for fiunctional rc-education. 1 was so) fortunate as te) soeure an interview with Major Mc(Kiinzie whlea",
         "TIIE CANAIMAN MAGAZINE he was paasing through Toronto ini Septernbr haing moieted the sur- vey f te fild or fnetonal re- education in Canada on instructions froni tii. Military flospitals Commis- sion. Ile said that bie Lad fort\u003e' mas- seuses and six tnaseunq on Lis staff at Hleatoni. Fouir of tiie latter were totally blind, one, Private Milligan, of tiie Irish (uard, Living lost Lis sight at Mensq. Tii.\u003e Lad boen trin- .d a masseurs at St. Dunstan'., Sir Arthiur l'eiinori', famnous seloi() for disabled soldiers, and had bccomo ex- pert in tiie art-Lhopeful, happy, cil- gaged in intersstin'g and reinunera- tive work. Ther. are now nixtcen coinunand de- pot* lu Gret ritain, eacvh withi a eapaelty of front two te four thou- snd mien, The. Canadian hospital at Rainsgate lias aso a depTartmenVlt for Physi cal tb.rapy. The, objecta of the dpots are: to retn ever\u003e' avuilable 'uin te active service, to returu mien fit for li\u003chit amrvice abroad who (-au replace fit mezi on lines of commuini- ration, etc., to fill positions reqining light srvlc. at boine by in who are unrable to do nnvthinir more than re- tender seans; che st tW containi.g but. lets or piores of she11; in at, no part of the bodY emeoap4a the Awful and Sou.e timesfantstiofers of the or.aàI through which it ham smd1 For almnost all these ('sses the treat- ment cornes undler whiat la eslld \"iphysicaI tlierapy», electrioity i\u003e ita several currents, LydIro-therapy, stimullating dlouches, Luths sud poehi, radiant heat (dry), masage, meea1no. therapy, correetive exforcises, phYsiesi truining aind niarPLing. Tiieme maei- suires of trentmnent have beu extra- ordinarily scefu. Wlthiiu six mlothaf 1,'200 iven wcre retuned for active service frein Hevaton. Miijor McitKenzie's work is of partieular qig- mission, and large centres for pliyuvi. vial re-edueition b\u003e' his mnethodu viii hoeblhe d in Halifax, Montre4 Winnipeg, Calgary' and (] ovr and] the, remarkable work iinitiait.d at Hart flouse-, Uiniversity' of Toronto, viii be amplifi.d. MNany ef the' aspects of the re-edu cational work provided here are uni- que. No a-eouint et if, or report of the methodsi used hatve yetredd the. publie throuigh thie ehaunels ef thé. Military Hospitals CommilissIon. Sou.e readers, bowever, nia\u003e' have seen amd psesdthe, entirely modeot and lin- obtrnsive but thooughtful and Iiel",
         ",IQUIIDATING THE WAR IN CAN.IADA\\ \u003ether medical men in charge ,escent inen. It lias now enèli proportions and lui- Ls to be accepted as a model £unetional re-education by imy Hespitals Commission. poees te standardize the ap- migned by Dr. Bott and ap- y Major MeKenzie. ThIis ianiifactured in the worlc- nuelph, Ontario, and diqtri-. the centres referred te as Ail these aspects of re- which Dr. Bott lias demon- effective will be financed in the Military Hlospitals Cern- On tlieae wlll be based the ne for Canada. Here also stablished a school of mas- both men snd womeu, and r ille workers exclusively )e attaclied to other centres. cases are treated liere as ysical cas4es. Some of these, ilh cases\"' particularly, pre- wierdest and most pitiful In on e, of injury te the itre, the letter \"s\" lias been uit of the mani's vocabulary. ipt te prenounce the sound mental confusion aud seuf- n another there lu inability c words deulrcd, synonvima rthemmelves, orteil o! a kind. For examnple, if lie my, \"I arn greatly indebted te is only able te say ««You [ man\". The treatinent die- liese caes cornes limder tlie Pind rettirned isin and tre- red a cynical oint lias been ;Iaying their ity lias suap- ne canet re- aud experimeut only itâ designer, Dr. ?Bott, could tell. A visit te the active treatment rooms there la a revelation of what may be aceomplislied witli simple ineclaism. Spac dos not permit of description. The walking £rame lias parsilel rallinga to support tlie arms of paralyties and la Rltted wlith liurdles varylng in liciglit frein two iuches. 1 spoke wlth Corporal -,wlo in one week's turne lias learned te step over several o! the lowest hurdlca. Dr. Bott treated suc- cessfuily a difficuit case of liysterieal parâlysis of both legs in a well-kuit young man wlio liad been buried un- der sandbsgs. At the outset lie eeuld not raise cither foot fromn the ground. Ilc thon 'glit liimself incurable and wats deeply depresscd. llowever, in a short time lie changed his view--he could liardly do otherwjse lu contact with tlie enthuuiasm of the yeung meh of Hart Ileuse-sud vithin thrPé mnonths was able to diacard his cane and mark turne. He isuow onlilht ditty lu oue of the rnllltary lioepitals, aud atil improving. The weak link i the M.Nilitary HTo.- pitals Comrnion's xnaaterplece of organization appears te b. tlie plnb- licity branch. This must beatir itself if tlie people are to b.madesscquslut- ed witli the situation and anm tet assist inii t. solution. The bulletins and reports et the CJommission migit, be placed on the reading-tsbles o! cvery public library; a peut-office stamp be isseêd and ail letters iin- priuted witli the legend \"Our dulty to replace onv soldiers», or semnetiIing siniîlar; thousanda of lantern slidles an Ilns miglit be distribuited iflIq- tratiug re-e-dueation sud the advan- tages te accrue from lt te the nation, A Domnion-wlde or systernutie ef- fort te instill the senue et our obliga- tien would bey' ond a donbt resit il, a universal qul*kening to set upen it. It should bc, made plain, equally, that the tuesres adopted for the re- absorption et our army are based on1 sonnd ecouerniC Priniples, aud net dietated by feelings et benevolenre.",
         "A DEPARTMVENT OF PEOPLE AND AFFAIRS A WOMAN WITII A 1110 IDE.\\ WIleNTY-VI VE years ago) iwaa nlot quit. so faah- ionable, for al woima to wo.(rk as It is to-(daY,» la Milid Mis Billa M.ý West reeenitlY to neeriiun- tlred déleit..s who had vroeeed the, vontinent to eon\u003efer with lier at Port 11urou,~ Mlichigan. 1We started ont, 1 stairted4 eLIginht the wi81i of mly pkirvnts, who thoughit mY plare wvý atre.*» vanei Miïs \\Vvst dlo., iiot a, vise girls; Io setf F1sido tht' adviee q their parenits. A t thtine time, Ili own work- tlivesi of al vory fij dletermination at-rut'. for t)w. dl tumli, -ffi surc y/ou am., rigkit, thrn ýý ukeradr' If ahev hagi sta yed at lhon there wouldl be no fratternal organia tien v;alledl the Wvoirnan's Býeefit A..N eiatiori, nor would therre hoe 5,000 bmn organizaitions il, Canadffa and thet'ni vrl d ,tatea eairry* ing on a wvork whie ha, nover been surpaesed by any ir Ntitultioni of itslç indl Miss West's first wvork waa that al eounjitry sehooI teacher. lIer lov for tht' (culdiren broughit her iute lit uisually Nlose totteh with thet' othen whome etruiggles and hardshipa gb neyer could set' wvithont an overpowel inz dlemire to ailleviate thein. To thi end se bogan to direet ail ber thongI andI enorgy. It was admost impo-mibl te lift the. burdon of thoir physiel strain, but 'Miss West dliscoerpid mneans whereby Mlle eoufl ense th, mental. She found that nlmost evor, one' of those eountry moçthiera livod Iý (laily direadl lest Mlle ubiould be takgi from ber littie--or big-famlly anq leave it unprovided for. Even iog the work of tht' fanii or the' shop con tinued thero weuld be ne one toen the smafl earnings wisely, and fra cial diffieulties wouild soon pe %with erushimr force. She Rw m .MISS mIN I WEST",
         "NORTHERN LIGHTS timut conisisting mostly MisWest laid the foun- an instituition whieh la over tiie world to-day; RB ita home office al new jiding dedioated a few it Port Huron, and paid out of the earniings o! ments; whieli holds in its $11,000,000 in bonds, uin- lay and niglit, this being mes larger~ than the ass-ets k i Michigan. 3y lier di-a West lias disbuirsed in Canada and the Unit- i. lias represented the fra- this continent ait the In- Conneiil of Womnen in and te Washington she ied toeconter with lier per- tiie Marehiones of Aber- istatuas of womien's work h sht, le an auithorityv) in possing every feminine i whieh ie eeinred the id level-lieadediness of a ese mani, a woman whose !rfiowing with love and ir thi. whole o! manldnd. Ieserveesuees qhe hbu leaving colleige she did mission werk amrong the Indians o! Eastern and Central Canada. Ini 1903 Miss HugIihes jeined the edi- tonial staff o! The M1ontroal Star, and three years later The Edmoatoni Bid letiin, which jouirnal she representied in the Paýrliamnitary press gallery of the AIbertai legisiaiure. Anlother two years finids lier appointed Provincial Ar chîvist for Alberta, and ini 1910, pnivate seeretary te the Premier et Alberta. In 1911 lier '\"Life of P(ère Ljacoxube\", the famious western mis- sionary and colenizer, waq piblilhed in New York, and lias been translated iinto Frenceli and Germnan. At the close et 1915 MNiss Huighes resigned froim the offic ot assistant to the ofn-enrle Alberta iii London. England, and retuirned te C'anada to resuime writing. About eiglit years ago Miss Ilughes niade the trip fromn Fort Vermnillon, on1 the Peace River, down to Fort Chipwyanon Lake A\\thabasca, lu a siînal vanoe witli twe liffians, siuoot- ERINE HUGHES, ýsent in Montreal en- the lite of the. late Rlorne, is neot a rela- ýer Minuster of 'Mi- ghes, ase iquipposed am is et Welsh ori- uglie. eûmes ot Irishi .This Hiughes tam- anchl, et tlie O'Neills !tual aiane being lu aning descendent et MISS KATIIERIpiE IUGirs",
         "\"IR (iFORGE FOSTER, .PTIIIOUALEWLAMU( Two, 'i'.1. in 'ouih at colegê and lai#r i n liu ilion raplds on the way. ý i eampd out ait night, uIt the eighit daiys o! the met humn bolngs but littl. R(a.4 River trading- the greater part of the. le ws the only woinan ivellers, who were miout- 1 trappens and mnounted ont travelling compan- Aéy ebivaliros, as al mens are toward all wo- i andi con- Ire to Can- iterested inl --not as a muteh journalistic corresponde, othier papegrs thItr thlose;f rnetý and for inagazines. Sheti is a ve. wvriter and a charinitg conVersaJ TWQ ,IFI-LONG IV Tm' enwnhv sdou.t ada, recently aU weliIlas duiring ti lift te or twenty yeJars, are S.'ir Foster, iMinister o! Trade ami ierre Mu Sir Robert Borden's Ci andi th1f, 11onourabile Williami P the ùiew LieutenattQovernricro lBrunsw3%ick. noth are tntivoe o 13runswick, They wce r ny sehool in thieir y outbi and] tler camei politival opponients in I - Vouiti fiinri aId;a",
         "NORTHERN LIG IITS ElTniversity of New Bruns- open for competition in suad Pagsley were con- mster won, with a mark of a possible 2,500, agaiuiat irk of 1,847. Then began eek race at the university 1 of the cla\u003css. The. arts tat institution was three teir frealunan year Puigs- an average mark of 775 Rsible 1.000, while Poster hind hlm wlth a mark of ir junior year they stood t mark of 780 eaeh. lIn year Foster led with a [, againut Pugsley's 700, egrce examination, which eue, Pugsley's mark was ,ist Foster's 740. During ýRhwon' a gold inedal. ed off the Douglas gold [866, and Pugesley the medal in 1867. Each year ined a secholarship-an in 1866, a classical one in nathematical one lin 1868. i natural science prize lin Pugsley anid Mr. Poster ,erglty of New Brunswick egmn the study of the law \u003er devoted himself to the f teaching. But it was ans before Poster left the \u003efeuor of elassica lu his old alima mater to go into public lite, and hie soon found his way into the Parliament of Canada. Ilard-work- ing-, fuli of courage, with a magniff. cent intellect, a great speaker and an uinexelfled debater, he hias stood be- neanth thue strong lighit of publieity for a1 long time. Mr. Pugsley devoted himmif for mnany Years with great energy to the work or bis profession, sud so far as Ihis connection with public 1fo ewnt lie was in the early part of bis eareer more especially engaged lu Provin- cial polities, rising to the position of Premier of his Province, Finally 'Sir Wilfrid Laurier called( hlmi to a place in his Cabinet. HeP soon showedl hlmi- self to be, in point of intellertnal fapaeity' , perbapa the able\u003ct mn arynong S'ir Wilfnid Ljaunler's follow- ers. Long ho fore thant h. hand proved hiimself to beone of tho-w in the front rank of the lawyers of Canadan. HRis repent appointunient to the. offlee of Lieutenant-Governor o! New Brnn- wick retires him for the. presenit froin the active field of Dominion politoes. Cîfted with a mental epidowment of the highest order, optimnisti, indu,. trions, genuinely genial and generous, though a bard flghter in curt and in Paiament, thpsfe quaities have bad muli to do with hia muecens before the. B3ar and a]\". lu the. aretn of public 11f e.",
         "TMHE LU3BRAKY TABLE KITIIEERANI) OTHFJR l'OEMS Ti3y IZo11\u003ea? J. C, STEAD. Toronte): The. .Nlissonl Book Comrpanly. AýNADÂ'8 prairie bard bas beenIi a vibrant voice o! wvar-time fevel ing. Whlle bis pletures and balladal of the home- steader, tbo Mouinted f'Olie. andu the Engtisbh immigrant pubtlihed in earller volumes loue none o! thbir poweer and ftavcur, MIr. Stead l'an looked afie.id and artieulated mueli of tbe sentiment o! liese stressill daym. The. present volume is ini a ~nn a coIleetion, for it containa, be- side. tii, war verse, the. beql of the 1rarll.r books, but its pr.vailing tone ia one of Ioyalt 'y and eagerneRs for Canadla to dIo lier part in the. war to save liberty. Mfr. Stead won international faine ley tii. lnspired lines on Kilehener, vritten in the fulli pain and resent- ment of the Ioný o! the. leader. The ignifiedl swoep and nobulily of senti- ment o! this poem won praise lui îany lands. Yrotn tb. live stauzas lier. i., room to quole but one: One on]y vow aboive hi, bier, Ont, on]y oath bulfde hi@ bed: W.p mwegr our ting lbihl shdeld him biere TYntil the mea gives- iip ia dond! There is aecallenge ber. to the. pride, and mlight of tiie rave. and to lcnow tbst thene lines suirgel 11p wlth- ilu lb. peet on lthe day o! tiie news of Xilebe.ner's dieath is but to put the. sýeal o! spontaneity and power upon them. Mr. Stead's wari puemari atre Vit and fuit of thought. Tbey are not equ11ally gond puvtry, but there i. limp in the lines or the idieas. 1 Indictrxnent of the British people their luxulry Und sloth andii irnabutjity fcreaee the war fixide compensation Iiii liopes of thieir aheeet 011, q'arg thait woffld flot hie1, i 1aug Oh yathalt WQu1l tflot ILI, at 1a Ole, valmir, strike, for f r-,iýf1m and,4 Q.i, fr, ri.e evr Y virtiue foca4 la inY Drivel douiblyv armted whio hftVe Yi qualýrrel JEt! Yv knciw tho taunt, 010 foamit, the Tqil seer- Strike berne, l3ritannia, Ho,.'a.n' voit teer! Likewise there is inspiration in t lines of \"\u003cThe Cati», wben from eve elime, The son (if' Britain heard the. eail-g and in the dlescriptions of -We We 'Men iii the. Furrow», when litiea ho tuis menace for the enemy: Bawar. of a peace-lovlng peceple Whou th sweep froin thefr t0r.ti and farmi fromn this harvest of patrioti. a.ni ment, varied by a tribute to Frn .çstill a nation and a soul\", or a pas iùng reference t. l'le wblspering, eoenl4ential whent,",
         "THE LIBRARY TABLE suggest the spirited style they are individual'and neyer lapses into dulines SST. LiAWRfENCE TO THE YSER 0K C. CiY. Toronto.. il, Goodehild and Stewart. r is down to business. It rd of things that hiappeii- 'ie few rnayhap that did irises one by being rather e. The things that hap- ade vital and mnoving by ially related to personali-. uthor mnigbt conceivably r his «yarn of the war\", ,ort of free and easy per. lever gif t of humnour and] ,f innate good taste and ý8T CANADIANS IN FRANCE F. MCKFLVEY BELL. To- Clelland, Ooodehild, and *adually achieving a littie -ary o! our own that deals speefilaly Canadian. sort and descriptive nar- its main divisions up to Books .that deal in any that la peculiar with war e philoeophy of war, witb of war, will corne later. ,e are more activelyv than ely engaged. thougx the prnent must corne if we !Frnetion notieeably as a ,orld's movement towards to delicacy and reserve. Thle book, certainly hias humour and symipathy and once or twice it touches thle quinit- essence of pathos. The ehapters rau) aqerially in the pages of T'he (anadian Magazine. 'Many o! the magazine'. readers will be glad t(ý have thiemi agalu and in book form,. TTUE GIIEAT P'OETS 0F ITAIAY Bvy T. 1). ..aMi D\u0026.L. Toronto: Williamn lriggs. frwhat it accomplishesais for, what it attenmpts. The. preface,ý writ- ten in au old world style, with long and lumbering sentences, is naïve and at timecs de(Iilihtful. It la the self ex- hibition, wvithout self couseiousnesa, o! a poetry-lover, The writer la flot a dilettante. Ile do.. not pose. Hoe is very \"erious about bis euthusinsrn for poetry. I-c has earuestlyv coutemplat- rd a stupeudous task, that of glving to Canadiaxis an introduction to al] the great poetry of the. world. rhe present volume on Italian poets ia one of mauy already planued for and which may appear later. There are those who wlll srofr nt the book, who will say it laeka initiative, that it hias no genlus for critleismn, that it smrnals sirnply of the.mnnUal labour of the refereuce librar@y. But the book soun\u003cIa real. It ia lu carnest. Tt pses that of whiehwebhave as yet iu Canada ail too llttle--an au- thentie llterary passion. INSIRATION AND IDEALIS. TiTOUQETS FOR EVERY DAY Býy CxFqvn.tEKi NewYork: F OR thos who like this sort of thiug flown lanuage and Mlark type capi. talization o! lofty sentiments neces- sary to comnienà it. Under \"June Twenty-four» on \"The Right Use of Conversation\", 1 ind this: «Lt la a good mIle neyer to fiatIy coutradiet another. . . . There ar-V",
         "THE (UNADIAN MNAGAZINE polite, ways of dissenting. You may uise suvlb ingratiating phrases as, 'Ob- serve Vie mnethodq of popular speak- ers and profit by their vxiamtple\u003e, etc.» Il Is to e V.peu inbt our poli- tivai platformn arti.4ta are referred te in the lit injinction, The book if; b.atifulifly bound b i purpie eloth. It lias a beauttiftul silk purpie mnarker a qularter of an ineh ie.It wotild devorate anydralgtbe 111OYD GEORGE BrY F'RIANK DrilqoT, Toronto: The Mussn Býook Com~pany. w IVESof freat mcen all remnind W us . .--thait alotof people, are oin totry their htand at bis- gra )h .This book is not exactly pro- YOlund and stuidious biograpby, but it i,, good atory-tdlling. It dees Tnt muaifet the ,apitbility o! gzreat bio- graPhiraI writins te weigh caatr It lin% no sperial gmenlus for eritivls.qii lt la fot the bioKraph of an outstand- lngf fntional figure for the re.fer.ec llbrary. With more mutability 'vit will grave th. essuital eouinter o! the news4 standii. Tho, boon ia hlstnrical enough to b. valunble. It la pietorial enougli to be interesqthxgl. Tt la suffilcentlyv ftled with inefident to be» indicative. 3y ALÂI IN thisq ruhber factorY, goes to Europe, lie iipeiaitelyI on finding bilu pennilees, entera ber wvorloehop. as ordiryl workmain. While the gir in Europe, golng- the rounds mt ad Dbl igpeople, OneV of them11, Phill Amatro, a hratrof uniusual i est exelnl kthdKenu hitl matins; at home,. to find as at remýit 4 strike nt the factoryN% and partieu1a after his fncesreturn, thint ideals andf lier love of pleasure doa aigree. Tbey separate, and Kçenu\u003c f ree nt last front something thnt never hand regarded as a bond. iat to ackn1owledgeý bis love for Qvr Sohmer the nisual daugbter of unusuanl couplec fromi wbomn Kein had taken logingr. e TE AMTATEUR DIPLOMAT 13 r um S. EÀAYS and T. B. C TIi. Toronto: Iloddier and 8o ton. 1IN the \"Prisoner o! Zenda» Anthc Ilope, by putting an EnigUabru through a series o! advillturea 8 one grand romance in a fictltiouq kin state, introdueedl a uew aelloô1 fictioni. lie wats Iollowved. for instar hy Mereditb 'Nicholsýon, wbo ledj Amecrican through soinewbat almi adventures, and again by the ailt] of the. Grraustark nel.Now ve i the interesting sensation of a a dian beeoming the vietini of el\".1 stances in SePrajos, where as, a r\" of hiq timelv and hnnnv hnÎ*u. tii. o",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER .FOR AUL OCCASIONS Where refreshments are needed, there you wiIl find Ingersoll Cream Cheese first favorite. qger3otI) Fi is nutritious. tasly', conveilient anad vconoriid. At ail Girers, in ro andi iSc. paedagei. PBMUIOgCCarejby INGEtSOLIL PACKIMG Co. ILTD. INGERSOLIL, ONT. ire Pressure Gauge Mesures the airinu lires. Tires mna'naiae\u003c mnder t4e correct inlationa last twice aslongas tares ran on haphazard pnmure. A \"\u0026Shrader Universal - Prke $15 AT YOUR JDEALERs oit A. SCNRADER'S SON INC. 334 King Street East, Tornto 4/ktnoon Te. Yaduhtùtg lr/5 \u0026chrader Valve Repair TooI A Fow-u.-on ont ferH Qraack Repair of Dam. aged Cap lliftads of Tire Valves; Reove Valve Inside. Reamaàg Dasged ValveSet Retapping ms\u0026ie r« Of vahe to HMat«i, and Garages. Prke \u003eit Lunches on Pu.p- s.mg of",
         "Io8 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER TheBocl-Building Power of BôOâV RIL ~ZIn feeding experiments »On human beings carried out by a well-known independent Brîitish Physiologist, when Bovril was added to the normal diet it produced an increase ln flesh, bone and muscle 8\"7 DUIUO equal to 10 to, 20 times the %wer ofamnount of Bovril taken. No increase in price sînce the War. Known the world over as the mark which identifies the best of cutlery L.ook for il on .voe Mode JOSEPH SHEFFIELD RODGERS \u0026 SONS, Limil Cu-rLK\u0026 O r rtMA\u003eUmr ENGU",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER i Thoughtfulness in diet pays a richi dividend in health and comeliness. For many years Grape -Nuts has been a favorite food with thoughtful people. \"There's a Reason»",
         "N CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Robin8on's \"Patent\"» Groats -Should Be Used Foi Babymwhen righi or nine months old. Mlade in the forin of a thin gruie! coOIbied with tbrce parts milit and one part water il is a perfect food. If [lhe child bad beeii reared on Robinson\u0026 \"Patent\" BarIqy mitil it has reached the abovc age, (;rott and mjJi 4hould be given altarnâtely willi Patent - ari.7, a il tends te proniot. bene and musdie For the Iualid asad the Ag.d, il) casi-s Of influnza, a bowi of hot g-rueI taken in bé-d ati nigbt produceê profuse prersplraiti hevlPilg to dr'ie thr c1d ou o the sytl.Takeyi hy thec agvd ai uight il promotu warmth and sle\u003cdp. Our frec book1i- \"Adicie te NIthtr,' teIIuail abcýg how to f.ed, clothe and care for infantsii and cýhi1dren, MAGOR, SON \u0026 CO., LiuÉited Sol. Agents for Canada 191 st. Pan[ Se. W., 30 Ck.,.h St. hhmtr.aIToronto CL AR K'Sâ SPwA G HETI AmmmrjmýWITII TOMATO SAUCE AND CliEESE A highly nutritiou8 and partic- ularly appctizing dish. Be sure when ordering spaghetti to spccify CLARK'S and keep your moncy during War -Time circulating in Canadian and BRITISH channels. W., CLARK, LIMITED, MONTREAI. il-",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVICRTISER a Ow Wevqý, ReducedAi uri Table Cost Ot itL Deiius Quaker Oate he writar's bone, whien foodse be- 0 scar. w. miado a study of food a andi costs. W.e ligured by cal- \"Ila a rai ioninig is baNed on nit of rnurit on. f.ýund thiat 1000 calories coît tsim in Quaker Gats We found il reug the %arnei nutrition crost k10 cents. juitl sa *ve 27 as. km.~ 19Sds.-spest...., 16 de broad ud\u0026 k ot 13 cts. verage mcal, rneasurrd by calor- :)et four Urnes as ,nuch a% uk~ So 1 fIguredti Iat eerýy do)llar*'s of Quaker Oaqs mould save us used Quaker Oasii lu reati and isq, lu pancakes and cookies. a% jain porridgue. Then) I discrovered sukr Gats imsde mios thingu digful. That luscious flavor, in no other grain food, bas made sw mueais twkce better than the were mlnitg ail ihat before. fustthe ueenOats Fia/ced «3c nd1c erpckgei Cnaa adIUnited Caada is op",
         "9 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER R\\ FI\\\\EWåN Fnest uali t",
         "CANAUTAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISERZ lke Beàau--y of the Pathephone es not alonge in its wondrous music r ERE i no home that is tastefully £furnished, be it simple or sumptuous, îth wh«ich the Pathephone wilI flot be In fuli- ît accord, or indeed, elnhance by its presence. the Adveutages: 1-n. dlgwi\"g. tutlftg k.u hnq 1 hil ,\u003e, -u.ca b , i a p.#et. à mur cýmf[ of i.ta-aht gompIe repertot ,,f ika( J W d i s For there i, a. Plathephone, to ,quit every surrounding - Pathie - period - design5s extemlpliingii; furniture periods most famnous il] bistory -Queen Anne, Louis \\\\\"f. Sheratoln, Adamr, William and Mary; and every Pathephone is a1 triumph of cabinct-gmakinig skill. Dele' am riie for Palh Ar At Cata. logue coaaln int..erelrg chuis on Pro Fainitur. The Pathe Freres Pbomoqraph Co. 4-6 Clifford St. - Toroeitû, Ont Terrdtory Open for Lim. Agent.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 1*...e by libre Gween Shsoe Ye.\" Largest Importera in Canada of PURE WINES and LIQUORS') We illi uazat d for ronu the DiaUfllerit and wlugri.werb fiu Euirop auacl weil.kaown brandiraa Mtka ),ilan' 0$a~ A Wbt aail AtÇ $a bbtv i .71 ita rte \u0026 1 u-e - ' . ( ' 1 Ob a 0. 1 1n Port ant 1tar \u003elta 1ren. aFt ,tle c il , o î,b Frnd .,-, ý ,,,,,,. 1r- l twu0r. A 1 a i i1 'Ia rew. ta halr 0, ~ \u003elra ill\u0026r lut'l . r\u0026e J . Ii ed nt i ia lIa y r %yolr ,tp tt àurt rie v(r\u003e0- PfRl BRANDIIES fittutr-â quart 1) rtil \"r Oý ln, lar' itutat quarts . Hol.eiaYeIew LabelI Largre. fini, qlA. 119.040 17 50 IRISHI WHISKIES llrpnrl.d l quart wblakey, ý anl r(nt,' p titll .i~e u h el Tbrrr Hem.A fine li h.ky (purdqarta Larg 1ni p, rls. quat. 1 fn\u003ci quartaO i ý IMPORTrEo WIV'4ES Direct f ront OPorto, PortugaL Royl .nonerilh Port ReueiqIartB l.rrae ârk ainti fruilyRp, t t W II rI Ilrt--eýdliui Dry Lkr'Pr ,-rtr. Rotai quarta lied Label -Prulty, ipueiiquarta $,, Faarlt-MrlumDry. RtIr4 qarta, Olor.,O- LoveIy D)inn,,r luRel\u003eIit4 quart . . . . .. . . . Idol-PaiMdiluiu Dry, V'lue Diuuner Wlua. Reputeti quar-ta ,. . CA74ADRAN RYE WHISKES fb11lppeOd (i1reot frOul the DiatilflrieR or Our WaroTvhaea-,). HIRAM WILIE a SONS, LIMIrzD, GOODERHA à WOETS, LIMITNt Boitl , (Il4 'it fi perl Club, (uIe. rdilury, 1 É2 1 rai- ,, 810.25 811.50 s818.?5 1 r\u003e,age) . . ... 810.78 O oîla.,.. 500 6.75 8.00 frtt . ea .. . . . . . .. 0.28 4~ ~ boîir 5 nsa 50 5 57$ be4 e 4.. .75 WC PREPAY EXPRESS CHARG*ES on erdera ef net leiba thast 4 blotUle te airy point in Ontario, RaaQoun Went and Nor t of orth Ray te Seul StI.. arie, for whih d(i 5er andi tu point xzii Saul 81..ý Mar ie Il S11.00 pe.r cage_ TIZ by Peart QUle, Expre, Bank Mole Order or ChI ue When mendiug Cash. Letter lhç rogltWred ue our addtres, Complote Price List Mala4 on Appulaten. Lawrence A. Wilso Co., Limited Offtcw: 83,85 Md 87 Si. lames St. MoWrM The Large.. W1R MerCU\u0026UC SU CIIII4141",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Triumph of O'Keefe's se more than 60 yeaMstho me O'KEE1?R bs etood *H tbaLt's purest end best wbolesoome beverages. \u003ew be ave cAroda»gain sPECIAL PALE DRY ALIE fib flaveur la uulque-try Lt Otw b-- b-n 0. K. BRAND --M Style ingeAle, Ginger O. C10 SnAMP\u0026rill\u0026 LasOU giw r-mSdl U o nade Lift Corus out -with finiers A few drops of Freezone applied directly upon a ten- der, aching corn stopsi the soreniess at once and soon the entire corn or callus loosens and can be lifted off with the fingers without ev-en a twing-e of pain. I I Freemone Remov'.u hard corn., soft coru. aile c..betwe the. toe. end hareed case.Do.. net irrltat. or lifame tihe sEreunding suin or tissue. Y.u feel no pain wbsa applying it or Aller- ward.' -- Woeu. 1 X..p a imall botl..o Freezone on Vour drese and movr let a corn ache tweks. \u0026umail bollrnm Can6.hda i d4rugtore in (bnda k- TIIE EDWARD WFSLKY CO' WahhrrlUs, Ont. A4 S.41 and1 pa.IGIbl laxative foi, CIaildren Mrs. Winslow's Soothing Syrup A nlui.ly N.n-nra#c.\u0026 Does not contain opium, morphine, nor any of their derivatives. B, ecig whnd caki and cor.ctimg in- iuai traablus commonwilh cliiêec dwing the period oaf teoetig hels t. produce agtai and hel ysep tAhgb gise relie Io the ftd rnoiAer.",
         "26 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The more you know about coffee and the more particular you are about aro- mua and f1avour ...the more you will ap- preciate \"SEAL BRAND\" COFFEE. Once you have tried it, your choice wiIl always be Chase and Sanborn's \"Sti.AL BRAND\" COFFEE. In 1 and 2-Vound tins. WhioIe-grouund-puilverized.-als fine grouinc for Percolators. Never sold in bulk. CHASE \u0026 SANBORN, MONTREAL, Thne KELSEYJ Ali Over Canada -is àsed in the. Ouest city and country homes; thie homes of prominest sud wealthy folk; the. homes of weII known people; the homes of arciiitects; the homes ofatin an~d ventlhlating engineers andi experts-, te bhome. of iiniversity profr,%sors and writers on scientific heating; the homes of pbyitas andi healtb officere; the. home% oif those who cati aord the )BEST andi thos. b)eat calculated to KNOW about heating apparatus. Witii thse wha have nioncy, braies and i5cientifc knowledge the evidence is overrwtIirnininl favor Kelsey Wvarmn Air Generatoir Look int the ICel.ey before you buy a Heater. Let us show you juat why Kel.y Fresh Air Heating is preferred to any other systein by people wh. WRITE FOR WJLET LITERATURE CANADA YOUNDPJZS AND FORGINGS, Ltd. JAMES SMART MFG. CO. BRANCH BROCKVILLE, ONT. WNNIPE, 1 N 1 . -",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE AVRIE \"JPENS 3PLRPEN IN CANADA m fiue elailli alis. Falcon.-Fine and eua ction. r Imk-haud wriiw fpini -Pm~ orn Stub.-A vm poplâlar eu bkp.. UN ]BROTHERS , LIXITED - 0ENT O C4AA PEARL STS~, TORONTO A RNeminder There is no one thue of year better Uau anothor for an'augiug Lit, Inosuraee---bwt tbe NEW YEAR means new reolutioaa- a \"NEW STÂBT\"-aud whea could the quiestion of Life In.qtranne b. more appro- pritel conildered than at the E YAINo mn van egunt his affairin order until he ha. aaa,4urrod, aig tar am humait torestqht eaui a8mure, the coatinuud wolfare of those dependeat on Mim. Th\"ar a thou*.and arunafr .ife Jcaaur;joe -,,or. aa gafina Atnd 'i-t a. upra a. the de. rilion o in-r i. the, de1i1on tu a..Ur W11TMOUT DEL-AN-hiul. he.1th and opp.lot tui~oa do so. The Great-W,, Lif arne ce\u003e o. fuîu to thas nedng IaalurAnoe fubi idti, rand iiation riý irari z %.;xbl pl Th t-re.t-%W*,t Pv\u0026uJi are nai~jgad plan. a\u0026 issued bu mfl r, e, ed and~ circumntanoe. 1-t ua de,rbe bel( Phait v for Y0Rneola. Great-West Life Assurace C. H\"\u0026d Off\". WINNIEG ASK FOR A 1*1 DFSK g\u003cj 27 The Ful Luxryof eah il' attainerd when i i perfum.ed Wirhl the genuinle dm uI use for a Centuryv, thim, inaîchicai pe4rfumoe hl'l w0in on iim mnit a nim rtivinibk, world.wjde poplilarhyv, anti lt*tl tdY uiqjiur aMCong P-rfCImi. (if ils cd;. InuIlle Bathl Il\" ireL art tral rri kal For geneifral b1Nai ou bbc I\u003ereuuinjtg. table il 11as no] rqual. LANMAN \u0026 KEMP, NEW YORK and MONIUM.., k« Yor Druggst foil. Accept no~ Subditute 1 ADVERTISER",
         "I CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Transfer the OlId Records Start 1918 with Clear Files J o potntheyal job, w. know) uiu1 around the first of the year, you're courting a possible mnuddke i youw whole filng systemn. For inthe bustit and rush of an ekeventh bour transfer theremar iidious oppor- Gefa 'YI1 cunities apkenty for the. uew Fi correspondenoeaid records tobecouie hopetessly mixed witii the. old. When there's a service a: your dis- posal 11k. \"Office Speciakty\" offers you-a service that çarantees a posi- rive saviusg ih iman Labor of yourstaff; a service that wili be or thiq 1l.PSger ~ook f,.r your ing Clerk the means of freeing your office from the usual rais- fer lime confusion; andi moreover, a service diat wilt masure you the. fuIt.st measure of economny, tiien therc's no reason ini the. wodld why you shoulti put the. job off. To coîuvince yourself duat the service we offer is genulne, to make us tproveup, gt noucii wkth the neaest\"0ffie pecaly» Fiing belw-dgetoneof oursysemmni. working on your trans\u0026er prtMsm. MADE IN CANADA BY Larget Makers of Fdàsng Devices and Office Systeau in the Britih E#pe Home Office and Factordcs: NEWMARmE, CAN. RFiin Equipnseut Stores at: Tori.mt.. Montrent, Ottawa, Hifax. Hamilton, WlnniP.g. Reon., Eioem, V\u0026",
         "CAiNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 29 inter bas sent out her \"advance posts.\" itorists should heed the advice to \u003c4Trac- iize.\" If you get the \"Master Tire\"' lipmrent -Dunlop Traction Tread -you 1 neyer go back to any other make Qof tire. Dunlop Tire \u0026 ]Ruliberý Goods Co., HEAD OFFICE AND FACTORIES: TORONT7O BRANCHES: Victoria, Vancouver, Edmonton, Calgary, Saskatoon, Regina, Winnipeg, London, Hamilton, Toronto, Ottawa, Montreal, St. John, Halifax. Makera of High-Grade Tires for Automobiles, Motor Trucks, BcceMotorcyclem and Carria.ges; and Higb..Grade RTubber Belting, Packing, Fire Home and General Home, Dredge Sleevem, Military Equipment, Mats, Tiling, Hleelm and Solem, Cernents, Horme Shoe Pads and General Rubber Specialtieq.",
         "CANAt\u003eIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CANADA Put Your Hand To The PIow! Ewery fresh fiasrow at tesucceu for you, added prosPeity t Canada, umczsased .t=et t pr aud mirer yictory fo teh A Tiie faumers of Canada are \"ody playing an al-importaut part in the. Eup cosfit. Hmu W. T. White, C.a\u0026uia Minister of Finance, says: lui order t meet our interest paymeuts abroaci, sustah, our iliaxe of the. burden of thewuar posibof what an ed or sold For Canada at dis jxcture twac word of the bour .iiauM be production, production, and again proeécfin For fu Information rngardiag farulag eoiportuaitl.s in Canada wit. ta:- W. D. SCOTT, E\u0026q., aiprneneto Immxigration, Ottawa, Caa\u0026 or J. OBED SMITH, Esq., A*oW=ut \u0026q)nento .1 Ewda. 11 -13 Chimg Cross, Lmn, S. W, FAglaud.",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER a SE TELEPHONES GIVE SATISFACTION and are Made in Canada Canadian Independent Telephones have been giving genuine satisfaction for years in every servîce-in the city, on rural Unes and in the factory. This has been due to quality, as nothing but the very best material and the highest class of workrnanship enter into the manufacture of oui telephones. C\"e s, 'li e ek Set \u0026TIC TELEFIIONES FOR NSIDE SERVICE to Our inagneto telephone equipment mnd manufacture Automnatic Telephonme any service, and make a specialty of arn. for jactances or departnienti Yhone System, connecting yaur different, ,willgiveyou advantages in service ilhat ýet with any other %~ystem. It will there- ur advantage to get ful particulars of ic mystems before going outside of ,rd anid let uis know what telephone ser- luiad we will seed yaiu bulletins and iars of the equiptuent that will take waIts Standard Wall Tekphane for Rural Urn, Çanadian Tele1bhones for Canad itn Service ow, a spec1ia \u003ciOpSIrtmn whih wil \u003clontrat4t to inhtâ.I or keep in rep\u0026lr youx' private system. Let~ US hear from you. idian Independent Telephone Co., Limited 263 Adelaide Street Wiest, Toronto",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTI8ER met for Whooping Cough, SPesmodic Aflthm, Sromchitie, SCouffils ; t ia h ubowg thllt nire tl.. ha\"No ftun kmO,, where thmre VW7 baUir 0ak , ý. AWIr i\",if -thei gaatto . mA keiu mti nI eh .% Jrl \"t 1tIa. -yh A-1hm~aum vo, thr br.ouch18l ofla\u0026 .MSçt~ Fer, I Cftmtlan. i. onubla autou.nt 'd il gwugri1 idalqo1 1 apfoectonto oee@ iý 1kww. -f àrrign ir bk TII £ý.t O tC u. .7 .T. TUE ~ M,-CRoun en:a*réis. .Y ffor ChMdi Ir is the oilly natturA1 illg for the littUe on\u0026es by For the 01ildrecn thoere 'le Unidvrwear, Sokns aa ('tS Sweateru4, Night Dreaaeaç, Nijzlt Shirtill Py. _jaà Ma Shippers, D r , lug (\u003ewils, etc. ilfdluifUrieçt o logma\"fr«c on DR. JMEGER ~-o u BriiL3h ''fiuded 186 ff Iroquois Assortment Choice Nuts and delicately-Rlavored Chocolates in a variety of combinations. Another revelation of the high 1 standard of 1 k VA' 1zýý",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER a on Coýe,g seey incnof ?totn Amr, -fe t ev~.Wt Wheetog u iSBec Sî t. osp Î-0 0119411 LM~DIPINE\u00261lN Weymout st of WInter Colt-T ni3Turlugy and Quimil nsit,Q Wr,tw CRE AMER a TýU-Rtp .e FMMR MOTEL-TEIE INPN AT CIIARLL AIR UNE RAILWAY ,ME MOGR5MWIAIfP1eoI CA ROLINA RKSORTS 1 8outhern Pines-PinahuratCamdon\" FLORIDA RK8ORTSi Atlanta £Birmingham U. a. Mlitary Camps iiGU z .-I HfOTEL 1 oetkRAlXI t~.Cmlw~4a ~.\"iwm- E ....~ Wkklu..CtuL4uaAbo À tUÀlTAUqi'Aa...ld..q' I a , mW - e @t -. ,. 'aelgri, ri] uiliug wid ls\u003e11(14 Id(\u003ctaliW II.Mlg THE MANHAT1TAN GENUINE DIAMONDS CASH OR CREDIT THE BEST GIFT OF ALL ___Nothing gives so much pleasure or lias such Iasting v'ahie as the gift of a Dianond, Our Dianorndq are of the fineut qualit\u003e'. Save 1111nCy bN dialin1g with us. We are Diainond Importers and can give you every, advantage in prie and quality. WE ALLOW A SPECIAL DISCOUNT O0 PEI CENT. FOR CASH eaasy and reasonable. Satisfaction assured. We %ciid Dianionds io any, part of ipecstion atour expenise. Payments inay b. mnate weekly or mnonthly. WiIteor Cal 1for Catalogue.uw. DONT DELAY. JACOBS ]BROS. i. Toroto Arcade - TORONTO, Ontari. r 00IRoGE Cu~a Z A rtJsd FTY E Rmurine ' '' ri Gn -rnulated yld Mrnina Favorte retmnt for Eyes hat feel êy- snd smatit Gieyu y znic fyu Mw, Teta.i wt the4 ufn eganty eor 4 YOU ~ ~ o«, ANO UNE VMI Murine old at »um ToU and u 180, New 0 leans MOTE L. DE BOTO Million Dollar Home Illaiel, , tl' No a ' Modeats",
         "84 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERZTISEIi, Double Tract Route W uumiN TEK T'OUKIàT FARE S 'Winter Touribt Farts are now in effcct t0 resorts in FLORIDA GxEORGIA NORTII CAROLINA SOUTE CAROLINA LOUISIANA AND OTIZAR SOIYTEIN STATE3 ALSO TO BERMUDA CUBA TEE WEST INDIES PANAMA AND CENTRAL and SOUTEK AME RICA R*uad Trip Tickets to California and Pacific Coast Points are on sale daily. For Tickets, Reservations, Stop-over regulationsi and in. formation, apply to any agent of the. Grand Trunk System G. T. BELL, Pàussq TuIe Meaqw. MONTREAL W. S. c Gemral Pm. - MONI 34",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTlISER 3 \"JULIAN SALE The name hehînd the gooids is your gua-ranttee for the quality RITEmHITE' WrrARDROeBE. TRUNKS Every appointment in its construction- every convenience in the making- every point in the mnanufacture of the tRite-H ite' Ward- robe Trunk is one More good reason why it should be the trunk of your choice in contemn- plating a longer or shorter trip, sumnier or winter. In a very real way it is the most 'complete of wardrobes, and apparel travels ini it with as littie risk of crushing as it would right on the \"hangers\" or in the \"Chest of Drawers\" in the home. (Have it denonstated in the store, or write fr special bookiet.) $33= Io $!)O= 12h. Julian Sale Leather Gcods co0., Ltd. 105 Kiumg Street W.St, Toronto",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Canadian Pacific FLORIDA Via DETROIT and CINCINNATI THROUGH Sleeping Car Service from Detroit On Specified Dates CANADIAN PACIFIC to Detroit-- Choice of Routes Beyond Winter Tourist Tickets Now on Sale TWO NIGHTS ONLY TO FLORIDA Via Canadian Pacific-Detroit and Cincinnati Particulars from any Canadian Pacific Ticket Agents, or W. B. HOWARD, District Passenger Agent, Toronto.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 37 of -ravrel T H E passeger to the Pac u6c Cour iu todsay Qfred a choire of rouites dial tenders il unnecohsary to re-trac. hi8 steps and opo-na up a %% alih of new .ý-ery àad ourdoor sport. Do not faau to viuit jasr and Motint Roiàson Parka with their wvonderftul mnn Inini, gorges, glaciers and cataracts. at he pr0eton gVen to ga s increased the. quantiIy and roducesd iie. tientc of ran ,. Motmin sheep and goal, theii.ost wary of animaàle, are sren troding, on the. bis, and comuing clown o the raîlroad in %iow of passing trains, Irt urttisr p'Artilnrus Our boole te Cs.nitdlan Northern \u0026woklni,. \u003c-r apply to0 thea Ue*nvr\u0026 Pausnger Dep.rtment, Montreal, que ; Toronto, ont Witnlpejn, Mmn. CANADIAN NORTHERN RAILWAY \u003eRI1NTLNG A NDï An up-to-date plant in a modern buiding. Our work is right. Our prices are right, and we deliver work when protnised. Let us figure on your next job. We number among our customers some of the largest consumers of printed matter in Canada. No job too large and none too small.' H. BEST PRINTING COMPANY LIMITED THE CANADIAN MAGiAZINE BUILD~I 200-206 Adelaide Street West, Toronto",
         "18 CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER \"That the, Canadian Government shalh secure with- out d.hzy the complettIon of the Intercolonial Railway fromn Rivier. du Loup, through New Brunswick and Truro, Nova Scotia.\" Thus r.ad the~ 68th of the. resolutiofl8 forming the, basis of Confederation. ____________Intsiculsiil IJ, I l Primce Edwuld 1. y. Trons carnd 77ihs 80,8 Alg 877 4 tq,68.5 1 7 , 10jj8 182 F ii hough tra.obtwtm 187 1-U , 1916 .159.\" t Jh n Hl7 . 24 j,1 . 11018W Levis S\u0026 Jaln uàiaz. Ibe Sydmy .. .. ...526 1917. 1 877 $1,272,30,O 17 . . . .O5 18W 7 3,019,471.00 l a - The yn s 187... !,o 1916 21,374,697.001Oroqeo n 1961,9 Q. A. HAYES, h\u0026nPMTnrains C«à i« huhEpestan WIaaF..P.- BRADY, F. DRAI\u003eY1 - bibix WÏNPG \" StJC*u - Ifailla Wlnnipeg ~ I Tit H. .MELANSON. T N.1. aMax - - Sde",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER . . .e . ......... The Original and only G enuine Beware o ln*aUom Sd on du mEetu 01 MINARDS LINIMENT ~~dZ3IN~ It's the best yet 1",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Sectional Book Cabinets In Any Style Why neglect youir books and have themi soilled or tori for want ofa proper means of storing themn, especially m'len you can pro- cu~re the very best acconmmodation for themn at a very mioderate coste Let us send you the evidence. M A1)E STYLIES MATrcH YOUR FURNTIURE IN FINISHES MATCH YOUR FURNITURE A HANDSOME 'BOOK I«FREI Our pttbli.bers have just completed for usc a band.iome book, uliicb me wilI m~ail \u003eviu fire c~har~ge on recelpt off your naine andi Aiircês-. This book is not an ordinary calalogue, b a book that you will f0nd instructive andi intereslting, andi fuil of valuable informaaiont furni[uhingthe horneý etc., beýsides illustrating andi ful esrb the varicus styles ai %peia fetuesoff the -Macey- B3ook Cabinets. Write Io-day for our famous Màae4 Style ok.\"\u0026 Every book owner shoulti have a copy. It costs yen notbing. For Solo by \u0026Il Loadlag Vunitur Dodo,. t.W4iTO",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER The unsurpassed beaty of toile that is fourid ini th amongst tbe pie n outsta inue in tengpsto amth s tC e fe lia tadi piano si sre kaaing od. When to that wonderfull tone is adâed perfect workmanship and beautiful desfign, you feel that in selecting a *\" Cecifian » piano for your home you have made no possible mistake. The Cecîhian All Met] Action Player Piano lias been for many years at the apex of player piano perfec- tion. It is Ieakproof, cliznate proof and rust proof. and the Cecilian Temponoid or time-controlling lever giv\"es you complete control of the instrument, eliniatîng en- tirely the. nechaixical effect commion to the average player piano. Ail C.cilian Upright Pians are convertible, that is, tbe player action may b. instalied at anY future time convenient to the. purchaser. This m ost important feature is found only in the Cecilian piano. W'rite us for catogc aud parztruars i itur seuing eaa THE CECILIAN COMPANY, LIMITE» 247 YONGE STREET - TORONTO 4'",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Preserves getting Iow? 8 Tide over the winter with Everybody likes thi, delicione Table Syrup -and it's uch __ 1\u003c18 expensive than butter for the children ta eat with bread, eËÉà p At ai] Grocers - 2 5, 10 and 20 lb. tins--3 lW Gias, Xasu !Vp ~ Write for free Cook Book. 3 THE CANADA STARCH CO. LIMITED. MONTREAL",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 43",
         "41 * CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Imperial Royal Flying Cor Officers and Men oftbe Ryal Flyiing Cor p. v being accepted for the Cadei must fulfil the tollowing c\u003c between the agyes of 18 and 25. no expense de-e is not a with the standard of ps (Cadet Wing). paid from date of tial, but a good ( Amy",
         "Ï1.74 a e com i e in thhie *vl elatn cak of use, Soa îs.fr chic, wer in -H e-K - ý 1 e#Hv yo a fife Ear iny oe",
         "D3RINK, DOES TEA OR COFFEE INTERFEREI? ÇT\u003ee change to Po6tum has brought Jfealth to so many Vay tra. THERES A REASOI Ood"
      ],
